To refrain from senseless killing, they wielded force
pikes rather than lightsabers. Meter-long melee weapons
used by the Echani and carried by the Senate Guard, the
pikes were equipped with stun-module tips capable of
delivering a shock that could overwhelm the nervous
systems of most sentients, without causing permanent
damage.
“The next few hours will test the limits of your agility,
speed, and accuracy,” Plagueis said, as several hundred of
the biggest, bravest, and most skilled warriors—their
bodies daubed in pigments derived from plants, clay, and
soil—began to separate themselves from the crowds. “But
this is more than some simple exercise in proficiency; it is
a rite of passage for these beings, as they are assistants in
our rise to ultimate power, and therefore servants of the
dark side of the Force. Centuries from now, advanced by
the Sith, they might confront us with projectile weapons or
energy beams. But by then we will have evolved, as well,
perhaps past the need for this rite, and we will come
instead to honor rather than engage them in battle. Through
power we gain victory, and through victory our chains are
broken. But power is only a means to an end.”
To the clamorous beating of drums and the wailing of the
onlookers, the warriors brandished their weapons, raised a
deafening war cry, and attacked. A nod from Plagueis, and
the two Sith sped across the plain to meet them, flying
among them like wraiths, evading arrows, gleaming spear
tips, and blows from battle-axes, going one against one,
two, or three, but felling opponent after opponent with taps
from the force pikes, until among the hundreds of jerking,
twitching bodies sprawled on the rough ground, only one was left standing.
That was when Plagueis tossed aside the stun pike and
ignited his crimson blade, and a collective lament rose from
the crowds on the hillsides.
“Execute one, terrify one thousand,” he said. Hurling the warrior to the ground with a Force push, he
used the lightsaber to deftly open the primitive’s chest
cavity; then he reached a hand inside and extracted his stillbeating heart.
The keening of the crowd reached a fevered pitch as he
raised the heart high overhead; then it ended abruptly.
Following a protracted moment of silence, the fallen warriors were helped from the battleground and the crowds
began to disperse, disconsolate but emboldened by the
fact that they had discharged their duty. Horns blew and a
communal chant that was at once somber and celebratory was carried on the wind. In the principal city, a stone stele would be carved and erected for the dead one, and the
day-count would commence until the return of the Sith. Plagueis placed the still heart on the primitive’s chest
and used the hem of his robe to wipe the blood from his
hand and forearm.
“At one time, though Irecognized that Muuns are a higher
class of beings, I puzzled over the fact that beings would
relinquish their seats for me, or step into the muck to allow
me to pass. But early on in my apprenticeship I came to
realize that the lumpen species were making room for me
not because I was a Muun, but because I was in fact
superior to them in every way. More, that they should by all
rights allow me to step not merely past them but on them to
get where I needed to be, because the Sith are their
salvation, their only real hope. In that we will ultimately
improve the lives of their descendants, they owe us every
courtesy, every sacrifice, nothing short of their very lives.
“But there are dark times ahead for many of them, Sidious. An era of warfare necessary to purge the galaxy of
those who have allowed it to decay. For decay has no cure;
it has to be eradicated by the flames of a cleansing fire. And the Jedi are mostly to blame. Crippled by empathy,
shackled to obedience—to their Masters, their Council,
their cherished Republic—they perpetuate a myth of
equality, serving the Force as if it were a belief system that
had been programmed into them. With the Republic they
are like indulgent parents, allowing their offspring to
experiment with choices without consequence, and
supporting wrong-headedness merely for the sake of maintaining family unity. Tripping over their own robes in a
rush to uphold a galactic government that has been
deteriorating for centuries. When instead they should be
proclaiming: We knowwhat’s best for you.
“The galaxy can’t be set on the proper course until the
Jedi Order and the corrupt Republic have been brought
down. Only then can the Sith begin the process of
rebuilding from the ground up. This is why we encourage
star system rivalries and the goals of any group that aims to
foment chaos and anarchy. Because destruction of any sort
furthers our own goals.” Plagueis paused to take the warrior’s heart back into his
hands.
“Through us, the powers of chaos are harnessed and
exploited. Dark times don’t simply emerge, Sidious. Enlightened beings, guiding intelligences manipulate
events to bring about a storm that will deliver power into the
hands of an elite group willing to make the hard choices the Republic fears to make. Beings may elect their leaders, but
the Force has elected us.” He glanced at his apprentice. “Remember, though, that a
cunning politician is capable of wreaking more havoc than
two Sith Lords armed with vibroblades, lightsabers, or
force pikes. That is what you must become, with me
advising you from the dark.”
“Are we grand enough?” Sidious said.
“You should ask, are we crude enough?” Plagueis
quirked a smile. “We’re not living in an age of giants, Sidious. But to succeed we must become as beasts.”
Taking a bite from the warrior’s heart, he passed the
blood-filled organ to his apprentice.
14: THE SHAPE OF HIS SHADOW
“You appear to be enjoying the steak, Ambassador Palpatine.”
“Exquisite,” he said, holding her gaze for a fraction longer
than might have been called for. Working on her third glass of wine since dinner began,
she interpreted his ready smile as permission to turn fully
toward him. “Not too gamy?”
“Scarcely a trace of the wild.” A dark-haired human beauty with big blue eyes, she was
attached in some way to the Eriaduan consulate on Malastare—host of the gala at which the Dug winners of the Vinta Harvest Classic were being feted.
“Are you on Malastare for business or pleasure?”
“As luck would have it, both,” Palpatine said, patting his
lips with a napkin. “Kinman Doriana and I are members of
Senator Kim’s party.” He indicated the clean-shaven, slightly balding young man in the adjacent seat.
“Charmed,” the woman said. Doriana smiled broadly. “You’re not kidding.” Her gaze moved to the neighboring table, where Vidar Kim sat with members of the Gran Protectorate and
politicians from nearby Sullust, Darknell, and Sluis Van.
“Senator Kim is the tall one with the quaint beard?”
“No, he’s the one with the three eyestalks,” Doriana said.
The woman blinked, then laughed with him. “A friend of mine was asking about Senator Kim earlier. Is he married?”
“For many years, and happily,” Palpatine told her.
“And you?” she said, turning to him again.
“Frequent travel forbids it.” She watched him over the rim of the wineglass. “Married
to politics, is that it?”
“To the work,” he said.
“To the work,” Doriana said, raising his glass in a toast.
Just twenty-eight, Palpatine wore his reddish hair long, in
the tradition of Naboo statesmen, and dressed impeccably. Many who encountered the ambassador described him as
an articulate, charismatic young man of refined taste and
quiet strength. A good listener, even-tempered, politically
astute, astonishingly well informed for someone who had
only been in the game for seven years.A patrician at a time when few could claim the title, and destined to go far. Well
traveled, too, courtesy of his position as Naboo’s
ambassador-at-large but also as the sole surviving heir to
the wealth of House Palpatine. Long recovered from the
tragedy that had struck his family more than a decade
earlier, but perhaps as a result of being orphaned at
seventeen, something of a loner. A man whose love of
periodic solitude hinted at a hidden side to his personality.
“Tell me, Ambassador,” she said, as she set her glass
down, “are you one of those men with a friend in every
spaceport?”
“I’m always eager to make friends,” Palpatine said in a
low monotone that brought sudden color to her face. “We’re
alike in that way.”
Taking her glossy lower lip between her teeth, she
reached for her wineglass once more. “Are you perhaps a
Jedi mind reader disguised in ambassadorial robes?”
“Anything but.”
“I’ve often wondered whether they have secret
relationships,” she said in a conspiratorial voice.
“Gallivanting around the galaxy, using the Force to seduce
innocent beings.”
“Iwouldn’t know, but I sincerely doubt it,” Palpatine said. She looked at him in a calculating way, and raised her
hand to caress his chin with a manicured forefinger. “On Eriadu some believe that a cleft chin identifies someone
the Force has pushed away.”
“Just my luck,” he said in mock seriousness.
“Just your luck, indeed,” she said, sliding a flimsi-card
across the table toward him. “I have hostess duties to
attend to, Ambassador. But I’m free after midnight.” Palpatine and Doriana watched her walk away from the
table, teetering slightly on high heels.
“Nicely played,” Doriana said. “I’m taking notes.” Palpatine slid the flimsi-card toward him. “A gift.”
“When you earned it?” Doriana shook his head. “I’m not
that desperate. Yet, anyway.”
The two of them laughed. Doriana’s engaging smile and
innocent good looks belied a sinister personality that had
brought him to Palpatine’s notice several years earlier. A
Naboo, he had a troubled past and, perhaps as a
consequence, talents that made him useful. So Palpatine
had befriended him and clandestinely drawn him into his web, in accordance with Plagueis’s instructions that he
always keep an eye out for allies and would-be coconspirators. That Doriana wasn’t strong in the Force made no difference. In eleven years of Sith apprenticeship
and of traveling far and wide in the galaxy, Palpatine had
yet to encounter a single being whose strength in the Force
had gone unrecognized or unexploited. At the neighboring table, Vidar Kim and the rest were
enjoying themselves, their privacy ensured by the table’s
transparent sound-muting umbrella. Envy gnawed at
Palpatine while he watched Kim … the position he enjoyed
in the Galactic Senate, the posting on Coruscant, easy
access to the galaxy’s elite. But he knew that he needed to
bide his time; that Plagueis would move him to the galactic
capital only when there was some good reason to do so. As often as Plagueis maintained that the Rule of Two
had ended with their partnership, the Muun remained the
powerful one, and Palpatine the covetous one. Bane’s
dictum notwithstanding, denial was still a key factor in Sith
training; a key factor in being “broken,” as Plagueis put it—
of being shaped by the dark side of the Force. Cruelly, at
times, and painfully. But Palpatine was grateful, for the
Force had slowly groomed him into a being of dark power
and granted him a secret identity, as well. The life he had
been leading—as the noble head of House Palpatine,
legislator, and most recently ambassador-at-large—was
nothing more than the trappings of an alter ego; his wealth,
a subterfuge; his handsome face, a mask. In the realm of
the Force his thoughts ordered reality, and his dreams
prepared the galaxy for monumental change. He was a manifestation of dark purpose, helping to advance the Sith
Grand Plan and gradually gaining power over himself so
that he might one day—in the words of his Master—be able
to gain control over another, then a group of others, then an
order, a world, a species, the Republic itself. Doriana’s elbow nudged him out of his reverie.
“Kim’s coming.”
“Don’t think I didn’t see that,” the Senator said when he
reached Palpatine. Palpatine let his bafflement show.
“The flimsi-card that woman slipped you,” Vidar said. “I
suppose you entertained her with the usual tall tales.” Palpatine shrugged in a guileless manner. “I may have
said something about getting to know the galaxy.”
“Getting to know the galaxy’s women, he means,” Doriana interjected. Kim laughed heartily. “How is it that I come to have
assistants who leave trails of conquests, and a son who meditates on the Force in the Jedi Temple?”
“That’s what makes you so well rounded,” Doriana said. More than even Plagueis, Kim had been Palpatine’s mentor in the sphere of mundane politics. Their relationship went back fifteen years, to when Palpatine had been
forcibly enrolled in a private school in Theed, and Kim had
just completed his stint in the Apprentice Legislator
program. In the time since, Palpatine had watched Kim’s
family grow to include three sons, one of whom—Ronhar,
six years Palpatine’s junior—had been turned over to the
Jedi Order as an infant. When Plagueis had learned of this,
he had encouraged Palpatine to allow his friendship with
Kim to deepen, in the expectation that sooner or later his
and Jedi Ronhar’s paths would cross. Give order to the future by attending to it with your
thoughts, his Master frequently told him.
“Come and join us at the table,” Kim was saying. Palpatine stood and fell into step beside Kim as he
headed back to the larger table.
“One day you’ll be replacing me at this job,” the Senator
said quietly, “and the sooner you grow accustomed to what
goes on, the better.” He sighed with purpose. “Who knows,
a few hours of senatorial gossip might even be enough to
deter you from going into galactic politics altogether.” Some dozen beings were grouped in a circle, all of them
male but not all of them human. The prominent chairs were
occupied by Gran Protectorate Senator Pax Teem and his
aide, Aks Moe. To both sides of them sat Sullustan and
Sluissi Senators. Also present were Eriaduan Senator Ranulph Tarkin and his aide, Bor Gracus; the Darknell
ambassador; and Dugs, Boss Cabra—a Black Sun Vigo—
and his son, Darnada, guests of the Podrace winners and
attendees of the most recent Gathering on Sojourn. By then Palpatine had made three visits to the Hunters’ Moon, but only to observe and to familiarize himself with
some of the galaxy’s key players. Plagueis, as Hego Damask, had gone to great lengths to avoid being
identified as Palpatine’s benefactor. Only King Tapalo’s
chief minister, Ars Veruna, knew that Damask was
grooming him for a career in galactic politics, and, as a
personal favor to the Muun, had appointed Palpatine Naboo’s ambassador.
“Ah, new blood,” Pax Teem remarked after Kim had
introduced Palpatine to everyone.
“I quite enjoyed the Podraces,” Palpatine said as he sat
down.
Teem’s leaf-like ears twitched. “You’re too young to have witnessed them in their glory days, Ambassador. Before
Tatooine succeeded in capturing the fancy of race
enthusiasts.” The Gran pronounced Tatooine as if an
execration. Palpatine knew that Plagueis had been responsible for
Tatooine’s rise, as well for weakening Malastare’s oncelucrative trade in fuel, by helping to make Naboo’s plasma
resources available to many worlds.
“Have your duties taken you to that horrible place?” Aks Moe asked. Palpatine nodded as he sat. “Just two months ago.”
“And how did you find it?” Cabra said. Palpatine turned to the Dug crime boss. “Contentious. What with the Desilijic and Besadii Hutts vying for control.”
The statement met with murmurs of concurrence.
Teem spoke to it. “Perhaps Gardulla’s rivalry with Jabba
Tiure will one day result in Malastare’s resurgence.” His
eyestalks twisted toward the Dugs. “Though I’m certain Boss Cabra favors Gardulla, out of respect for the help she
provided on Nar Shaddaa.” Young Darnada bristled at the remark. “Whatever mark we’ve made on Nar Shaddaa, we made on our own. Ask
any Black Sun—”
Stopping him before he could go on, Cabra said, “We will always be indebted to Gardulla for her efforts on our
behalf.” Kim watched the Dugs, then gestured negligently.
“Tatooine is too remote and lawless to have an impact on
galactic events, in any case. It’s the activities of the Trade
Federation that should concern the Republic. Look what the
Federation has done to our own Naboo.” Kim became the object of everyone’s gaze. An
outspoken critic of King Tapalo and Ars Veruna, he
continued to serve in the Senate only as an appeasement
to those noble houses that were aligned against the regent.
“It is my understanding that Naboo embraced the
arrangement,” Ranulph Tarkin said.
“Some did.”
“No can one deny that your world has prospered as a
result,” Teem interjected.
“Prospered, yes,” Kim said, “but not nearly to the extent it
should have. If not for the deals Hego Damask brokered with the Banking Clan, the Trade Federation, and—” He
glanced at Cabra. “—Outer Rim Construction, Naboo would be as wealthy as Kuat or Chandrila.”
The Dug remained silent while Kim continued. “Naboo’s
plasma is being sold for ten, sometimes twenty times what
the Federation pays for it.”
“A monster of our own creation,” Tarkin muttered. “The
Trade Federation didn’t become powerful by exploiting the Outer Rim. It was supported by Eriadu’s own House Valorum, and supported by Tagge and others.”
“Then perhaps the time has come for us to make our
dissatisfaction public,” Kim said, glancing around the table.
“The Muuns are merely avaricious, but the Trade
Federation has the potential to become dangerous.”
“I agree with the good Senator from Naboo,” the Sullustan delegate said. “Even now the Trade Federation
seeks to seat its client worlds in the Senate, as a means of
fortifying its voting block. Mechis, Murkhana, Felucia, Kol
Horo, Ord Cestus, Yinchorr … the list goes on and on.”
The Sluissi Senator made a sound of disapproval, and a
tremor seemed to snake through his humanoid upper torso.
“Don’t dismiss too lightly the part the Muuns play in all this. Yinchorr’s Senate seat was Damask Holdings’ doing.” He
looked at Cabra. “Is that not the case?”
The Dug’s powerful shoulders heaved. “I’m not in a
position to know.”
Laughter from the others prompted Darnada to part his muzzle just enough to reveal the tips of his fangs.
The Sluissi looked at Kim and Palpatine. “Perhaps Black
Sun is unaware that the son of Hego Damask’s operating
officer—Larsh Hill—is in line to replace Tonith as chairman
of the Banking Clan.”
Tarkin put his elbows on the table and leaned forward.
“I’ve heard the rumors to the effect that Damask has been meeting with the heads of the guilds, the Corporate Alliance, and the Techno Union. What might become of
trade—of any sort—if he brokered a deal between them
and the Trade Federation?”
“Here’s the point,” Kim said. “If we’re going to prevent the
Trade Federation—and the Muuns—from tightening their
hold on the Senate, we need to band together and vote to
defeat the proposed legislation.” Before Kim could add anything, Tarkin said to Palpatine,
“Do you agree that the Trade Federation needs to be taken
down a notch, Ambassador?” Palpatine glanced at Kim, who said, “Speak freely.”
“Senator Kim and I are in complete accord on the issue,
and have been for some time. No single corporate entity
can be allowed to grow too powerful—especially at the
expense of developing worlds. Naboo must safeguard its
interests, just as Eriadu and Sullust and Sluis Van have
safeguarded theirs.”
Tarkin watched him closely. “Is Naboo prepared to
assume control of transporting its plasma? Aren’t you in
danger of biting the proverbial hand that feeds you?”
“Naboo has no intentions of planetizing the Trade
Federation’s facilities. We’re simply pressing for a
renegotiation of the original contracts.”
Tarkin thought about it. “So you feel that a defeat in the Senate might make the Trade Federation more … pliable,
as it were.” Palpatine vouchsafed a thin smile. “Only those bills that
support well-reasoned regulation should win approval in the Senate.”
“Well put,” Tarkin said.
Palpatine waited for someone to point out that he had
offered nothing of substance, but no one did. Even Kim
failed to grasp that he was being undermined. Pax Teem was about to speak when a Gran messenger
intruded on the privacy canopy.
“Senator Kim, we are in receipt of an urgent
communiqué from Naboo.” While Kim was excusing himself, Palpatine dropped into
the Force. Conversation at the table grew faint, and the
physical forms of Pax Teem and the others became
indistinct—more like blurs of lambent energy. He kept
himself still as a disturbing echo reached him. By the time
an ashen Kim was returning to the table, Palpatine was
already out of his seat and hurrying to meet him.
“What is it? What’s happened?” Kim stared at him as if from another world. “They’re
dead. Everyone. My wife, my sons …” And he collapsed sobbing against Palpatine’s shoulder.
The funeral for the Kim family was everything it hadn’t been
for the Palpatines. In keeping with tradition, the bodies of
Kim’s wife, two sons, and the ship’s pilot and copilot had
been returned to Theed from the crash site in seaside Kaadara and cremated in the Funeral Temple. A
procession hundreds-strong led by King Tapalo and his
chief advisers proceeded on foot from the Temple to the
nearby Livet Tower, where everyone spent a moment
gathered around the Eternal Flame, contemplating
transience and the importance of living a harmonious life;
then moved in solemn precision to the banks of the Solleu River, where the grief-stricken Senator scattered the ashes
and wept openly as the current carried them over the Verdugo Plunge to the flatlands beyond.
Following the ceremony, mourners gathered to express
their condolences to Vidar Kim, who wore a robe of deep
green over a black tunic. When Palpatine’s turn came, the
two men embraced.
“I have only one hope for a family, Palpatine, one hope.” Kim’s eyes were red-rimmed and brimming with tears.
“Ronhar.” Palpatine compressed his lips in uncertainty. “He is a
Jedi Knight, Vidar. His family is the Order.” Kim was insistent. “I need him more than the Order
needs him. Only he can carry the Kim line forward—just as
you will someday carry on the Palpatine line.” Palpatine said nothing. With vehicular traffic banned from Theed’s narrow
streets, the city seemed almost as it had a decade earlier,
before antiquated laws had been repealed and wealth had worked its dubious magic; before Flash speeders and R2
astromech droids had become the rage, and fads and
fashions—in dress, transport, and food—had poured in
from the Core.
The murders of Cosinga and the others had left
Palpatine emancipated and wealthy. Though interrogated
by numerous officials, he had been absolved; his story, his
alibi, accepted. Some of the influential nobles had their
suspicions that Palpatine had furnished intelligence to Damask Holdings to secure the election of Bon Tapalo, but most Naboo had offered sympathy and support. On the
heels of Tapalo’s ascension to the throne, Palpatine had
sold the Lake Country estate and taken an apartment in
Theed, stocking it with extra-system art that had found its way to Naboo from Core and Mid Rim worlds. In the early
years of his apprenticeship to Darth Plagueis he had
remained in mandatory public service; he then spent five
years in the Apprentice Legislator program before being
appointed ambassador, following Tapalo’s reelection. Palpatine supposed he could have lobbied for a more
prestigious position, but only at the risk of undermining
Plagueis. Equally important, a high-status post might have
interfered with his ability to rendezvous with his Sith Master
on remote worlds, where they had been able to be
observed together without consequence. As he left Kim to the next mourner in line, he noticed Ars Veruna separating himself from a group that included
Palpatine’s allies Kinman Doriana and Janus Greejatus.
“A word, Ambassador,” Veruna said when he drew near. Palpatine allowed himself to be steered by the elbow into
an unoccupied viewing area near the Solleu Bridge.
“My heart goes out to poor Vidar,” Veruna began. Roughly the same height as Palpatine, he wore a brocaded
cloak and tall headpiece. “A starship crash, of all things.
One would have thought that a tragedy of such nature might
have compelled him to retire from politics, but that doesn’t
appear to be the case.” He rested his elbows on the stone
balustrade and gazed at the fast-moving river. “Well, you of
all people would know better than most the effect of such
unforeseen developments.”
“Vidar is planning to return to Coruscant before the month is out.”
“On Senate business?”
“Personal, I suspect.” Veruna grew pensive, then said, “The last time you and I
stood together was at the inaugural ceremony for the
plasma generator.” He turned to regard Palpatine. “You
look well. Changed, I think. From your travels.”
“Broadened,” Palpatine said.
“The very word I was searching for.” Veruna paused
briefly. “It has reached my ear that you made quite an
impression on Seswenna sector Senator Ranulph Tarkin when you were on Malastare recently.” Palpatine shrugged. “Iwasn’t aware.”
“He enjoyed hearing your views regarding the Trade
Federation’s plan to seat some of its client worlds in the Senate. Would you care to elaborate on what you told
him?” Palpatine smiled lightly. “I offered nothing substantive. In
fact, Iwas merely playing politics.” Veruna nodded knowingly. “I am greatly relieved to hear
that.” He glanced around before continuing. “As you well
know, the King and I have our separate arrangements with
the Trade Federation. Now, however, we’re forced to take
into account the discontent of our constituents. Unfortunately, the person largely responsible for Tapalo’s
election and our party’s continued popularity is not going to
take kindly to hearing that Naboo plans to vote against the
very legislation Damask Holdings has been lobbying to see
enacted.”
“I can appreciate your predicament,” Palpatine said.
“Why not order Senator Kim to vote in favor of the Trade
Federation?” Veruna laughed shortly. “Would that it were as simple as
that. The problem is that Kim knows about our separate
arrangements, and intends to use this opportunity to send a
message to the Trade Federation—as well as to Tapalo’s
detractors—that Naboo will no longer allow itself to be
exploited.” He inhaled deeply. “Recalling him from
Coruscant would be tantamount to admitting that Naboo
remains at the mercy of the Trade Federation, and might
jeopardize our standing with many of the trade worlds on whom we have come to depend.” Palpatine pretended to consider it. “Perhaps it will be worth the risk to vote against the Trade Federation.” Veruna studied him with sudden interest. “Go on.”
“Whether the legislation is enacted or becomes
embroiled in procedure, Naboo’s contracts with the Trade
Federation will remain binding and inalterable. The
Federation will continue procuring our plasma for meager
credits and marketing it for inflated prices. But Naboo will
at least be on the public record as having stood up to the
galactic conglomerates.”
“More playing politics, is that it?” Palpatine rocked his head from side to side but said
nothing.
“And what about Magister Damask?”
“Apprise him of the plan beforehand. He’s not
unreasonable.” Veruna stroked his beard in thought. “That just might work.” He smiled slyly. “It’s a pity Naboo already has a
voice in the Senate.” Palpatine sniffed. “Should the opportunity ever arise, I would, of course, accept. But until then, I’m content to serve
in my own way.”
“Serve Naboo.”
“Who or what else?” Veruna rubbed his hands together. “One day, if I have my way, our Space Corps will include a fleet of swift Nubian
fighters capable of chasing the Trade Federation from our
system.”
“I, too, foresee the day,” Palpatine said. Veruna laughed again. “Ah, but when? How long will we
have to wait, Palpatine?”
“Only until Hego Damask awards you the throne.”
15: QUANTUM BEING
A gift to Damask from the Council of Elders on the
occasion of Yinchorr’s seating in the Senate, the towering
reptilian condemned murderer shuffled to the center of the
energy field that defined his cage on Aborah and, with
confusion contorting the features of his beaked face,
prostrated himself on the permacrete floor and mumbled in Basic: “I’m honored to be here and to perform whatever
tasks you require of me.” Standing at the field’s shimmering perimeter, 11-4D
pivoted his head toward Plagueis. “Congratulations, Magister. At last he responds to your suggestion. You have
undermined his resolve.”
That resolve, Plagueis had learned after more than two
years of experimentation on the Yinchorri, was in fact a kind
of Force bubble fashioned by the turtle-like alien’s limited
number of unusually willful midi-chlorians. This suggested
that the Yinchorri was actually strong in the Force, despite
his pitifully low count. The discovery had come as a
breakthrough, and Plagueis was still grappling with the
implications.
The Force bubble itself was similar to those generated
by creatures that drew on the Force to avoid predation by
natural enemies. The relationship between the arboreal
ysalamir and its adversary, the vornskr, provided a curious
example, in that the latter was attracted to the former by the
very mechanism the ysalamir employed as a defense. Where an extremely low midi-chlorian count might have
bolstered the odds of survival, nature had instead made the
ysalimir species strong in the Force. So strong, in fact, that
several of the creatures acting in concert could create a
Force bubble encompassing kilometers rather than meters.
In a sense, the Jedi Order had done the same on a galactic
scale, Plagueis believed, by bathing the galaxy in the
energy of the light side of the Force; or more accurately by
fashioning a Force bubble that had prevented infiltration by
the dark side, until Tenebrous’s Master had succeeded in
bursting the bubble, or at least shrinking it. How the Order’s
actions could be thought of as balancing the Force had
baffled generations of Sith, who harbored no delusions
regarding the Force’s ability to self-regulate.
The Yinchorri former convict wasn’t the only new addition
to Plagueis’s island facility. In the eleven years that had
elapsed since the capture of Venamis and the recruitment
of Sidious, Plagueis had collected more than a dozen
beings of diverse species and had been subjecting them to
a wide range of experiments involving volition, telepathy,
healing, regeneration, and life extension, with some
promising results. As for the Bith would-be Sith Lord, he was alive and well, though kept comatose more often than
not, and always under the watchful photoreceptors of 11-4D
or a host of custodial droids. Plagueis hadn’t lost interest in Venamis by any means,
but the Yinchorri’s immunity to Force suggestion—an
immunity the species shared with Hutts, Toydarians, and
others—had provided him with a new line of investigation. Unlike ysalamiri, which created a Force bubble in the
presence of danger, the Yinchorri were in a perpetual state
of involuntary immunity to Force suggestion. The fact that
immunity was in a sense hardwired into them meant that
the ability was an adaptation, prompted by a past threat to
the survival of the species. To Plagueis, it meant that the Yinchorri’s midi-chlorians had evolved to provide protection
to a species that was naturally strong in the Force. If that were indeed the case, then the Yinchorri were living proof
that the Sith of the Bane line had been on the right path
from the very start.
For while toppling the Jedi Order and the Republic was
essential to the task of restoring order to the galaxy, that
goal belonged to the realm of the ordinary—to the world
that was nothing more than a byproduct of the eternal
struggle between the light and dark forces, both of which were beyond any concepts of good or evil. The greater goal
of the Sith involved toppling the Force itself, and becoming
the embodiment of the galaxy’s animating principle.
It had been theorized by Jedi and Sith alike that balance
between the light and dark sides was actually under the
guidance of a group of discorporate entities—the ones
called the Celestials, perhaps—who had merged
themselves with the Force thousands of generations
earlier, and had continued to guide the fate of the galaxy
ever since. In effect, a higher order of intermediaries, whose powers were beyond the understanding of mortal
beings. But many Sith viewed the notion with disdain, for
the theoretical existence of such a group had little bearing
on the goal of making the Force subservient to the will of an
enlightened elite. Only the Sith understood that sentient life was on the verge of a transformative leap; that through the manipulation of midi-chlorians—or the overthrow of the
Forceful group that supervised them—the divide between
organic life and the Force could be bridged, and death
could be erased from the continuum. As evidenced by those few Lords who had managed to
perpetuate their spirits after physical death—foremost
among them Emperor Vitiate, who was said to have lived a
thousand years—the ancient Sith had come halfway across
that bridge. But those few had been so focused on worldly
power that they had ended up trapping themselves
between realms. That they had never provided the Order with guidance from beyond attested to the fact that their
influence had been negligible, and had long since faded
from the world.
In the same way that the pre-Bane Sith had been
responsible for their own extinction, the great dark side
Lords of the past had doomed themselves to the nether
realm through their attempts to conquer death by feeding
off the energies of others, rather than by tapping the
deepest strata of the Force and learning to speak the
language of the midi-chlorians. Plagueis was finally
learning to do that, and was just beginning to learn how to
persuade, prompt, cajole, and coax them into action. Already he could command them to promote healing, and
now he had been successful in enticing them to lower their
defenses. If he could compel a murderous Yinchorri to
become peaceful, could he—with a mere suggestion—
accomplish the opposite by turning a peaceful being into a murderer? Would he one day be able to influence the
leaders of worlds and systems to act according to his
designs, however iniquitous? Would he one day conquer
not only death but life, as well, by manipulating midi-
chlorians to produce Forceful beings, even in the absence
of fertilization, as Darth Tenebrous might have attempted to
do with gene-splicing techniques and computers?
Perhaps. But not until the singular flame of the light side was
extinguished from the galaxy. Not until the Jedi Order was
stamped out.
From the start of his apprenticeship with Plagueis, his Master had demanded to know what Palpatine regarded
as his greatest strength, so that he would know how best to
undermine him; to know his greatest fear, so that Plagueis would know which to force Palpatine to face; to know what
Palpatine cherished most, so that Plagueis could take that
from him; and to know the things that Palpatine craved, so
that Plagueis could deny him. Some combination of the strictures—or perhaps
recognition on Plagueis’s part for his apprentice’s
unabated craving to visit Sith worlds—had landed
Palpatine on scenic Dathomir. Sparsely populated and
largely unexplored, Dathomir wasn’t Korriban or Ziost, but it was powerful in the Force, in part because of its fecundity,
but mainly due to the presence of groups of female adepts who practiced dark side magicks. He was meandering without clear purpose through one of
Blue Desert City’s dustier quarters, far from the city center, when he became aware of a faint pulse of Force energy,
the origin of which was indistinct but close at hand. Calling more deeply on the Force, he allowed himself to
be drawn toward the mysterious source, as if he were a
starship surrendering to the embrace of a tractor beam. A
tortuous series of turns delivered him into a market area
brimming with knockoff goods, ersatz jewelry, and bits and
pieces of junk that had found its way to Dathomir from who
knew where, and ultimately to a small square amid the
hustle and bustle, on one corner of which stood a human
female, whose symmetrically blemished face was the color
of burnished durasteel, and whose flamboyant clothing
identified her as a visitor to the city, likely from some
remote village on the planet’s far side. The hood of her
crimson robe was raised, and from one shoulder hung a
soft bag the size of a small suitcase. Palpatine moved to the square’s diagonal corner to
observe her. She was eyeing individuals in the passing
crowd, not as if searching for someone in particular, but with a gaze more in keeping with target acquisition. She
didn’t strike Palpatine as a thief or pickpocket, though she
did exude a dark energy informed by equal measures of
urgency and deceit. Abruptly he made himself discernible
in the Force, and immediately she turned her head in his
direction and began to hurry across the square in his
direction.
“Good sir,” she said in Basic as she drew near.
Feigning interest in the cheap wares of an itinerant
trader, he pretended to be taken by surprise when she
approached him from his blind side.
“Are you addressing me?” he asked, turning to her.
“I am, sir, if you’ve a moment to indulge a being in need.” Her oblique eyes were rimmed by dark blemishes that matched the tint of her thick lips; poking from the wide
sleeves of her robe, the tapered fingers of her hands bore
long, talon-like nails. Palpatine pretended impatience. “Why single me out,
among this crowd of more richly attired beings?”
“Because you’ve the look and bearing of a man of
intelligence and influence.” She gestured broadly. “The rest
are rabble, despite their fine cloaks and headwear.” He made a decorous show of suppressing a yawn.
“Save your adulation for the rubes, woman. But since
you’ve correctly identified me as better than the rest, you’re
obviously aware that I’ve no time to waste on confidence
games or tricks. So if its mere credits you’re after, I
suggest you widen your search for someone more
charitable.”
“I don’t ask for credits,” she said, studying him openly.
“What then? Come to the point.”
“It’s a gift I offer.” Palpatine laughed without merriment. “What could you
possibly have to offer someone like me?”
“Just this.” She opened the soft shoulder bag to reveal a
humanoid infant of less than a standard year in age. The
infant’s hairless head was stippled with an array of short but
still pliant horns, and its entire body had been garishly and
ceremonially tattooed in red and black pigments. A male Zabrak, Palpatine told himself. But not of the
Iridonian sort; rather, a Dathomirian. “How do you come by
this newborn? Have you stolen him?”
“You misunderstand, good sir. My own child, this one is.” Palpatine glowered. “You say that he is a gift, and yet you
dissemble. Have you had dealings that have led you into
such deep debt that you would part with your own flesh and
blood? Or perhaps you’re addicted to spice or some other
intoxicant?” She stiffened. “Neither. I seek only to save his life.” Palpatine’s expression changed. “Then speak honestly. You’re a long way from your coven, Nightsister. And a
practitioner of magicks more than sufficient to keep your
child from harm.” Her eyes opened wide and bored into him, in search of
explanation. “How—”
“Never mind how I know, Witch,” Palpatine said sharply.
“The child, whether yours or not, is a Nightbrother,
conceived for the purpose of serving the sisterhood as a warrior and slave.” She refused to avert her gaze. “You’re not a Jedi.”
“Clearly I am not, as I suspect you have already intuited. But you still haven’t answered my question. Why are trying
to rid yourself of the infant?”
“To spare the one for the sake of the other,” she said
after a moment. “Half a clan pair, this one is.And Iwant one
to live freely, since the other can’t.”
“Who poses the threat?”
“Talzin is her name.”
“Who is Talzin?”
“The Nightsister Mother.” Palpatine filed the information away. “Where is the
infant’s father?”
“Dead—by tradition.” He snorted. “Will the infant not be missed?”
“Talzin knows only of the one, not the other.”
“You delude yourself.” Gently, she pushed the shoulder bag toward him. “Then
take him. Please.”
“What would I do with him?”
“This one is strong in the Force. In the right hands, he can
become a powerful asset.”
“Servitude of a different sort.” She ignored the remark. “Take him. Save him.” Palpatine regarded the newborn again. “Have you
named him?”
“Maul, he is called.”
“Befitting the power you divine in him.” She nodded. “Take him.” Palpatine gazed at her and, motioning with his right
hand, said, “You will forget this encounter.” She locked eyes with him. “Iwill try.”
“For your own sake, I hope you do. Now, go. Before I
change my mind.” Placing the bag in his hands, she turned and hurried off,
disappearing into the crowd. Palpatine studied the bundle of life he held. That the
Force was strong in the infant was reason enough not to
allow him to wander about unprotected, and perhaps fall
into the hands of the Jedi. Now Palpatine simply had to figure out what to do with
him.
From a high turret in the old fort on Sojourn, Plagueis and
Sidious observed the revelry in the courtyard below. There,
amid the blazing fires, the smell of fresh blood and roasting meat, the cacophony of guttural chants, strident music, and
screams of abandon, a Gathering was in progress. Returned from the hunts, beings of many species told tall
tales and shared in vulgar laughter, while exotic dancers writhed atop tables laden with food and intoxicating drinks. Away from the roasting pits, beings huddled in the sultry
night air, forming alliances, revealing hidden agendas,
hatching plots. Passion, envy, and conspiracy were on the
loose. From the high turret, the two Sith could see Damask’s Sun Guards and Muuns circulating, Larsh Hill
introducing his eldest son, San, to representatives of the Commerce Guild and the Techno Union. The Gotal Grand
Mage of the Order of the Canted Circle was speaking with
starship designer and Santhe/Seinar CEO Narro Sienar. Boss Cabra was making the rounds, as well, pressing the
flesh, the scales, the rough hide of partners and potential
allies. Members of the Trade Federation were in
attendance, including a richly dressed Neimoidian. And for
the first time in decades, representatives of various hive
species were present—the Xi Charrian prelate, the Geonosian Archduke, even a couple of mistrustful and
dangerous-looking insectoid Colicoids, from the Colicoid
Creation Nest.
“We will not be denied,” Plagueis was saying with
unusual annoyance. “We will have our way in the Senate,
regardless of what the Gran Protectorate, Black Sun, and
the rest wish to see happen. Let the beings of the Hydian Way and Rimma Trade Route worlds go on thinking that the
Trade Federation is seeking to tighten its grip on
intersystem commerce. The real danger in seating the
Federation’s client worlds will emerge when the Senate
ignores the needs of those worlds, and disenfranchisement
begins to spread through the Mid and Outer Rims. Then the Republic will reap the whirlwind, and we will harvest the
benefits.” He exhaled in disgust. “Pax Teem and the rest aren’t
acting out of concern for the Republic but out of fear that
their entitlements might disappear if trade shifts to the outer
systems. Half of them sit in the Rotunda only because I want them there. They’ve forgotten how effortlessly they can
be replaced.” He swung away from the view of the
courtyard to face Sidious. “As for Veruna, you should
encourage his plans to amass a Space Corps to defend
Naboo against the Trade Federation. When we make him
King, we will lead him by the nose into a morass that will
appear to be of his own making.” Plagueis lowered his gaze to the courtyard. “The climate
begins to shift, Darth Sidious. The body politic begins to
show signs of contagion. The reemergence of anger,
hatred, and fear signal a loss of faith in the Force. The light
is waning, pushed into retreat by dark matter, and the
universe begins to seem inimical rather than comforting. In
such times, beings are wont to look for solutions in the
enactment of harsh laws, the ostracism of strangers, and warfare. Once the Republic has fallen, the Jedi are but a memory, and beings have nowhere to turn but to us, we will
provide them with a sense of stability and order: a list of
enemies, weapons capable of decimating entire star
systems, durasteel prisons in which they can feel secure.” He gestured to the courtyard. “Look how they hunger for the
dark.” A fierce light came into Plagueis’s eyes. “We must
demand the attention of the dark side to aid us in dictating
the future. Together and separately we will see to that, and
once we’ve put these Senate issues behind us, we will set
the stage for the next act. With the promise of unlimited
funding, guilds and unions will ally, and the hive species will
turn pincer and claw to the manufacture of weapons, even
in the absence of conflict, let alone all-out war.” Doubt tugged at the corners of Sidious’s mouth. “The
Jedi won’t simply stand by and do nothing, Master. While I
have no affection for them, I do respect their power. And weakening the Republic without weakening the Jedi could
provide them with justification for attempting a coup. They
have the numbers to succeed.” Plagueis took it under advisement. “Their time is coming, Sidious. The signs are in the air. Their Order might have
already been decimated had it not been for the setback
Darth Gravid dealt the Sith. But his apprentice carried the
imperative forward, and each successive Sith Lord
improved on it, Tenebrous and his Master most of all,
though they wasted years attempting to create a targeted
virus that could be deployed against the Jedi, separating
them from the Force. As if there were some organic
difference between the practitioners of the light and darks
sides; as if we communicate with the dark side through a
different species of cellular intermediaries! When, in fact, we are animated by the same power that drives the
passion of these beings gathered below. Target midichlorians and we target life itself.”
“An attack of that sort would fail, regardless,” Sidious
said, as if thinking out loud. “The Jedi are widely scattered,
and it’s unlikely that we would be able to act quickly enough
to kill all of them in the same instant. We would need to
assign an individual assassin to each, and there would be
no way to still the tongues of that many assassins. Our plan would be revealed. We would be betrayed and become the
targeted ones.” Plagueis paced away from the turret’s window, his hands
interlocked behind his back. “We don’t want them to die too
quickly in any case. Not, that is, until the Republic has been
so ravaged, so weakened, that beings will willingly
embrace the stability we impose.”
“Are the weapons that will be produced by the Colicoids
and the others meant ultimately to be used against the
Jedi?”
“We shall see what comes to pass. Until such time we must accept the fact that no mere army can overwhelm the
Jedi. The ancient Sith were tens of thousands strong and
failed the test. Once the galaxy teemed with warriors and warships. Now we have only isolated bands of mercenaries
and star system defense forces. That’s why we must strive
to return the galaxy to a state where barbarism is the norm.”
“The Jedi will have to be felled from within,” Sidious said,
his eyes tracking Plagueis as the Muun paced the floor.
“Lured into a trap of their own devising, as you said we will
do with Veruna.” Plagueis stopped to regard him. “Follow that thought.” Sidious took a moment. “We will have to exploit their
vanity and blind obedience to the Republic,” he said with
greater confidence, and as if the truth of it should be
obvious. “They must be made to appear the enemies of
peace and justice rather than the guardians.”
“The enemies of peace and justice rather than the
guardians,” Plagueis repeated, in revelation. “Even the
survivors of a purge would be forced into hiding …” Coming
back to himself, he cut his gaze to Sidious. “Great care has
to be taken not to turn them into martyrs, Darth Sidious—if
in the end we want the beings of the galaxy to turn their
backs to the light side of the Force.”
“Forceful beings will continue to be born.”
“In the absence of training and brainwashing, they will
pose no harm to us. You will see to that, Supreme Chancellor Palpatine.” Sidious looked at the floor and shook his head. “You
should be the one, Master.”
“No,” Plagueis said firmly. “It must be you. You have the
political skills, and more to the point, you are a human. In
this era only a human is capable of rising to the top of
Coruscant’s biased political heap.”
“Human or not, my knowledge of the dark side will never
equal yours. The title, the crown, should be yours.”
“And it will be, once you openly appoint me cochancellor. Feared and respected by the galaxy’s most
powerful beings, Hego Damask will be seen as a windfall
for the Republic. But even then I will advise only in secret
from behind your throne.” Sidious bowed his head in deference. “In the annals of
Sith history, you will be known as Plagueis the Wise.” Plagueis quirked a cunning smile. “You flatter me.”
“Whatever you ask of me, Master, Iwill do it.” Plagueis fell silent for a long moment, then said, “You
need now to hear about the first mission I performed for Darth Tenebrous. The events transpired some twenty-five
years into my apprenticeship. At the time, Tenebrous had
sought to expand his network of influential beings by
reaching out to a human industrialist named Kerred Santhe —”
“The former owner of Santhe Corporation.”
“The same,” Plagueis said. “Santhe Corporation had
been designing freight vessels for generations, but had only
limited success with its line of personal starships. My
Master believed that he might entice Kerred into an alliance
by offering him exclusive rights to a Rugess Nome ship. Santhe leapt at the opportunity, but only to manipulate
Tenebrous into a situation where agents of Santhe Security were able to steal the plans.” Plagueis paused in narrow-eyed reflection. “It was one of
the few times I saw my Master outmaneuvered. But he
didn’t set his sights on revenge—not immediately, at any
rate. Once in production, the starship met with such
success that Kerred Santhe was able to acquire a
controlling interest in Sienar Technologies and Republic Sienar Systems. Only by agreeing to an arranged marriage
between his youngest daughter was Sienar’s president, Narro, able to retain his position as chief designer. By then,
though, Narro had entered into a secret partnership with
Tenebrous, and the time had come to settle scores.” Plagueis moved as he spoke.
“Damask Holdings was in its infancy, but I had already
earned a reputation among the galaxy’s elite, and so
received an invitation to attend a design conference on Corulag, which was then headquarters not only for Sienar
Technologies but for Aether Hypernautics, Danthe Artifice,
and a dozen other corporations. The guest speaker was
the Senator representing the Bormea sector, and many
luminaries from Coruscant, Corellia, and Kuat attended.
From distant Lianna came Kerred Santhe and his young
and unhappy wife, supported by an entourage of retainers
and Santhe Security guards. Iwas seated at a table directly
across from him, and the menu specialty that night was
bloateel. Have you ever tasted it, Sidious?”
“As a teenager. At a gala hosted by House Palpatine.”
“Then you know that the creature is one of the most
poisonous to be found in the galaxy. The preparation is
both dangerous and exacting, as the creature must be
skinned while alive to guard against its toxins infiltrating the
flesh. Needless to say, nothing enlivens a banquet like the
prospect of near-instant death, and the hall could barely
contain the anticipation as individual portions were served.
“Iwaited to act until I saw Santhe chewing his first bite.” Plagueis brought the thumb and forefinger of his left hand
close together, and Sidious, taken by surprise, felt his
throat close. He gasped for breath.
“Yes. Just so you have an understanding of what Santhe must have felt.” Plagueis opened his fingers and Sidious
inhaled deeply, his face flushed and his hands stroking his
throat.
“Only then I kept the pressure on until his face began to
turn red, his hands flew to his throat, his muted calls for help
brought everyone around him out of their chairs. I think his
bulging eyes might have found mine when I finally pinched
his trachea closed completely. Of course, medtechs had
been standing by in the event of just such an emergency—
Ithorians, if I recall correctly, armed with doses of antitoxin
and medicines to counter the effects of anaphylactic shock. But none did the trick that night, for the dark side of the
Force had Santhe in its grip and no drug or resuscitation
technique was equal to the task of keeping him alive.” Plagueis touched his chin. “Many alleged that Rugess Nome and Narro Sienar had somehow engineered an
assassination. Others, that Malkite Poisoners or a sect of
the GenoHaradan had been contracted to carry out the kill. But in the end the chefs were held accountable, and given
long prison sentences. Santhe Security squads made
several attempts on my Master’s life afterward, but we dealt
with them. Much later we learned that Santhe’s body had
been placed in carbonite freeze, and that all his internal
organs had been replaced by vat-grown ones. The surgical
teams may even have been successful at restarting his
body, but the Kerred Santhe they had known was
irretrievable.” Plagueis said nothing for a long moment, then continued:
“The circumstances will be different for you. You won’t have
the satisfaction of seeing our opponent die in person,
because we want to ensure your deniability. A public
assassination on Coruscant would be best for sending a message.”
“Senator Pax Teem,” Sidious said in a raspy voice,
tinged with residual anger. Plagueis shook his head. “Teem may yet prove useful.
I’m referring to Senator Vidar Kim. His sentiments have made him a liability. More important, his death will allow us
to position you where you’ve long yearned to be.”
16: BOLD AS LOVE
The hood of his stylish robe raised against a chill wind, Palpatine hurried through the streets of Theed. The sudden
turn in the weather abetted his desire to avoid making eye
contact with strangers or, worse, encountering anyone he
knew. As he grew stronger in the dark side, the profane world became a stranger and stranger place, swept by
currents he’d had no previous awareness of and populated
by vaguely outlined life-forms he saw as magnitudes of the
Force. As Plagueis ordered, he had been living in the
future, consorting with the dark side to execute the plans he
and his Master had designed. Vidar Kim’s office was in the eastern portion of the city, a
long walk from the apartment Palpatine had been renting
for the past several years, and the quickest route required
crossing and recrossing the Solleu tributaries that defined
Theed’s districts and neighborhoods. He had never had much fondness for the city, with its ancient buildings, public
squares, its tens of thousands of residents going about
their lives, and now Theed began to seem like some stage
set in an elaborate theater production, and Naboo itself a
node in a vast web being woven by the dark side, into which so many planets and species would ultimately be
drawn. At no time during the visit to Sojourn had Darth Plagueis
asked to hear his feelings about the death order he had
issued for Vidar Kim. And no wonder, since Palpatine had
given his word to do anything Plagueis asked of him. But it was obvious that the Muun had sensed Palpatine’s conflict.
Fear and hatred had prompted him to murder his family in
cold blood, but his relationship with Kim was as close as he
had come to having a true friendship—even though, as Naboo’s Senator, Kim stood between Palpatine and his
immediate goal. On Sojourn, Plagueis’s parting words to
him were: Remember why the Sith are more powerful than
the Jedi, Sidious: because we are not afraid to feel. We
embrace the spectrum of emotions, from the heights of
transcendent joy to the depths of hatred and despair.
Fearless, we welcome whatever paths the dark side sets
us on, and whatever destiny it lays out for us. Clearly Plagueis knew that Palpatine had helped seal
Kim’s fate by encouraging him to take a stand against the
Trade Federation, and therefore against Plagueis. That his Master hadn’t said as much was perhaps his way of
reminding Palpatine that he would have to be prepared to
accept any and all consequences that sprang from his machinations. It was a subtle lesson, but one Palpatine
took to heart. From then on, he would be careful to plan his moves meticulously; and more important, to allow the dark
side to complete its lapidary work of transforming him into
a powerful being. Recalling Plagueis’s surprise Force
choke, he pledged also never again to lower his guard. But
he viewed the lesson as part of the process of their learning
to rely on each other and forge themselves into a team. United in the dark side, they could keep no secrets; there
could be no chance of one being able to act without the
other being aware. They had to learn to see through each
other. Palpatine hadn’t been attempting to flatter Plagueis when
he had called him wise—not entirely, at any rate. The Muun was powerful beyond Palpatine’s present understanding.
The only being capable of guiding the galaxy into the future. A crescendo. At times it was difficult to grasp that they would see in their lifetime the fall of the Republic and the
annihilation of the Jedi Order, and yet Palpatine seemed to
know it to be true. A grand design was unfolding, in which
he wasn’t merely a player but an architect. Resigning himself to Kim’s death was easier than it might have been because Kim, too, had become a broken man in the wake of the deaths of his wife and younger sons. His reaching out to the son he had voluntarily surrendered
to the Jedi was an act of desperation—and based on
nothing more than a desire to assure that the Kim family
line continued. How like the self-important royals among whom Palpatine had been raised. So fervent to be
remembered by those who followed!
Rather than demand or ensure that Palpatine get his
hands dirty once more, Plagueis had insisted on providing
him with an agent to facilitate the assassination. Plagueis
had said that they needed to guarantee Palpatine’s
deniability and make certain that no hint of scandal pursue
him. But Palpatine had begun to wonder: Despite all the
talks about partnership and disclosures, had Plagueis merely been making excuses for the fact that he harbored
doubts about Palpatine’s abilities?
Palpatine thought back to the story Plagueis had
recounted about the murder of Kerred Santhe. Blame had
fallen on the chefs who had prepared the bloateel. Kim’s
death, however, wouldn’t result from food poisoning but
public assassination. So who might emerge as having the most to gain from his death? Certainly not the Naboo, or
the Gran Protectorate. The fact that fingers would point
instead to the Trade Federation made him wonder why
Plagueis would want to place the cartel in a position that
jeopardized its chances of seating new worlds in the Senate. So once more he found himself wondering: Did
Plagueis have an ulterior motive for not wanting the Trade
Federation to succeed?
He wanted Kim’s death to be viewed as a message. But
by whom? Perhaps Palpatine was meant to be the
recipient. When Plagueis said that many of the Senators were expendable, that they retained their seats only
because of him, was he, in the same breath, saying that
Palpatine, even as Sidious, was also expendable, easily
replaced by another Forceful apprentice? While the Muun
encouraged transparency in Palpatine, he sometimes made himself opaque. Would he at some point bequeath
all his knowledge to his apprentice, or would he hold back, merely to keep the upper hand?
“Thank you for coming on such short notice, Palpatine,” Kim
said in a rush, ushering him into an office cluttered with
data disks and flimsi printouts, and smelling of sweat, stale
air, spoiling food. Tall windows opposite the hardwood
entry doors overlooked the palace, including the new tower
that Tapalo—in accordance with tradition—had constructed
on being elected monarch.
“What I have to say will place you at some risk, but
there’s no one I trust more than you.” Kim was in constant
motion while he spoke, moving from his desk to the windows and back again. “I’m not entirely sure that this
office is secure, but we have to take the chance.” Palpatine concealed a frown of misgiving and gestured
to the couch. “Please, Vidar, sit and unburden yourself.” Kim came to a halt, exhaled wearily, and did as Palpatine suggested. His face was drawn, his hair in
disarray, his normally neat beard and mustache in need of
grooming.
“Palpatine, I have good reason to suspect that Tapalo
and Veruna arranged the crash that claimed the lives of my
family.” Palpatine’s surprise was sincere. “Vidar, the crash was
investigated and ruled an accident. Some problem with the
antigrav—”
“Accidents can be faked—planned! You’ve piloted
speeders ever since I’ve known you. You know that systems
can be sabotaged.” Palpatine sat down opposite him. “What possible motive would they have for killing your family?” Kim’s bloodshot eyes fixed on him. “I know their dirty
secrets, Palpatine. I know about the payments they’ve been
receiving from the Trade Federation since Tapalo took
office. The laws they’ve enacted to open all of Naboo to
survey and plasma exploitation. I know about the deals they
struck with certain members of the electorate to engineer
Tapalo’s unprecedented victory in the last election.”
“Even so,” Palpatine said after a moment, “why would
they bring your family into this?” Kim all but growled. “By relieving me of my plenary duties
they risk angering many of the royals who support me.
Instead they hope to persuade me to tender a resignation —out of grief, out of fear, out of I don’t know what.”
“Tapalo would know better than to attempt such a
despicable act.”
“You give him too much credit. The crash was meant to
be a message to me. But it had the opposite effect.”
“How so?” Palpatine said, leaning toward him.
“I’m leaving for Coruscant this afternoon. And my first act will be to notify the Jedi Order.” Palpatine sat up straight. “Vidar, the Jedi listen only to
the Senate and the Supreme Chancellor. You can’t simply
walk into the Temple—”
“I’ll contact the members of the Council through my son. If
I can convince Ronhar to leave the Order, the information will be my gift to the Jedi.”
“And suppose Ronhar doesn’t want any part of this.” Palpatine crossed his arms across his chest. “Have you
even been able to speak with him? It’s my understanding
that Jedi aren’t permitted contact with their parents.” Kim scowled and studied the carpet. “Regardless, I was
able to make contact.”
“And?” Kim’s expression was cheerless when he looked up. “He
told me that I’m a stranger to him, and that the Kim name
has no significance for him.” Palpatine sighed. “Then that’s the end of it.”
“No. He has agreed to speak with me in person on Coruscant. I’m determined to convince him, Palpatine.
Family must come first.” Palpatine bit back what he was about to say and began
again. “Will you promise to keep me informed? Or at least
let me know how to reach you?” Kim went to the desk and sorted through the mess until
he found the flimsi he was looking for. “This is my itinerary
for the coming week,” he said, passing the flimsi to Palpatine. “Palpatine, if something untoward should
happen to me on Coruscant …”
“Stop, Vidar. We’re getting way ahead of ourselves.” Kim ran a hand over his head. “You’re right.” He returned
to the couch and sat. “Palpatine, we’re too close in age for me to have thought of you as a son, but I do consider you
the younger brother I never had.” Palpatine nodded without a word.
“If I fail to get through to Ronhar or the Jedi, I can at least
alert my colleagues on the Senate Investigatory
Committee.” Palpatine restrained an impulse to stand. “I think you’re wrong about Tapalo and Veruna, Vidar. But I can say without hesitation that you will be risking your life by making
such accusations public.”
“I’m perfectly aware of that, Palpatine. But if Ronhar
rejects my plea, what else will I have to live for?” Palpatine placed his hand on Kim’s shoulder.
The small part you will play in the revenge of the Sith.
* * *
By the time he left Kim’s office the weather had turned
sharply colder. Snow flurries were swirling around the
palace towers, and the shallows to the Solleu tributaries were sheened with ice. The agent from Coruscant whom
Plagueis had provided—Sate Pestage—was waiting in a
small plaza behind the Parnelli Art Museum, warming his
hands with his breath.
“The Naboo have never heard of climate control?” he
commented as Palpatine approached. Recalling his early conditioning sessions on glacial
Mygeeto, Palpatine almost laughed at the man’s remarks.
Instead he said, “Radical change has always come slowly
to this world.” Pestage cast a glance at the stately columns that
enclosed the domed museum. “No doubt about that.” Slightly taller and older than Palpatine, he was sinewy
and capable looking. His brown eyes were close-set and
glistening, and his pointed nose and angular cheekbones were emphasized by black hair that had receded from his
forehead and temple. Plagueis had mentioned that
Pestage had been born in Daplona on Ciutric IV—an
industrialized ecumenopolis outside of which Darths Bane
and Zannah had once lived secret lives. Plagueis hadn’t
revealed how he had discovered Pestage—perhaps Damask Holdings had had dealings with Pestage’s
influential and extensive family—but he had said that
Pestage was someone Palpatine might want to consider
adding to his growing entourage of aides and confidants.
From the pocket of his robe, Palpatine prized the flimsi
Vidar Kim had given him and handed it over. “His itinerary
for Coruscant.”
“Perfect.” Pestage slipped the flimsi into his pocket.
“I want you to wait until his business on Coruscant is
concluded.”
“Whatever you say.”
“He’s threatening to alert the Jedi Order and the Senate
Investigatory Committee about various deals that were made.”
Pestage snorted. “Then he deserves everything that’s
coming to him.” He scanned their surroundings without moving his head. “Have you made a decision about who to
use from the data I supplied?”
“The Maladians,” Palpatine said. A group of highly trained humanoid assassins, they had
struck him as the obvious choice. Pestage nodded. “Can I ask why?” Palpatine wasn’t accustomed to having to justify his
decisions, but answered regardless. “The Mandalorian Death Watch has its own problems, and the Bando Gora its
own galactic agenda.”
“I couldn’t agree more,” Pestage said. “Besides, the Maladians are known to honor all their contracts.”
“How soon can you have them on Coruscant?” Pestage looked at him askance. “Perhaps it’s best that
that remains on a need-to-know basis.”
The man’s audacity both impressed and bridled
Palpatine. “There can be no mistakes, Sate.” A long-suffering look flared on Pestage’s face, but his
tone was compliant when he responded. “If there are, then
I’m certain this will be our final conversation. I know fully well what Magister Damask and you are capable of, and I hope
to make myself worthy of continuing to serve you. One day,
perhaps, you’ll begin to think of me as family, as I’m sure Senator Kim does you.”
Just how much does this man know? Palpatine wondered.
“You’ve no qualms about living a double life, Sate?”
“Some of us are simply born into it,” Pestage said,
indifferent to Palpatine’s penetrating gaze.
“You’ll contact me here?”
“As soon as the work is completed. Just make sure to
stay close to your comm.”
“You’ll also be contacting Magister Damask?” Pestage rocked his head. “He gave me the impression
that he would be unavailable for the next few weeks. But I
suspect we’re safe in assuming that the results won’t
escape his notice.”
On a planet at the edge of known space, above the holo-
well of a gleaming metallic table, a quarter-sized threedimensional image of a tall biped rotated between graphs
and scrolling lines of anatomical and physiological data. In
a spoon-like seat suspended from the white room’s
towering ceiling sat Hego Damask, dwarfed by a trio of
slender, tailed scientists—two crested males and a female whose complexion was more gray than white.
“This being is representative of the entire species?” the
scientist called Ni Timor asked in a gentle, almost
sussurant voice.
“This one murdered six members of his species,” Damask said, “but he is otherwise typical of the Yinchorri.”
Tenebrous had introduced him to the planet Kamino
early on in his apprenticeship, but he hadn’t visited in more
than three years. In stocking Sojourn’s greel forests with
rare and in some cases extinct fauna, he had hired the Kaminoans to grow clones from biological samples he
procured through brokers of genetic materials. The glassy
eyes, long necks, and sleek bodies of the bipedal
indigenes spoke to a marine past, though in fact they had
been land dwellers for millions of years preceding a great
flood that had inundated Kamino. With global catastrophe
looming, most technologically advanced sentient species would have abandoned their homeworld and reached for
the stars. But the Kaminoans had instead constructed massive stilt cities that were completed even while the
oceans of their world were rising and submerging the
continents. They had also turned their considerable intellect
to the science of cloning as a means of ensuring the
survival of their species, and along the way had taken
genetic replication farther than any known species in the
galaxy. Residing outside the galactic rim, the Kaminoans
performed their work in secret and only for the very wealthy.
It was unlikely, in any case, that they would have abided by
the Republic’s restrictions on cloning. Moral principles
regarding natural selection seemed to be something they
had left on the floor of what was now Kamino’s planetwide
ocean, which perhaps explained why they were no more
reluctant about providing game animals for Sojourn than
they were about supplying shovel-handed clones to work in
the mines of inhospitable Subterrel. Damask considered them to be one of the galaxy’s most
progressive species: almost Sith-like in their emotional
aloofness and scientific objectivity.
The female scientist, Ko Sai, had highlighted an area of
the Yinchorri’s midbrain. “The lack of neural pathways to the
forebrain indicates an innate proclivity for violence. Although the absence could be idiosyncratic.”
The third Kaminoan, Lac Nor, called for an enhancement
of the highlighted area. “The Yinchorri’s violent nature could
complicate matters, Magister. Without access to
sociological studies, we have no means of determining to what degree the culture of violence shapes the beings born
into it. A clone raised in a laboratory setting might exhibit
feral behavior unless provided with some means to express
aggression.”
“An outlet,” Ko Sai offered.
“Scientific studies are available,” Damask said. “The
question is, can compliance be bred into them without
affecting their violent tendencies?”
“Probably not without disturbing the basic personality matrix,” Ko Sai said. “We might produce a clone that is merely Yinchorri in aspect, but lacks the signature
characteristics of the species.” Damask frowned. “That won’t do.”
“Have you considered using a more acquiescent
species?” Ni Timor asked
“Which would you recommend?
“One of the placid species. Ithorians, for example. Or Caamasi.” Damask shook his head. “Neither species would suit my
purposes. What about humans?”
“Our experience with humans is limited—though of
course we have grown many replacement organs.”
“Human emotionalism is somewhat problematic,” Ko Sai
added, “but not unsolvable.” Damask considered the comment, and then agreed with
the Kaminoan’s assessment. Emotion in human beings was a fatal flaw. The same
characteristic that fueled their need to form strong bonds
and believe that all life was sacred made them
compassionate to a fault. Only weeks earlier on Sojourn, he
realized that even Sidious, for all his growing strength in the
dark side, remained a prisoner of his emotions. That
Sidious was feeling an urge to stretch out with his new
powers was to be expected and encouraged, but he had to
be taught the lesson every Sith needed to learn. With great
subtlety Sidious had manipulated Vidar Kim into a position where he had become a liability, and therefore had to die. He hadn’t bothered to address the issue directly because
the time had come for Sidious to embark on the political
career that would carry him to the chancellorship. Still, Sidious’s reaction to the assassination orders—fleeting as
it had been—had convinced Plagueis of the need for
additional tests. Sidious didn’t need to have his mistakes
explained to him; he needed to experience the
consequences.
“Perhaps, Magister,” Lac Nor was saying, “if we
understood your plans for the Yinchorri clones.”
“Iwould expect them to serve as soldiers.”
“Ah,” Ni Timor said. “Then obedience, not mere
compliance, must be a prime consideration.”
“And yet the need for some measure of free will,” Ko Sai was quick to point out. “Or else why not simply use combat
automata?”
Lac Nor’s large eyes fixed on Damask. “These Yinchorri
appear to be ready-made for war, Magister. Are there so
few of them in the galaxy that you need to clone an army?” He had deliberately avoided mentioning Yinchorri
immunity to Force suggestion because he should have no way of knowing about that, or indeed anything about the
actions of midi-chlorians. But it was precisely the reptilians’
capability to fashion Force bubbles that he hoped to
explore.
“As you’ve already pointed out,” he said after a moment,
“their innate bellicosity interferes with their ability to follow
orders.” Mostly to himself, Ni Timor said, “We would need to
assure that their violent tendencies remained intact, while
their behavior was less willful.”
“Yes,” Damask said. Ko Sai craned her long neck. “Very challenging. Though
perhaps if we could be supplied with a template for
experimentation …” She gestured toward the 3-D images.
“Is this specimen available for thorough evaluation?”
“I could have him delivered to Kamino,” Damask said.
“Assuming for the moment that you can discover some way
to provide me with what I need, how much time would be
required to grow a mature clone?”
The three scientists traded looks.
“In the case of the Yinchorri,” Ni Timor said at last,
“certainly no fewer than twelve standard years, to allow for
both physical and mental development. As you know we
have had some success in accelerating the growth rate of
certain cloned creatures, but not yet with full sentients,
owing to the plasticity of the youthful brain.”
“More important,” Lac Nor said, “while we might be able
to grow a few clones, our facilities are at present
inadequate to produce an army of any size.”
“We would also need to consult with military specialists
regarding programming,” Ko Sai added.
“That can all be arranged,” Damask said. “Would you
have any objections to working with Rothana Heavy
Engineering?”
“Of course not,” Ni Timor said.
“Then Damask Holdings can provide whatever funding
you need.” Ko Sai’s eyes appeared to widen. “The Prime Minister will be very pleased to learn of this,” she said with what
passed for animation on Kamino.
In his apartment in snowbound Theed, Palpatine watched a HoloNet replay of Jedi Knight Ronhar Kim leaping from a Coruscant taxi in midflight onto a monospeeder piloted by
the Maladian contracted to assassinate the elder Kim. At
the same time Palpatine spoke by comlink with Sate Pestage.
“Is Naboo threading the story?” Pestage asked.
“On every network.”
“Breaking news, Coruscant,” a female correspondent was saying. “Chommell sector Senator Vidar Kim, of
Naboo, was killed earlier today while en route to Mezzileen Spaceport, in what appears to have been an
assassination. A hovercam stationed at Node SSJ in the Sah’c District captured the moment when a monospeeder
approached Senator Kim’s taxi from behind, and its
helmeted pilot unleashed a salvo of blaster bolts, killing
Kim instantly and barely missing a second passenger—
an as-yet-unidentified Jedi Knight. The hovercam
recording shows the human male Jedi, armed with an
activated lightsaber, hurling himself from the taxi and
knocking the pilot assassin from the seat of the monospeeder. Eyewitnesses state that the Jedi managed
to steer the assailant to a pedestrian walkway close to where the speeder crashed and burned, but Realtime News has yet to learn whether the assassin survived the
fall. Wounded in the attack, the pilot of the taxi was taken
to Sah’c Med-Center, where his condition is listed as
grave.”
“Is the Maladian alive?” Palpatine demanded of Pestage.
“No. She spiked herself with a neurotoxin while Ronhar was trying to force information from her.”
“You’re certain?”
“Absolutely certain.”
“The fool,” Palpatine fumed. “Why didn’t she wait until
Kim had exited the taxi at Mezzileen?”
“You instructed me to make it public, which is exactly what I told her. She made a point of firing in full view of the
security cam, but I haven’t been able to determine whether
or not she knew that Kim was riding with a Jedi. Based on
the placement of the blaster bolts, I think she planned on
taking out both of them.”
“And if she’d succeeded, the Jedi would be conducting
their own investigation.”
“They are, regardless,” Pestage said. “Because Ronhar
issued a statement to the media that he may have been the
target.” Palpatine directed a scowl at the comlink cam. “Why
didn’t you warn her about Ronhar?”
“I did warn her. Maybe she wanted to add another Jedi
kill to her résumé.”
“Another?”
“As I told you, the Maladians are very good at what they
do.”Palpatine considered it. “If Ronhar is under the
impression that he might have been the target, then Kim
may not have revealed his suspicions about Tapalo and
Veruna.”
“He didn’t. I had him under surveillance from the moment
        
he arrived on Coruscant, and he didn’t go anywhere near
the Jedi Temple or meet with anyone on the Senate
Investigatory Committee. I have recordings of the three meetings he had with Ronhar in his office in the Senate Annex, and at no time did he offer anything more than
veiled references to intrigues on Naboo.”
“Was he able to persuade Ronhar to leave the Order?”
“No. Ronhar said that he respected Kim for being his—
what was the word he used?—progenitor. But that he
considers the Temple to be his home and the Jedi to be his
family.” Palpatine forced an exhale. “Iwarned him.”
“Kim tried to convince him that family blood comes first,
but Ronhar might as well have been listening to an episode
of Coruscant Confessions.”
“Magister Damask will not be pleased. What rumors are
circulating in the Senate?”
“That Kim may have been involved in shady business;
that he double-crossed a group of lobbyists. You’ve got the Senate worried—if that was the idea.” Plagueis would be satisfied to learn as much, Palpatine
thought. The message, he now realized, had been directed
not to anyone in particular, but to the Senate itself. Beyond
the goal of advancing Palpatine’s political career ahead of
schedule, the murder of Kim had spread apprehension in
the galactic capital.
“It’s done, in any case,” he said finally.
“And without any leads for the police or the Jedi to
pursue. You’re completely in the clear.” Palpatine relaxed somewhat. “You’ve done well, Sate—
the close call notwithstanding. There’s a place for you
among my support group if you’re interested.” Pestage, too, sounded relieved. “Then I suppose I’ll be
seeing you on Coruscant. Senator Palpatine.”
17: DAYS OF WINE AND IMPROPRIETY
Supreme Chancellor Thoris Darus was largely responsible
for the heady atmosphere that prevailed on Coruscant. A
human native of Corulag, Darus had brought a sense of
style to the galactic capital that had been absent a decade
earlier when Vaila Percivas held the position, and hadn’t
really been seen since the era of Eixes Valorum. Darus was unmarried, an incorrigible womanizer, an enthusiast of
sport, opera, legitimate gambling, and high cuisine; his first
term of office was characterized by a marked upswing in
intemperance and, in the end, rampant corruption.
Following the example set by the Supreme Chancellor, many of the tens of thousands who served in the Senate or
lobbied on behalf of autocratic corporations and cartels
had transformed Coruscant into a den of self-indulgence
unrivaled anywhere in the Core or Inner Rim. From all areas
of the galaxy had come beings eager to attend to the needs
of the new political elite—from chefs to artists to specialists
in pleasure. Courtesy of the Trade Federation and its
numerous affiliates and corporate partners, goods flooded
in from thousands of worlds, giving rise to new fashions,
new foods, and novel forms of extravagance. Privileged
Coruscanti, determined to enjoy life at the center, turned a
blind eye to the storms that were brewing on the edges of
civilization—intersystem rivalries, piratism, organized crime —and spiraling their way toward the Core. In three years
the planet saw more immigration than it had seen in the
preceding hundred, primarily from the Outer Rim, whose
nonhumanoid species arrived in complete ignorance of the
hardships that awaited them.
For Palpatine, Coruscant exceeded his expectations.
Five years of travel and adventuring in the Expansion Region and Colonies had given him a taste for the high life,
and here was a place not simply where his darkest desires
could be fulfilled, but also where he could put his unique
talents to the test. Its topography of cloudcutting edifices
was a microcosm of the galaxy: swarming with beings who were willing to do whatever was necessary to claw their way from the depths, overseen by a tiered elite that nursed
on their misery. If Coruscant was a magnet for those without
skills or promise, it was also a paradise for those with
credits and connections. And with assistance from many of
the scions of wealth Palpatine had met while serving as Naboo’s ambassador, along with Hego Damask’s coterie
of cronies and minions, he felt that he was on his way to the
summit of the Senate Podium from the moment his boots
touched the unnatural ground. He grasped immediately that the only way the Republic might have saved itself was by removing the Senate to a world where temptation wasn’t lurking at every traffic nexus;
opportunity in every balconied café; vice in every canyon—
although the racket that Supreme Chancellor Darus and the Senate had going was obvious only if one knew where to
look, and that frequently required having unrestricted
access to the private clubs and back rooms to which bribes
gravitated. Even without the Force, Palpatine knew he would have succeeded. The task would prove no more
challenging than gaining the full confidence of his peers. With everyone striving to outdo one another he need only
ensure that he dress well, dine in the right places,
associate with the proper company, and renew his season
passes to the Galaxies Opera. At the same time, he
understood that he could be almost as anonymous as he wished, simply by venturing up or down, dressing up or
down, mingling with merchants rather than politicians, or
consorting with the hucksters, shysters, con and scam
artists that populated the lower levels. His first apartment wasn’t luxurious, but it was located in
the government district, with room enough for his growing
art collection, which now included a costly neuranium-andbronzium sculpture of the ancient sage Sistros—
appropriate for the affluent head of House Palpatine—and
containing his original hand-built lightsaber, concealed in a
cylindrical cavity undetectable by security scans.
The fact that his first official duty as Naboo’s interim
Senator was to attend a funeral—his second that year—
seemed only appropriate, given the Sith’s eventual plans
for Coruscant.
Orders to attend Vidar Kim’s funeral had come both from
Naboo and from Plagueis, who said that he should use the
opportunity to seek out Ronhar Kim and speak with him
personally. Palpatine had yet to meet one-on-one with a
Jedi, and a conversation with Ronhar would allow him to
test his ability to conceal his true nature from another
Force-user. As wicked as Coruscant is, Plagueis had told him, the
Force is strong there because of the presence of so many
Jedi. If you are successful in hiding in plain sight, you will
be able to conceal your nature even from the most
powerful among them. Take Ronhar into your confidence,
and once you have, spend some of your time on Coruscant acquainting yourself with the spired
headquarters of our enemy, and ask yourself: Is this not a
fortress designed to hold the dark at bay?
Otherwise, Plagueis’s silence on the matter of Kim’s
assassination had been deafening. On learning that King
Tapalo had appointed Palpatine interim Senator, Plagueis
had offered his congratulations, but nothing more. After months of not seeing him, Palpatine had hoped to find
Plagueis waiting for him on Coruscant, but Hego Damask
and the Muuns who made up Damask Holdings were
conducting unspecified business on distant Serenno.
The funeral service was held at Naboo’s embassy, which was located below and to the west of Monument Plaza and
the Senate. Dressed in a high-collared cape and purple
robes, Palpatine arrived at the ornate monad in the
company of Kinman Doriana, Sate Pestage, and Janus Greejatus, who had been dispatched to Coruscant by
Tapalo, and whom Palpatine suspected had some strength
in the Force. Kinman and Sate had forged an instant bond.
The youthful Doriana was made for a world like Coruscant,
and he couldn’t have asked for a better guide to the
galactic capital’s titillating underbelly than Pestage, who
seemed to know every nook and cranny of the place. Ronhar Kim was among several dozen guests who were
attending the service. Palpatine waited until the Jedi was
alone in the viewing room before approaching him.
In concealing yourself, you will not be able to rely on
your dark gifts, Plagueis said. Instead you must be
yourself, submerged in the unified pattern to which the
Jedi are attuned; visible in the Force, but not as a Sith. Since you cannot allow yourself to be seen, you must make certain that you are taken for granted. Disguised in
the profane; camouflaged in the routine—in those same
realms from which you can attack without warning when
necessary. A tall, muscular young man attired in black robes, Ronhar
had thick black hair pulled into a bun behind, and with long
strands in front dangling from temples to chin. In him, Palpatine could see Vidar, whose body was lying in state,
supine on a massive rectangular stone bier. A simple
blanket covered the corpse from shoulders to knees, and
on the chest sat a shallow metallic bowel containing purple
flowers and a lighted candle meant to symbolize the Livet
Tower’s Eternal Flame. Janus Greejatus would transport
the cremation ashes to Naboo, where they would be
scattered in the Solleu River.
“Jedi Ronhar Kim,” Palpatine said as he entered the
room, “please forgive the intrusion, but I wanted to offer my
condolences in person.” Roused from his thoughts, Ronhar whirled on him, almost
in defense, and scanned him head-to-toe. “Who are you?”
“Palpatine,” he said. “I’ve been appointed to succeed
Vidar Kim as Senator of Naboo. I knew your father well.” Ronhar’s vigilance eased. “Forgive me for not knowing more about Naboo, Senator … Palpatine. But in fact, until
several weeks ago I wasn’t aware that Vidar Kim was my
biological father, or even that Naboo was my homeworld.” Palpatine feigned understanding. “No need to apologize.
I imagine that the Force is, in some sense, its own domain.” Ronhar nodded. “I scarcely knew the man. Were it not for
the fact that he was a Republic Senator, the Jedi Council would not have granted dispensation for me to meet with
him.” Palpatine allowed himself to stretch out with the Force,
but only for a moment, and chiefly to gauge the Jedi’s
reaction, which proved to be indiscernible. “Excuse me for
asking, but why then did you choose to attend the service?” Ronhar grew pensive. “No doubt you know about the
tragedy that claimed the lives of his wife and sons.”
“I do.”
“Vidar Kim contacted me to ask if I would consider
renouncing my pledge to the Jedi, in order to become the
bearer of the family name.” Palpatine moved closer to him and added compassion
to his voice. “He told me, Ronhar. Does your presence here
reflect doubt as to your obligations?”
“No,” the Jedi said, perhaps more firmly than he
intended. “I’m only here out of respect for the man. As you may also know, he died at the hands of an assassin while
in my company.” Ronhar’s voice betrayed disappointment
rather than anger. “If I had acted sooner, he would be alive,
and at present I can’t be certain that the assassin’s blaster
bolts weren’t meant for me, rather than Vidar Kim.”
“Who in their right mind would target a Jedi Knight?”
The Jedi sniffed and narrowed his dark eyes. “The Jedi
do not lack for enemies, Senator. Doling out justice and
ensuring the peace doesn’t sit well with some beings.”
“The world of politics is no safer, Ronhar. Not in this era, with so many in need. Thank the Force we have the Jedi.”
“Iwonder,” Kim said. Palpatine regarded him with interest. The Jedi was less
interested in solving the murder of Vidar than he was in
agonizing over his failure to prevent it. “You wonder about what, Ronhar?”
“What my life might have been had I not become a Jedi.” Palpatine adopted a look of shock. “The choice was not
yours to make. You have the Force. Your destiny was a
foregone conclusion.” Ronhar mulled it over. “And if Vidar Kim had elected not
to surrender me to the Order?”
“A line of thought impossible to follow to any conclusion,” Palpatine said.
The Jedi looked at him and squared his shoulders.
“There are many forks in the path, Senator. Had I remained
on Naboo I might have followed in Vidar Kim’s footsteps
and entered politics. Perhaps it’s not too late.” Palpatine showed him a tolerant smile and came
alongside him, confident now that his true nature was
beyond detection. “I have to admit that the notion of a
politician with Jedi values is not without its appeal. In fact,
the Republic was once overseen by Jedi chancellors only.
But I’m afraid you’re something of an anachronism, Ronhar.
The galaxy appears to have rejected the idea of
enlightened leadership. The best politician presently is merely exceptional, where every Jedi is extraordinary.” Ronhar laughed shortly. “More and more, Senator Palpatine, you begin to sound like my former Master.”
“Would that I had such talents,” Palpatine said, making
light of it. “But I do have a proposition, Ronhar. Not only am I
new to the Senate, I’m new to Coruscant. And it would be
good to have someone to count on as a friend. So what would you say to an alliance between a politician and a
Jedi? Through me you could gain insight into the workings
of the Republic, and through you I might better understand
the Jedi, in their roles as peacekeepers.” Ronhar inclined his head in a bow. “I respect Vidar Kim
all the more for bringing us together. May the Force be with
you, Senator Palpatine.”
On Serenno, remote from the Core along the Hydian Way,
a female servant of Count Vemec, costumed in garb from
an era long past, escorted the quartet of human Jedi into
the castle’s expensively modernized conference room. First
to be introduced to those assembled—including dignitaries
and politicians representing Serenno and nearby Celanon,
and the Muun core of Damask Holdings—was Jedi Master
and Council member Jocasta Nu, a pleasant-looking woman with straight hair, pronounced cheekbones, and
brilliant blue eyes. Accompanying her were distinguished
Jedi Masters Dooku and Sifo-Dyas, and a tall, powerfully
built Jedi Knight named Qui-Gon Jinn, who remained
standing while the rest took their designated seats at the
circular table. The three men carried themselves with
palpable self-assurance, and affected beards of different
styles—Dooku’s terminated in a stylish point; Sifo-Dyas’s
followed his strong jawline; Qui-Gon’s was long and thick. Plagueis, who rarely missed an opportunity to interact with Jedi, had planned to leave the business on Serenno to
Larsh Hill and the others—until learning that Dooku would
be present.
Fifty or so standard years old, Dooku was Serenno’s
native son, hailing from a noble lineage analogous to the
Naboo Palpatines. Had he not been born strong in the
Force, he would have been a Count, in the same way that
Palpatine would have been a royal. But on the few
occasions Plagueis had encountered Dooku, he had
sensed something in him that warranted further
investigation. Dooku was said to be one of the Order’s
finest lightsaber masters, and he had earned a reputation
as a skilled diplomat, as well; but his passion and
restlessness were what had captured Plagueis’s attention.
For all his decades in the Order, he seemed to have kept
one foot anchored in the mundane. In place of the
homespun brown robes worn by most Jedi—like the hale Qui-Gon Jinn—Dooku favored cloaks and robes more
appropriate to a night at the opera on Coruscant. In
addition, he was a candid critic of Supreme Chancellor Darus and the corrupt practices of the Senate. Most important, perhaps, Dooku was linked to the Sith’s Grand Plan in ways that went beyond circumstantial. Some
twenty years earlier, in a scheme engineered by Tenebrous
to replace human Senator Blix Annon with a young upstart
named Eero Iridian, Dooku and his then-Padawan, Qui- Gon Jinn, were caught up in the events and had managed
to send some of the principal players to prison. Dooku had
also unwittingly sabotaged several of Tenebrous’s plans to
foster intersystem dissent in the Expansion Region.
In the aftermath of the near-disastrous assassination of
Vidar Kim, Plagueis’s interest in Dooku had assumed a
new urgency. He felt certain that Sidious would evolve into
a commanding Sith, but just now the young Naboo was
drunk with power and prone to make mistakes. When the
dark recognized one as a true ally, a novice could lose his
or her way, as had almost happened to Plagueis following
the murder of Kerred Santhe. Bane-adoring Sith Masters
like Tenebrous might have used the meeting on Serenno
as a means of threatening their apprentices with
replacement. Plagueis, however, had no such intention, which was why he hadn’t mentioned to Sidious that Jedi would be attending the meeting. Even so, he found himself wondering whether a dissatisfied Jedi like Dooku could be
insurance against a reversal of fortune—some unexpected
event that would rob him of Sidious—or perhaps turned to
the dark without formal enlistment, and manipulated into
instigating a schism in the Order. As he had told Sidious, even a trained Jedi could
succumb to the lure of the dark side on his or her own. One
hundred thirty years earlier, on a former Sith world in the Cularin system, a Padawan named Kibh Jeen had been so
strongly affected by the lingering power in a fortress on Almas that he submitted himself to the dark side and
initiated a systemwide conflict. Perhaps, under Plagueis’s
influence, Master Dooku could be inspired to do something
similar. The Jedi would bear closer observation. One of Celanon’s legal advocates was the first to speak when everyone had been seated.
“Celanon protests the presence of Jedi Master Dooku at
this meeting, since it has come to our attention that he is Serennian by birth.” Serenno’s arrogant Count Vemec started to respond when Dooku cut him off, addressing himself to the litigator.
“If you had investigated further, you would also know that I
renounced all ties to my family and Serenno on being
accepted into the Jedi Order.” He turned his penetrating
gaze on Celanon’s ambassador. “I assure you that I will be
as impartial as any one of you.” Celanon’s ambassador—a large, bumptious human—
cleared his throat in a meaningful way. “Jedi Master Dooku’s reputation for even-handedness precedes him. We trust that he will be as fair in this matter as he is known
to have been elsewhere.”
“With that issue behind us,” Vemec said, “I call for an
official start to these proceedings.”
The issue at hand involved the planned construction of an Aqualish-manufactured hyperwave repeater in Celanon
space that would expand the reach of the HoloNet well into
the Corporate Sector—a vast region of the Tingel Arm that
had become an economic playground for the Banking Clan
and the Corporate Alliance, through lucrative deals
brokered by Damask Holdings. In compensation for the fact
that placement of the repeater would necessitate changes
in hyperspace trade routes, Celanon had announced that
ships entering Celanon space from the systems of the
upper Hydian would be required to pay substantial transit
taxes. Plagueis had limited interest in the debate. Secretly
he hoped that mediation would fail. Citing controversy,
Damask Holdings could then withdraw, and the project would collapse, leaving systems in the Tingel Arm fuming
over having been victimized by a foolish squabble between
two wealthy Republic worlds. After four hours of pointless back-and-forth, Plagueis
began to feel like the victimized one. When Count Vemec
finally called a break in the proceedings, and many of the
participants headed to the food tables, Plagueis found
himself alone with Dooku, Sifo-Dyas, and Qui-Gon Jinn,
and drew the cloak of the profane over himself.
“Bickering is becoming all too common,” he remarked to
no one in particular. “In the absence of resolution, it will be
the outlying systems that will suffer most.” Dooku nodded sagely. “The hyperwave repeater should
have been a Republic undertaking. The Senate erred in
allowing the HoloNet to be privatized.” Qui-Gon Jinn’s ears pricked up, and he glanced at
Plagueis. “Discontent in the outer systems is in keeping with the aims of Damask Holdings, is it not, Magister?”
“On the contrary,” Plagueis replied in a composed voice.
“We advocate for the interests of neglected worlds when
and wherever we can.”
The tall Jedi wasn’t persuaded to back off. “By
supporting the likes of the Trade Federation and other
cartels?”
“The Trade Federation has brought progress to many a
backward world, Master Jinn.”
“Through exploitation that leads ultimately to ruin.” Plagueis spread his hands. “Progress often comes at a
cost. On occasion a world will go through growth pangs as
a result, but to call the end result ruination is overstating the
case.” He studied Qui-Gon. “Surely the Jedi have had to
ignore consequences of the same magnitude in enforcing
the laws of the Republic.” Sifo-Dyas’s dark brows formed a V. A short, muscular man, he had a broad nose, prominent cheekbones, and
lustrous black hair cinched in a high topknot. His hands were large and callused, as if from physical labor. Concern
shone in his brown eyes. “It is a misconception that we
serve only the Republic, Magister. Our Order serves the
greater good.”
“As the Order defines it,” Plagueis said, only to wave the
remark away. “But then you have the advantage of being
able to act in concert with the Force, where the rest of us
are left to grope in the dark for what is just and right. Damask Holdings tries, nonetheless, to take the long view.”
“As do the Jedi,” Qui-Gon said. “But in several instances where we have had to resolve conflicts, it is your name that
has surfaced.” Plagueis shrugged. “The wealthy are held to higher
standards than the poor.” Dooku thought about it. “I blame the Senate for
encouraging the galaxy to turn on credit.” Plagueis glanced from Dooku to Qui-Gon. “I’m willing to
concede Master Jinn’s point that the Muuns have cornered
the market on finance, if he is willing to concede that the
Jedi have cornered the market on ethics.” Qui-Gon granted Plagueis a dignified bow. “And so we
find ourselves on different sides, Magister.”
“Not necessarily. Perhaps we are after the same thing.”
“Different paths to the same destination? It’s a clever
rationalization, but I refuse to accept it.” Qui-Gon placed his
hands in the opposite sleeves of his robe. “If you’ll excuse me …” Dooku smiled lightly as the tall Jedi sauntered off. “My
former apprentice does not mince words.”
“Frank talk is a rarity these days,” Plagueis said. “The Senate could learn from beings like Qui-Gon Jinn.” Dooku made a glum face. “The Senate listens only to
itself. Endlessly, and without purpose. If it and Supreme Chancellor Darus are going to perpetuate a climate where
injustice can advance, then it will.” Sifo-Dyas grew uneasy. “The Rotunda is an arena even we don’t enter,” he said in a level voice, “except as
spectators.” Plagueis could not restrain a smile. “But you have, from
time to time, been known to lobby.” He continued before Sifo-Dyas or Dooku could answer. “It can be a circus. One
thing is certain, however: the Core is not holding. New
leadership is needed.”
“Darus will undoubtedly be elected to another term,” Dooku said. Plagueis pretended concern. “Is there no one who can
defeat him, Master Dooku?”
“Frix, possibly. Kalpana—eventually. At present he isn’t
strong enough to overcome the special-interest lobbies.” Sifo-Dyas’s unease increased. “We are sworn not to
take an active role, in any case.”
“Kalpana would certainly set a different tone,” Plagueis
said, “but perhaps an equally risky one. His stance against
piratism, smuggling, even slavery is well known. Unfortunately, many of the outer systems survive only
because of such practices.”
“Then those worlds will have to find alternative means,” Sifo-Dyas said. Plagueis turned to him. “Without assistance from the Republic? It begins to sound to me as if the Jedi will have
their work cut out for them.” Sifo-Dyas compressed his lips. “The Judicials and the
Jedi will maintain peace.”
“There’s certainty in your voice,” Plagueis said. “But let me pose a question: If discontent spreads and intersystem
conflict breaks out—if member worlds threaten secession,
as Serenno threatened in times past—would your loyalties
not be divided?”
“The Republic will be preserved.” Plagueis grinned. “Again, that comforting confidence. But
suppose the Republic’s goals were not in keeping with the
greater good? Suppose conflict grew to become actual
schism?”
The two Jedi traded looks. “In the absence of armies
there can be no war,” Dooku said.
“Are the Jedi not an army—or at least capable of
becoming one should the need arise?”
“We were an army at one time, but our enemies were
vanquished,” Sifo-Dyas said with deliberate vagueness.
“No matter the extent of the conflict, we would attempt to
forge a peace—and without becoming the ruling body you
seem to fear.” Plagueis didn’t reply immediately. Sifo-Dyas was proving
to be even more interesting than Dooku, though in a
different way. Only a misguided sense of loyalty to the Jedi
Order kept him from giving voice to the real extent of his
apprenhensions.
“And yet you say forge a peace. That has the ring of
semantics to it, Master Sifo-Dyas. But for the sake of
argument, what if the disaffected systems raised an army?
Wouldn’t the Jedi be obligated to serve and protect the Republic?” Sifo-Dyas forced an exhale. “From where would these
hypothetical armies arise? The outlying systems lack the
resources …” Realizing his error, he trailed off. Plagueis waited a moment, his satisfaction concealed. “I
didn’t mean to suggest that the Republic is purposely
depriving the outlying systems of the right to selfdetermination. I’m merely speculating, because I do see a
growing threat.” Dooku regarded him. “You are not alone in seeing it, Magister.”
“Then one final question, if I may: If attacked, would you
counterattack?”
“The Republic has pledged to remain demilitarized,” Dooku said. “It would militarize only in the instance of a
perceived threat.”
“Once more, you’ve reframed your initial question, Magister Damask,” Sifo-Dyas interrupted, a new fire in his
eyes. “You’re hypothesizing an attack on the Jedi Order
itself.”
“I suppose I am,” Plagueis said self-deprecatingly. “I
suppose I was thinking of the recent assassination of
Senator Vidar Kim. A Jedi was involved, if I’m not mistaken.”
“That matter is being looked into,” Sifo-Dyas said in a
controlled voice. “There’s no evidence to suggest that the
Jedi in question was targeted.”
The silence that followed was broken by the voice of
Jocasta Nu, who was summoning the Jedi to the far side of
the conference room. Plagueis studied Sifo-Dyas
peripherally. While Nu and the others conferred, he thought
back to the conversation he’d had with Sidious on Sojourn. We will have to exploit their self-righteousness and
blind obedience to the Republic, Sidious had said at one
point. The Jedi must be made to appear the enemies of
peace and justice, rather than the guardians. Mulling it over anew, Plagueis began to wonder whether
he had taken the wrong approach on Kamino. Perhaps, he
thought, it would be better to have the Kaminoans create an
army capable of fighting alongside the Jedi rather than
against them …
Sifo-Dyas was the first to return to Plagueis’s corner of
the room, as if eager to continue the conversation.
“Lest you’re thinking of investing in military enterprises, Magister, I can assure you that the Republic will not reverse
its stance on demilitarization.” His words were forceful, but
lacked certainty. “The Ruusan Reformations will not be
repealed.” Plagueis showed the palms of his hands. “And I can
assure you, Master Jedi, that my questions were in no means motivated by thoughts of profit. We—that is, I—don’t wish to see the Republic caught off guard. For now I’ll place my faith in the Jedi, and in the belief that an army could be
raised if necessary.” Sifo-Dyas’s gaze faltered. “Out of thin air? Unlikely, Magister.”
“Grown, then.”
“Manufactured, you mean.”
“No, Iwas being literal,” Plagueis said. “But I know of only
one group that might be up to the task. The group who grew
laborers to work the mines of Subterrel.” Puzzlement wrinkled Sifo-Dyas’s face. “I’m not familiar with Subterrel.” Plagueis was about to mention Kamino when he spied
Jocasta Nu approaching, and a feeling from deep in the
dark side rose up inside him, strangling his voice box, as if
refusing to let the word escape.
“I apologize, Master Jedi,” he said when he could. “The
name of the group was on the tip of my tongue, but I seem
to have swallowed it.”
18: ARTFUL DODGING
Palpatine had been on Coruscant for just over two standard months when the Senate convened to vote on whether or
not to seat Felucia, Murkhana, and half a dozen other
planets considered by many to be client worlds of the Trade
Federation. In the hope of generating public interest, Coruscant climate control had promised to provide perfect weather over the government district. Clouds had been
swept aside and orbital mirrors had been positioned to
provide maximum daylight. Maintenance droids had
refreshed the paving stones of Senate Plaza and polished
the thirty-meter-tall statues that lined the Avenue of the Core
Founders. Police had cordoned off large areas of the
district between levels 55 and 106, and deployed sniper
units, squads of bomb detector automata, and three times
the usual number of security hovercams. Reporters,
documentarians, freelance journalists, and op-ed
columnists were out in force, calling in favors in an effort to
be as close to the action as possible. Limousine services were working overtime, and taxis were nearly impossible to
find, which left aides and assistants to fend for themselves,
arriving on foot or by mag-lev, ensembles freshly laundered,
headpieces blocked, fur coiffed, boots buffed. Even the
Jedi Knights and Padawans stationed throughout the plaza
as a show of force appeared to be sporting their cleanest
robes and tunics. Analysts were touting the vote as landmark, though it had
been an admittedly slow news week on Coruscant. More to
the point, a vast majority of the capital’s residents couldn’t
have cared less about the outcome, since most only knew
of the Trade Federation through self-serving
advertisements that streamed on the HoloNet. Local gossip was always more interesting than politics, in any case.
For weeks, however, opponents and supporters of the
amendments that would revise the rules regarding member
status in the Republic had been giving voice to their
arguments in the great Rotunda, often vociferously enough
to shake their repulsorlift platforms, jabbing fingers and
other appendages in the air for emphasis or accusation, in
defiance of calls by the vice chancellor for order and
decorum. Standing with Sate Pestage and Kinman Doriana
beneath the abstract statue of Core Founder Tyler Sapius Praji, Palpatine felt one step closer to his destined place,
even if the scene in the plaza struck him as more vanity fair
than Senatorial assembly. Like many of the others, he had
been out half the night, drinking and dining with lobbyists
eager to win his favor. At tapcafs, cantinas, restaurants,
and nightclubs throughout the entertainment districts,
credits had flowed freely, whispered bribes had been
proffered, promises made, deals struck. Now some of the
players he had encountered during the long evening were
shuffling bleary-eyed through the gaping entrances of the
umbrella-shaped Senate Building: Senators and their top
aides; commissioners of the investment sector and
securities exchange; members of the Trade Federation
delegation and the board of the InterGalactic Banking Clan. Elsewhere on the broad avenue—at key intersections,
taxi stops, and mag-lev exits—stood groups of Jedi, a few
with the hilts of their lightsabers conspicuously visible. For Palpatine the sight of so many of them in one place was at
once exhilarating and sobering. Though thoroughly cloaked
in the everyday, he could feel their collective pride trickle
into him through the Force. Only the baseness of
Coruscant’s populace, the almost sheer absence of
anything natural, kept the world from being as strong in the
light as Korriban was in the dark. While he accepted that he
and Plagueis were more than equal to the most powerful of
the Jedi Order, he understood that they were no match for
their combined strength—the Sith imperative
notwithstanding. The Jedi would fall only with the full
collaboration of the dark side; that was, only when the dark
side of the Force was ready and willing to conspire in their
downfall. His musings were interrupted by a sudden gust of wind, whipped up by a luxurious landspeeder that was alighting in
the center of the avenue. Preceded by a vanguard of
ceremonial guards wearing floor-length blue robes,
Supreme Chancellor Darus emerged, waving to the crowd
and for the hovercams that rushed in to immortalize his
every expression. Palpatine studied him as the guards
began to maneuver him through the throng, a train of
handpicked journalists following dutifully in his wake: the
easy way he carried himself; the way he made a point to
stop and greet some while ignoring others; the way he
laughed on cue …
He recalled the two coronations he and his father had
attended in Theed, and could remember as if yesterday the
envy that had wafted from Cosinga like sour sweat. How
cravenly his inept father had desired to wield such power!
And would that Cosinga could see his son now, standing so
close to the center, surveying the Senate as Cosinga might
have the Palpatine lands in the Lake Country, thinking: Everything my gaze falls on will be mine: these buildings,
these monads, these statues I will have slagged, this
airspace whose use I will restrict to the powerful, that
penthouse in 500 Republica, this Senate …
Again his musings were interrupted, this time by the Gran Protectorate Senator Pax Teem, who was waddling briskly
toward him, followed closely by the Senators from Lianna, Eriadu, and Sullust.
“Are you ready to make history, Senator?” Teem said,
his eyestalks quivering in excitement.
“Rather than be a casualty of it,” Palpatine told him.
The Gran grunted in amusement. “Well said, young sir. Needless to say, many are counting on you.”
“Better many than all, because we cannot please
everyone.”
Teem grew serious. “Perhaps not. But we can strike a
blow for utilitarianism. The greatest good for the greatest
number.” Palpatine smiled in the way he had seen Darus smile.
“And strike a blow we shall, Senator.”
“Good, good,” Teem chortled. “Then we’ll see you inside where the galaxy’s business is done.” Pestage snorted a laugh as Teem was moving away.
“The greatest good for the greatest Gran.”
It was true. Teem harbored no ill will toward the Trade
Federation. He merely wanted to see Naboo blunder, Hego Damask cut down to size, and Malastare returned to its
quondam grandeur.
The contingent of Senators had scarcely left when Palpatine heard his name called; turning, he saw Ronhar Kim in the company of two older human Jedi. Quietly he
pulled his powers deeper into himself and adopted a mask
of cordiality.
“Jedi Ronhar,” he said, inclining his head in greeting.
The black-haired Jedi returned the nod. “Senator Palpatine, may I introduce Masters Dooku and Sifo-Dyas.” Palpatine was familiar with the former, but only by
reputation. “A great honor, Masters.” Dooku appraised him openly, then arched an eyebrow.
“Excuse me for staring, Senator, but Ronhar’s descriptions
of you led me to expect someone older.”
“I disguise myself well, Master Dooku. My age, that is.”
“Either way,” Sifo-Dyas remarked, “a talent required by
your position.”
“An ignoble truth, Master Sifo-Dyas. But we strive to
remain faithful to our conscience.” Dooku smiled with purpose. “Hold tight to that, Senator Palpatine. Coruscant will surely test your resolve.” Ronhar Kim had his mouth open to speak when another
familiar voice rang out.
“I didn’t realize that you were acquainted.” Over Dooku’s shoulder Palpatine saw in surprise that
Hego Damask, Larsh Hill, and two other black-robed
Muuns were threading their way toward him. That he hadn’t
sensed his Master spoke to Plagueis’s power to
completely conceal himself, even from a fellow Sith.
“Magister Damask,” Dooku and Sifo-Dyas said
simultaneously, turning to greet him. Damask looked at Palpatine. “Recently—on Serenno, in
fact—Masters Dooku, Sifo-Dyas, and I engaged in a
spirited discussion about the current state of the galaxy and
our hopes for the future.”
“Serenno,” Palpatine said, more to himself and mildly
confounded. Damask hadn’t said anything about Jedi
attending the meeting there. So what message was he
sending now? Glancing at the trio of Jedi, he thought back
to his Master’s remark that even Jedi could be turned to the
dark. Had the near-bungled assassination of Vidar Kim
persuaded Plagueis to entice and recruit a Jedi to serve as
his apprentice?
“Ronhar just introduced us to the Senator,” Sifo-Dyas was explaining. Dooku’s eyes moved from Damask to Palpatine and
back again. “May I inquire how it is that you and the Senator
know each other?” Damask motioned to Palpatine. “Senator Palpatine and
Damask Holdings share a dream for Naboo …” He
gestured inclusively to Hill and the other Muuns. “Palpatine was one of the few who early on saw the wisdom of
ushering in a new era for his homeworld.” Palpatine sensed scrutiny from someone outside the
circle the ten of them had formed. Just short of the Senate Building’s Great Door, Pax Teem had stopped and was
gazing at Palpatine, his eyestalks extended. And Palpatine
could scarcely blame him, since even he had been caught
off guard by Plagueis’s eagerness to acknowledge him in
public.
“How does it feel to have realized your wish for your
homeworld?” Dooku said. Palpatine came back to himself. “One can’t very well
stand in the way of destiny.” Again, Dooku glanced from Palpatine to Damask. “The will of the Force begets uncommon fellowships.” Chimes sounded, announcing that the session was
beginning, and everyone began to file through the doors
into the massive structure, going their separate ways from
the atrium, some to spectators’ boxes or media areas, and
others, like Palpatine, Sate, and Kinman, to turbolifts that
accessed Naboo’s station in the Senate’s middle tier—one
of a thousand identical docking stations in the Rotunda,
outfitted with a detachable repulsorlift platform and a suite
of private offices. Central to the artificially lighted space was an elegant tower emblazoned with the seal of the Republic, at the summit of which rested the Supreme Chancellor’s podium. Darus, the vice chancellor, and the
administrative aide were already present, and after brief
introductory remarks by the Supreme Chancellor, the vice
chancellor called the matter to a vote. A few Senators spoke, but most simply cast their votes,
a tally of which was relayed to monitor screens at each
station and projected overhead, along the inner curve of the
dome. By the time the vice chancellor recognized the Chommell sector, the vote was tied. Though Palpatine’s
vote would break the stalemate, several systems had yet to weigh in. Detached from the docking station, the platform carried
Palpatine out over the lower tiers and deep into the
kilometers-wide Rotunda. A hush fell over a portion of the Senate, and he inhaled the moment deep into himself. Still
the platform continued to move toward the podium, as if
even the Supreme Chancellor wanted a closer look at him,
and it pleased him to know that his reputation had spread
that far.
Then Palpatine spoke to them.
“The Trade Federation came to Naboo some ten years
ago. It didn’t arrive by force but by invitation, after a vast
reservoir of plasma was discovered beneath Naboo’s lush mantle—vast enough to supply clean energy to hundreds of
disadvantaged worlds along the Hydian Way and, at the
same time, introduce Naboo to the galactic community.
“Following months of reasoned debate, our newly elected monarch decided that Naboo should share its resources with the galaxy. Agreements were struck between Naboo
and the Trade Federation, along with several construction
conglomerates. Mining was begun, processing plants were
constructed, and spaceports were enlarged to
accommodate the fleet of shuttles needed to ferry the
plasma to cargo ships parked in orbit.
“Three years later, plasma was flowing out into the galaxy
and wealth was flowing into Naboo and the worlds of the Chommell sector, and an era of unprecedented prosperity
had begun.
“That prosperity came with hidden costs, but Naboo was willing to absorb them, primarily for the sake of those
beings who were benefiting from what nature had
bequeathed to our small world.” He paused and turned slightly in the direction of the
Trade Federation’s platform.
“The Trade Federation has been accused of price fixing,
exploitation, and monopolistic practices, but those matters
are not at issue today. Today the Republic is being asked
to widen its embrace to include several planets in the
outlying systems many consider to be client worlds of the
cartel. Many of you are concerned that seating these worlds will tip the balance of power by giving the Trade Federation
and its corporate allies too strong a voice in the Senate. But was this matter not already settled when the Courts of
Justice ruled that the Trade Federation should be treated
as if it were a world? That decision opened the door to
entities like the Commerce Guild, the Techno Union, and
the Corporate Alliance, all of which enjoy their separate
platforms in this hall. So the issue of legality is not up for
debate.
“Instead, we must set ourselves to the task of deciding if
the Trade Federation has become too aggressive in its
pursuit of a louder voice.” Again he paused, this time to allow individual debates to
come and go.
“Not three standard months ago,” he said at last, “the Chommell sector’s Senator of long standing was
assassinated, here, on Coruscant. Senator Kim was known
to many of you as an honest being, concerned about the
growing influence of the cartels and the potential for a shift
in power in the Senate. His tragic death provoked
allegations and prompted investigations, and yet no
progress has been made in determining the motive for his murder or identifying the agents behind it. This, despite
inquires by Judicials, the Senate Investigatory Committee,
even the Jedi Order.
“As a consequence of and, yes, in protest against the manner in which the investigation into Senator Kim’s death
has been handled, I am instructed by my regent, King Bon
Tapalo, to announce that Naboo and the Chommell sector worlds are abstaining from the vote.”
The hush that had fallen over a select section of the Senate spread to include the entire Rotunda. Then the
outbursts that erupted—both damning and championing—
were so clamorous and prolonged that the vice chancellor
ultimately curtailed his attempts to restore order and let
chaos reign.
19: THE TRIALS
In the aftermath of the Trade Federation victory in the Senate, Felucia, Murkhana, and other former client worlds
became members of the Republic, unswerving in their
allegiance to the needs of the Trade Federation. While Pax
Teem and a handful of similarly disappointed Senators
shunned Palpatine, accusing him—and Naboo—of having
been bought by the cartel, most of the Senate dismissed
the matter with a shrug. Palpatine was new to the game
and, in fact, was merely expressing the wishes of King
Tapalo. More important, the seating of new worlds meant
new revenue and additional opportunities for graft. Ronhar Kim thanked Palpatine personally for not mentioning him in
his address to the Senate. Moved by Palpatine’s appeal, Supreme Chancellor Darus sent a personal message
stating that he was instructing the Judiciary Committee to
use its wide-ranging powers to unravel the Kim
assassination. Plagueis was pleased by the results, since it was only a matter of time before the newly seated worlds would find
themselves caught between the Republic on the one hand
and the Trade Federation on the other; taxed by the former,
exploited by the latter—the perfect recipe for resentment.
The two Sith did not meet in person, but Plagueis notified
his apprentice that he and the other Muuns would be
remaining on Coruscant for the foreseeable future, primarily
to attend the induction of Larsh Hill into the arcane Order of
the Canted Circle, many of whose members were regulars
at the Gatherings on Sojourn.
For Darth Sidious, the weeks following the vote were a
return to business as usual. With the Senate still in session,
he spent most of his days in the Rotunda and most of his
nights continuing to explore Coruscant, often in the
company of Pestage and Doriana. In secret he continued
his Sith training, accepting the absence of actual guidance
from his Master as a sign that he was meant to stretch out
on his own. And so he did, delving into many of the ancient
texts Plagueis dismissed as worthless, including treatises
on Sith sorcery and holocron construction.
Toward the end of the third week he was contacted by a
lobbyist for an energy consortium known as Silvestri Trace Power. In several comlink exchanges, the lobbyist, a Sullustan, made it clear that Senator Palpatine stood to
profit greatly by advocating for STP in the Senate, and
suggested a meeting to discuss terms. Sidious probably wasn’t supposed to dig too deeply into the origins of STP,
or succeed in discovering ways around the roadblocks the
consortium had constructed to thwart just such
investigations, but he did, and was intrigued to learn that
STP had once been a shell company created by Zillo Fuel
Resources, which was based on Malastare. Suspecting an attempt at entrapment, Sidious agreed to
a daytime meeting, the location of which served only to
further arouse his suspicions. Unlike the upper-tier
restaurants patronized by the political crowd, the Shimmersilk was in a low-tier district known colloquially as POTU, which to most beings stood for “the periphery of the Uscru,” but to the better informed meant “the peril of the Uscru”—a slowly gentrifying area accessed by the Deep
Core Mag-Lev Line that had once been the haunt of turf
gangs, serial killers, molesters, thieves, and other bottom
feeders, on a world whose bottom was uncommonly deep. With residents preying mainly on one another, the police
saw little reason to patrol, and even security cams were
scarce, as they were frequently stolen and disassembled
for parts. Still, the risk of mayhem or murder appealed to
the Rotunda crowd, and it wasn’t unusual to encounter a Senator or an aide slumming in the POTU, mingling with
shady beings, indulging in proscribed substances, flirting with danger. Sidious considered bringing Pestage and Doriana
along, but ultimately rejected the idea. In the absence of
undergoing any formal training with Plagueis, he was eager
to see what he could do on his own. Cramped and rattled by the frequent passage of nearby mag-lev trains, the Shimmersilk catered to what looked like
a local crowd. Dressed down for the meeting, as was Sidious, the Sullustan lobbyist was waiting at a corner
table, with his back to a wall adorned with cheap
holoimages. Only six other tables were occupied—
nonhuman couples in the main—and catered to by three
clumsy human waiters and a Dug bartender. Instrumental
jatz music, barely audible, wafted though air in sore need of
recycling. Sidious adopted a look of wide-eyed innocence as he
sat down opposite the Sullustan. They began to talk in a
general way about current events and Senate business,
before the lobbyist steered the conversation toward STP’s
need for Senate approval to expand its operations along
the Rimma Trade Route. Drinks and appetizers were
ordered and reordered, and before too long Palpatine’s
interest began to wane.
“I think you may have overvalued my worth to STP,” he
said at last. “I’m nothing more than the voice of Naboo’s
regent.”
The Sullustan waved his small hand in a gesture of
dismissal. “And I think you undervalue yourself. Your short
speech to the Senate put you on the map, Senator. Beings
are talking about you. STP believes that you can be of
great service.”
“And to myself, you said.”
“Naturally—” the Sullustan started, but Sidious interrupted
him.
“In fact, you’re not here to recruit me.” Motioning
negligently, he repeated: “You’re not here to recruit me.”
The Sullustan blinked in confusion. “In fact, I’m not really
here to recruit you.”
“Then why are we here?”
“I don’t know why we’re here. I was instructed to meet with you.”
“Instructed by whom?”
“I, I—” Sidious decided not to press him too hard. “You were
saying?” Again the Sullustan blinked. “I was saying … Just what was I saying?”
They both laughed and sipped at their drinks. At the
same time, Sidious used the Force to shift the apron of one
of the waiters just enough to reveal the grip of a hold-out
blaster the man was wearing at his waist. Lifting his glass
for another swallow, he did the same to another of the waiters, whose apron concealed an identical weapon. Both
had been manufactured by BlasTech, but not for common
consumption. The E-series 1-9—the aptly named Swiftkick —was available only to elite members of Santhe Security,
headquartered on Lianna.
“I had better slow down,” he said with purposeful
awkwardness. “I believe I’m becoming a bit light-headed.”
The Sullustan’s demeanor changed, though almost
imperceptibly. “You just need some more food.” He slid a menu across the table. “Choose whatever you wish. Cost is
no issue.” He stood. “If you’ll excuse me for a moment, we’ll
order as soon as Ireturn.” Sidious noted that the Sullustan wasn’t the only one
getting to his feet. Under low-voiced orders from the waiters, patrons were calling for their checks and exiting. In moments he would be the Shimmersilk’s sole customer. As
he swung slightly in his chair to stare into the corner of the
room, a scenario began to emerge in his imaginings. The Sullustan, STP’s link to Malastare, Santhe Security agents,
even the Dug bartender … Their issues were not with him
but with Damask Holdings. He wasn’t being set up for an
eventual allegation of corruption; a far more sinister
deception was unfolding, and his interest was immediately
renewed. His first thought was that they had attempted to drug him. His investigations into Sith sorcery had taught him how to
nullify the effects of many common poisons and venoms—a
practice he had performed routinely before he’d even
seated himself at the table. Perhaps, then, they were waiting for him to slump forward and lapse into
unconscious or froth at the mouth and be shaken by
spasms …
Just when he was thinking that it was his acting ability
that was going to be put to the test, two of the waiters
converged on him, now showing their discreet but powerful weapons.
“Someone wants a word with you, Senator,” the taller of
the pair said.
“Here?” Sidious said in apparent confusion.
The other one motioned to a door. “Through there.” Sidious masked his smile: the Shimmersilk had a back
room. He stood clumsily, leaning deliberately toward one of the
security men, gauging his body temperature, heart rate,
and respiration. “I’m slightly intoxicated. I may have to count
on you for support.”
The man made a sound of exasperation but allowed
Sidious to place one arm on his shoulder. Howeffortless it would be, he thought, as the dark began
to rise in him, searing and hungry, yearning to assume
control of his body and unleash itself, to break the necks of
both of them, to tear their beating hearts from their chests,
to hurl and plaster them against the walls, to bring the
entire sour-smelling place down on their heads …
But he didn’t. He needed to meet his abductor. He
needed to learn the names of all those responsible. He
needed to prove to his Master that he was adroit and
capable—a true Sith Lord.
The back room had a second door that opened into a
dark corridor leading to an ancient turbolift. Shoved forward
by the guards, Sidious calculated the distance they had
come from the Shimmersilk to the turbolift. He fell silent as
they began to rise, and devoted his attention to calculating
their rate of climb. He estimated that they had risen fifty
levels when the turbolift came to a halt, depositing them in a
corridor as aged as the first, though wider, tiled, and
illuminated by wall sconces. Perhaps a maintenance
corridor for the monads above, though still far below what would constitute the deepest of the sub-basements. The Santhe Security men guided him north across a stretch of
stained permacrete floor to an intersection where a fourbeing speeder was idling, a heavily armed Rodian seated
at the controls.
This one isn’t Santhe, Sidious told himself. A freelance mercenary or assassin. Shoved roughly onto the speeder’s rear bench seat, he was reminded not to do anything foolish. Restraining an
impulse to reveal that they already had, he continued to
play the intimidated abductee, cowering in the seat, hands
interlocked in his lap, avoiding eye contact. The speeder
traveled east at a moderate speed until the first
intersection, then turned in the direction of the government
district and resumed the same speed for a longer duration.
Sidious reckoned that they were twenty or so tiers beneath
the outlying buildings of the Senate when the speeder
swung west into an even broader corridor toward a district
known as The Flats or The Works—a kind of industrial plain
situated well below the governmental plateau, overlooked
to the far north by the Jedi Temple and the horizontal
landing fields of Pius Dea Spaceport, and to the south by
the resiblocks and commercial towers of the Fobosi
district. Where Plagueis was attending Larsh Hill’s induction into
the Order of the Canted Circle.
The Rodian speeder pilot delivered them to an antigrav
turbolift car. While pretending to tremble in fear, Sidious
had come to an additional conclusion: the fact that his
abductors had gone to a lot of trouble to keep him out of
public view meant that the plan called for him to be held for
ransom or executed clandestinely rather than publicly.
The elevator carried them to a midlevel docking area of
an abandoned factory, where several more guards were waiting. Oblique, particulate-suffused daylight streamed
though massive windows yet to be smashed by the gangs
that ruled The Works, falling on items that had been
deemed worthless when the factory’s owners had
abandoned Coruscant for less costly worlds in the Mid or Outer Rim. Sidious’s human handlers forced him to sit atop
the boxy body of an overturned power droid. A portable
holoprojector was moved into position in front of him, and a
transmission grid placed under his feet. One of the Santhe guards spent a moment activating the
projector, then stepped aside as a faintly blue, life-sized
image of Gran Protectorate Senator Pax Teem took shape
above. Teem was dressed in a richly brocaded robe and a
shimmersilk tunic banded by a broad cummerbund. The
stable and sharply detailed quality of the image suggested
that its source was Coruscant or a nearby Core world,
rather than Malastare.
“We apologize for not having provided a seat more
suited to your station, Senator. No doubt the head of House Palpatine is accustomed to more comfortable
surroundings.” Sidious rejected outrage and intimidation for rankled
curiosity. “Is this the point where I’m expected to ask why
I’ve been abducted?”
Teem’s eyestalks lengthened. “You’re not the least bit
interested?”
“I assume that this has something to do with Naboo’s
abstention in the vote.”
“That’s certainly part of the reason. You should have
voted as your predecessor would have, Senator.”
“Those were not my instructions.”
“Oh, I’m certain of that much.” Sidious folded his arms across his chest. “And the rest of
it?”
Teem rubbed his six-fingered hands together in
eagerness. “This has less to do with you than with the
beings you serve. In a way, it’s simply your bad luck that you
find yourself in the middle.”
“I don’t believe in bad luck, Senator, but I take your point
to mean that my abduction is an act of retribution. And as
such, you demonstrate that the Gran Protectorate is willing
to employ the same tactics used by those who ordered the
assassination of Vidar Kim.”
Teem leaned toward the cam that was transmitting his
image and allowed anger to contort his features. “You say
that as if it’s still a mystery, when we both know that the murder wasn’t ordered by the Trade Federation but by your Muun master. By Hego Damask.” Sidious’s expression didn’t change. “He is hardly my master, Senator. In fact, I scarcely know him.”
“He greeted you in front of the Senate Building like a
close friend.”
“He was extending his greeting to two Jedi Masters I
happened to be standing with.”
Teem’s right forefinger jabbed the air. “Don’t delude
yourself into thinking that you can save yourself by lying. You
and Damask have known each other for more than ten
years. Ever since you were instrumental in helping him
guarantee the election of Bon Tapalo.” Sidious gestured casually. “An old rumor that has no
basis in fact, begun and perpetuated by rivals of House Palpatine.”
“Again, you lie. Your treachery was to your father and his
royal allies. In exchange for the information you released
and the subsequent spying you carried out for Damask, he
rewarded you by persuading Tapalo to appoint you
ambassador.” Sidious hid his ruefulness. That his enemies on Naboo
had reached out to Teem came as no surprise. But the
revelation firmed his decision to have those enemies
eliminated at the first opportunity. And to see to it, as well,
that information regarding his past disappeared from the
public record.
“The appointment as ambassador came years later,” he
said. “As a direct result of my political accomplishments on Naboo.”
Teem snorted a laugh. “In the same manner in which the
appointment to the Senate was a result of your
accomplishments?”
“Speak plainly, Teem,” Sidious said, his voice flat and menacing now.
Teem showed him a bitter smile. “Perhaps you had no
direct hand in Kim’s death, but I suspect that you were
complicit.” He paused, then added, “That little speech you
gave in the Senate … I understand that it succeeded in
attracting the attention of the Supreme Chancellor. Clearly
you have all the makings of a career politician. Unfortunately, we plan to cut your career short.” Sidious brushed dust from the shoulder of his robe.
“Release whatever allegations you have. They will provide
gossip for the day and be forgotten the next.”
Teem planted his large hands on his hips and laughed
heartily. “You misunderstand me, Palpatine. We’re not
interested in besmirching your reputation or holding you for
ransom. We intend to kill you.” Sidious took a moment to respond. It was odd to think
now that he had once known fear. Though never
incapacitating fear, and never for very long. But as a child,
he’d experienced fear as a conditioned response to threat. Despite a reassuring voice inside him that had promised
no harm could come, there had been, for a time, a chance
that something terrible could happen. More than once his
father’s raised hand had made him cringe. Eventually, he
had understood that he had conjured that voice; that he
hadn’t been fooling himself by exercising some infantile
belief in invulnerability. And he understood now that it had
been the dark side telling him that no harm could come to
him, precisely because he was invulnerable. Since the start
of his training, the voice had quieted by becoming
internalized. Teem’s belief that he had power over him
might long ago have moved him to pity instead of stirring
anger and loathing. Raw emotion was a consequence of
leading a double life. While he relished his secret identity,
he wanted at the same time for it to be known that he was a
being who could not be trifled with; that he wielded ultimate
authority; that merely to gaze on him was tantamount to
glimpsing the dark matter that bound and drove the
galaxy …
“What is it you hope to gain by killing me?”
“Since you ask: to rid the Senate of yet another useless
crony, and to send a special message to Hego Damask
that his days of influencing the Senate have come to an
abrupt end. For ten years we’ve been waiting to execute
this … retribution, as you call it. For some of us, even
longer. Reaching back to Damask’s partnership with a Bith
named Rugess Nome.”
The assassination of Kerred Santhe, Sidious thought. “I
fear, Senator, that you have not given this matter sufficient
thought.”
Teem’s face took on color. “Repercussions, Palpatine?
Ah, but we have thought through the matter, and have taken
the necessary precautions.” Sidious nodded. “I’ll give you one final chance to
reconsider.”
Teem swung to someone off cam and loosed a belly
laugh. “Tell that to the beings who hold your life in their
hands, Palpatine. And do take heart in the fact that you
accomplished so much in your brief career.” No sooner did the holoimage dissolve than two of the
security men began to advance on him. Sidious readied
himself for action. A Force blow to send them reeling back
toward the holoprojector, then a leap, arms extended,
hands curled into claws, one for each windpipe, which he would tear from their throats—
The Force intruded, drawing his attention to the windows
in the upper walls. At once, the sound of repeating blasters and pained
cries echoed from adjacent rooms; then a nerve-jangling
shattering of glass as Sun Guards crashed through the high
windows and began to rappel to the filthy floor, firing as they
slid down on their microfilament lines, catching the Santhe men and the Rodian with so many bolts that their bodies were left quartered by the volleys. Other towheaded Echani rushed into the landing from
both sides, some carrying force pikes, others blasters. Sidious had yet to move a muscle when a silver-eyed
female hurried over to him.
“You’re safe now, Senator Palpatine.” He smiled at her. “I can see that.” An Echani male standing alongside the holoproj was
using a handheld device to extract information from it. A moment later, an image of Hego Damask dressed in a
ceremonial robe genied into view where Teem’s had been;
the droid 11-4D stood behind him.
“We have the source, Magister,” the Sun Guard said.
“PanoplyOrbital Facility.” Damask nodded. “Rendezvous with the rest of your team
and execute the assault.”
The Sun Guard nodded briskly. “Shall I leave personnel with Senator Palpatine?”
“No,” Damask told him. “Senator Palpatine doesn’t
require your protection. Leave us.” Sidious could hear airspeeders hovering outside the
factory. Without further word, the Sun Guards began to race
from the room.
“You’ve obviously been keeping a close eye on me,” Sidious said as he approached the projector. Darth Plagueis nodded. “Your abduction has been in the
planning stages for some time.”
“Ever since you made it a point to greet me openly at the Senate.”
“Even before that. Veruna alerted me to the fact that a
group of disgruntled nobles had made contact with the Gran.” Plagueis paused a moment. “You might consider
using Sate Pestage to settle the score with them.”
“The thought occurred to me.”
“As for our public meeting, I needed to dangle you in front
of them.”
“Without my knowledge.” The ruddiness that had come to Sidious’s face deepened. “Another test?”
“Why should I need to test you?”
“Perhaps you thought I was becoming so enthralled with
life on Coruscant that Iwouldn’t recognize danger.”
“Clearly you weren’t. I could see that you were aware
from the start. You were determined to please me, and
indeed you have.” Sidious inclined his head in a respectful bow.
“Even in partnership with Santhe Security, Teem and the
other Gran are rank amateurs,” Plagueis continued. “Our
agents persuaded them to use the eatery in Uscru, and the
factory in which you find yourself—owned by us, as it were,
through a holding company called LiMerge Power. We were unable, however, to determine where the Gran would
be taking refuge.”
“And now you know,” Sidious said. “But why go to such
lengths to set them up? Why not simply kill them?”
“This isn’t Sith business, apprentice. For the sake of
appearances we need to justify what we are about to
unleash on them. They failed to understand our message
and now they must be taught a lesson. Still, other interests
need to be convinced of our reasoning.”
“How can I help?”
“You’ve already played your part. Now go about your
usual business. We’ll speak again when the ceremony at
the Order of the Canted Circle is concluded.” Sidious fell silent for a long moment, then said, “Is there
an end to these trials?”
“Yes. When there is no further need of them.”
20: THE CANTED CIRCLE
The stage was set. A perfect circle, twenty meters in diameter, had been cut
from a single slab of imported stone and constructed so
that one end touched the floor while the other was held ten
degrees above it by concealed antigrav generators. This was the Canted Circle, known only to members of the order —which, throughout its long history, had never numbered more than five hundred in any given period—and was
housed in the clear-domed summit of the esoteric society’s monad in the heart of Coruscant’s Fobosi district. Legend
had it that the round-topped building—thought to be one of
the oldest in that part of the planet—was built over an
ancient lake bed and had been the sole survivor of a
seismic event that had tipped it ten degrees to the
southwest. A century after the quake, the structure had
been righted to vertical, except for the central portion of the
canted floor of its uppermost story, which later supplied the
name for a clandestine organization founded by influential
beings who had purchased the building sometime during
the reign of Tarsus Valorum.
Just then, Larsh Hill, draped in black robes, was standing
at the raised end of the circle, and Plagueis, 11-4D, and
ten other Muuns—also wearing black garments, though
different from the order’s hooded garb—stood at the other. Scheduled to begin at the top of the hour, the initiation
ceremony would commence with the high official joining Hill
on the circle, initiating him, and placing around his neck the
order’s signature pendant. Plagueis had declined an offer
of enrollment twenty years earlier, but had continued to do
business with the Grand Mage and many of the order’s most prominent members, several of whom were regulars
at the Gatherings on Sojourn. The Order of the Canted
Circle was content to serve as an exclusive club for some
of the galaxy’s most influential beings; its aims were narrow
in focus and its rituals universally allegorical, replete with
secret phrases and handshakes. Plagueis understood the
need to instill members with a sense of furtive fraternity, but
he couldn’t risk having the high officials dig too exhaustively
into his background. Larsh Hill’s past, on the other hand, was exemplary—even the decades he had spent working with Plagueis’s father. Once initiated, Hill would become Damask Holding’s principal agent on Coruscant, and his
son, San, would become Hego’s right hand, in preparation
for his eventual role as chairman of the InterGalactic Banking Clan. Returned from the short holocommunication with Sidious, Plagueis was filled with a sense of triumph. Before night fell
on the Fobosi district, the members of the Gran Protectorate would cease to be a concern. Pax Teem and
the rest believed they had found shelter aboard one of
Coruscant’s orbital facilities, but the Sun Guards—save for
a pair Plagueis had kept in reserve in the order’s initiation
room—were on the way to them now, in forces sufficient to
crush whatever defenses Santhe Security might be
providing. Sidious had played his part perfectly, and had
redeemed himself fully in Plagueis’s eyes. The time had
come to bring his apprentice deeper into the Sith mysteries
he had been investigating for most of his life; to introduce
him to the miracles he was performing on Aborah.
From a series of arch-topped doorways lining the
circumference of the room came the sounds of solemn
chanting as perhaps three dozen of the order’s black-robed members began to file in and take their places along the
perimeter of the Canted Circle. Last to emerge was the
high official, who wore a mask and carried the circular,
emblematic pendant draped over both hands, which he
held as if in prayer. Rituals of a similar sort had been
enacted by the ancient Sith, Plagueis thought, as Larsh Hill
genuflected before the high official. At the same instant Hill’s right knee touched the polished
stone, a jangle of foreboding laddered up Plagueis’s spine.
Turning ever so slightly, he saw that 11-4D had rotated its
head toward him in a gesture Plagueis had come to
associate with alarm. The dark side fell over him like a
shroud, but instead of acting on impulse, he restrained
himself, fearful of betraying his true nature prematurely. In
that instant of hesitation, time came to a standstill, and
several events happened at once.
The high official gave a downward tug to the pendant he
had placed around Hill’s neck, and the old Muun’s head
toppled from his shoulders and began to roll down the
tipped stage. Blood geysered from Hill’s neck, and his
body fell to one side with a thud and began to jerk back and
forth as one after another of his hearts failed. Yanking their hands from the roomy, opposite sleeves of
their robes, the hooded members of the order made
sidelong throwing motions, which sent dozens of
decapitator disks screaming through the air. Muuns to both
sides of Plagueis fell to their knees, their last breaths
caught in their throats. A disk buried deep in his forehead,
one of the Sun Guards twirled in front of Plagueis like a
crazed marionette. Blood fountained, turning to mist. Struck
in at least three places and leaking lubricant, 11-4D was
trying to limp to Plagueis’s side when another disk whirled
into its alloy body, touching off a storm of sparks and
smoke. Plagueis pressed his right hand to the right side of his
neck to discover that a disk had made off with a
considerable hunk of his jawbone and neck, and in its cruel
passing had severed his trachea and several blood
vessels. He cupped the Force against the injury to keep
himself from lapsing into unconsciousness, but he fell to the
floor regardless, with blood pumping onto the already slick
stone circle. Around him, slanted in his faltering vision, the
assassins had drawn vibroblades from the other sleeves of
the robes and were beginning a methodical advance on the
few Muuns who were still standing. A hail of bolts streaked
from the blaster cradled in the arms of the remaining Sun Guard, sweeping half a dozen hooded beings off the rim of
the circle, before he himself was butchered.
Tricked, Plagueis thought, as pained by the realization
as he was by the wound. Outmaneuvered by a group of
inferior beings who at least had had sense enough to
place artfulness above arrogance.
* * *
In his small but orderly Senate office, Palpatine gazed out
on a sliver of Coruscant. On the far side of a ceaseless
current of mid-tier traffic was the sheer cliff-face of a drab
government complex. Go about your usual business, Plagueis said. But how
could he be expected to behave as if nothing had
happened, even in the interest of establishing an alibi? Did
Plagueis expect him to return to the Uscru and finish lunch?
Go for a stroll in Monument Plaza? Keep his appointment
to meet with the inconsequential Bothan who chaired the
Finance Committee?
He stormed away from the office window, victim of his
own unreleased rage.
This was not the life he had imagined for himself ten
years earlier when he had sworn loyalty to the dark side of
the Force. His hunger to be in closer contact with the Force,
to be an even more powerful Sith, knew no bounds. But
how was he to know when he had arrived at some
semblance of mastery? When Plagueis told him?
He regarded his trembling hands. Would his ability to summon lightning come more
effortlessly? What powers had Sith Lord Plagueis kept to
himself?
He was standing in the center of the room when he
sensed someone in the corridor outside. Fists pummeled
the door; then it slid to one side and Sate Pestage burst
into the room. Seeing Palpatine, he came to a sudden
stop, and the panicked look he wore on entering
transformed to one of visible relief.
“I’ve been trying to reach you,” he nearly screamed,
running a hand over his forehead. Palpatine regarded him quizzically. “I was occupied. What has happened?” Pestage sank into a chair and looked up at him. “Are you
sure you want to know?” He paused, then said, “In the
interest of separating what I do from what you do—” Palpatine’s eyes blazed. “Stop wasting my time and
come to the point.” Pestage gritted his teeth. “The Maladian commander I
did business with during the Kim affair.”
“What of him?”
“He contacted me—two, maybe three hours ago. He said
that he felt humiliated because of the manner in which the Kim contract had been implemented, and wanted to make
it up to me. He said he’d just received word that a Maladian
faction had accepted a contract to carry out a major hit on Coruscant, involving someone closely affiliated with
Damask Holdings.” Pestage kept his eyes on Palpatine. “I
feared it might be you.” Palpatine swung back to the window to think. Had the Santhe guards planned to turn him over to the Maladians
following the holocommunication with Pax Teem?
He turned to Pestage. “Who took out the contract?
“Members of the Gran Protectorate.”
“It fits,” Palpatine said, more to himself.
“What fits?”
“Where are these Gran now?”
“As soon as I heard from the Maladian, I asked Kinman
to keep an eye on them. They’re holed up in the Malastare
ambassador’s residence.” Palpatine blinked. “Here? On Coruscant?”
“Of course, here.”
“It’s not possible that they’re offworld?”
“No, they’re downside.” Palpatine paced away from Pestage. He opened himself
fully to the Force, and was left staggered by an inrush of
overwhelming malevolence. He planted his left hand on the
desk for support and managed a stuttering inhale. Somewhere close by, the dark side was unspooling.
“Palpatine!” Pestage said from behind him.
“Hego Damask,” Palpatine said, without turning around. Pestage was too stunned to reply.
The Gran had turned the table on him! On both of them. Plagueis had been so fixed on executing his own plan that
he had neglected to consider that the Gran might also have
a plan. How, though? Howcould he have been so blind?
“Ready a speeder, Sate!” He heard Pestage leap to his feet.
“Where are we headed?”
“The Fobosi. The lodge of the Canted Circle.”
* * *
Slumped on his right side, knees drawn up to his chest,
eyes open but unmoving, Plagueis watched the second
Echani succumb to multiple stabs from the assassins’
vibroblades. With blood welling out from under Plagueis’s
cupped right hand and glistening in a pool on the floor
beneath his neck, they had taken him for dead. But now
they were moving from the body of one fallen Muun to the
next, checking for signs of life and finishing what they had
begun. A few had lowered their black hoods, revealing
themselves to be Maladians—the same group Sidious had
employed to deal with Vidar Kim.
For an instant he wondered if Sidious had secretly taken
out a second contract, but he immediately dismissed the
thought—born as it was of his not wanting to admit to
himself that the Gran had bested him. He wondered if the Maladians had actually been bold enough to kill the
prominent Canted Circle members they were
impersonating. Unlikely, given that the assassins were
known and respected for their professionalism. The members had probably been rendered unconscious by gas
or some other means. Not a meter away stood 11-4D, five decapitator disks
protruding from his alloy body and telltale lights blinking, in
the midst of a self-diagnosis routine. Having run himself
through a similar test, Plagueis knew that he had lost a
great deal of blood, and that one of his subsidiary hearts was in fibrillation. Sith techniques had helped him perform
chemical cardioversions on his other two hearts, but one of
them was working so hard to compensate that it, too, was
in danger of becoming arrhythmic. Plagueis moved his
eyes just enough to fix the locations of some of the two
dozen assassins that had survived the Sun Guards’
counterattack; then he dug deep into the Force and
catapulted himself to his feet.
The closest of the assassins swung to him with raised
vibroblades and rushed forward, only to be flung backward
off the canted stage and against the room’s curved walls. Others Plagueis felled with his hands by snapping necks
and putting his fists through armored torsos. Spreading his
arms wide, he clapped his hands together, turning every
loose object in the vicinity into a deadly projectile. But the Maladians were far from run-of-the-mill murderers. Members of the cult had killed and wounded Jedi, and in
response to confronting Force powers, they didn’t shrink or
flee but simply changed tactics, moving with astounding
agility to surround Plagueis and wait for openings.
The wait lasted only until Plagueis attempted to unleash
lightning. His second subsidiary heart failed, paralyzing him
with pain and nearly plunging him into unconsciousness.
The assassins wasted not a moment, throwing themselves
at him in groups, though in a vain attempt to penetrate the
Force shield he raised. Again he rallied, this time with a
ragged sound dredged from deep inside that erupted from
him like a sonic weapon, shattering the eardrums of those within ten meters and compelling the rest to bring their
hands to their ears.
In blinding motion his hands and feet smashed skulls and windpipes. He stopped once to conjure a Force wave that
all but atomized the bodies of six Maladians. He spun
through a turn, dragging the wave halfway around the room
to kill half a dozen more. But even that wasn’t enough to
deter his assailants. They flew against him again, making
the most of his momentary weakness to open gashes on
his arms and shoulders. Down on one knee, he levitated a Sun Guard blaster from the floor and called it toward him;
but one of the assassins succeeded in altering its trajectory
by hurling himself into the path of the airborne weapon. With nothing more than the Force of his mind, Plagueis
rattled the floor, knocking some of the assassins off their
feet, but others rushed in to take their places, slashing at
him with their vibroblades from every angle. He knew that
he had life enough to conjure one final counteroffensive. He was a moment from loosing hell on the Maladians when he
sensed Sidious enter the room. Sidious and Sate Pestage, in whose hands a repeating
blaster fashioned a hell of its own, a barrage of light that
separated limbs from torsos, hooded heads from cloaked
shoulders. Hurrying to Plagueis’s side, Sidious lifted him
upright, and in unison they brought swift death to the rest.
In the stillness that followed, 11-4D, glistening with
leaked lubricant, reenabled itself and walked stiffly to where
the two Sith were standing, syringes grasped in two of its
appendages.
“Magister Damask, I can be of service.” Plagueis extended his arm toward the droid and then
lowered himself to the floor as the drugs began to take
effect. He lifted his gaze to Pestage, then glanced at
Sidious, who, in turn, showed Pestage a look that made
abundantly clear he had become a member of their secret
fraternity, whether he wanted to or not.
“Master, we need to leave at once,” Sidious said. “What I
felt, the Jedi may have felt, and they will come.”
“Let them,” Plagueis rasped. “Let them inhale the aroma
of the dark side.”
“This carnage is beyond explanation. We can’t be here.” After a moment, Plagueis nodded and summoned a
gurgling voice. “Recall the Sun Guard. When they’re done
here—”
“No,” Sidious said. “I know where the Gran are. It won’t
be business as usual this time, Master.”
The Malastare ambassador’s residence occupied three mid-tier stories of a slender building located at the edge of
the government district. The front of the residence looked
out on the stand-alone Galactic Courts of the Justice Building, but the rear faced a narrow canyon that was more
than fifty levels deep and off limits to traffic. Following
directions furnished by Pestage, Sidious rode turbolifts and
pedestrian walkways to a meager balcony ten levels above
the upper story of the residence. His fury notwithstanding,
he would have preferred to linger until nightfall, which came
early to that part of Coruscant, but he was certain that the Gran were expecting word that the Maladians had satisfied
the terms of the contract, and he couldn’t risk having them
flee for the stars before he got to them. So he lingered on
the balcony until it and the walkway in both directions were
unoccupied, then jumped from the overlook and called on
the Force to deliver him safely to a narrow ledge that ran
beneath the lowest floor of the residence. There he perched
only for the time it took to activate the lightsaber he had
retrieved from Plagueis’s starship and use it to burn his way into a wide maintenance duct that perforated the
building at each level. Crawling to the first egress—a distance of scarcely ten meters—he lowered himself into a murky storage room and
once more called the weapon’s crimson blade from the hilt. Constructed to fit the Muun’s large hand, the lightsaber felt
unwieldy in Sidious’s, so he switched to a two-handed grip.
Moving with a caution that belied his murderous intent, and
on the alert for cams or other security devices, he eased
out of the room into a tight corridor and followed it toward
the front of the building. There, in a formal entryway, two Dugs were standing guard in a desultory way. Moving
quickly, a blur to human senses, he caught them by
surprise, splitting open the chest and abdomen of one and
beheading the other while the first was attempting to
prevent his entrails from spilling onto the glossy mosaic
floor. A brief scan of the foyer revealed the presence of
cams installed in the walls and high ceiling. He wondered
how the killings appeared to anyone monitoring a display
screen. It must have seemed as if the two Dugs had been
butchered by a phantom. Still, all the more reason to hurry. He sprinted up the stairs to the next floor, where he heard
a cacophony of human voices muffled by the thick door to a
nearby room. Blowing the door inward with a Force push,
he took a wide stance in the shattered doorway and
positioned the blade of the thrumming lightsaber vertically
in front of him. Through the weapon’s glow he saw a dozen
or more Santhe guards in uniform seated around a table
littered with food and drink containers gape at him in
disbelief before reaching for weapons fastened to their
hips or scurrying for others buried beneath the rubble of
their celebratory meal. Sidious waded into the room, returning volleys of blaster
bolts from those first to fire, then attacked, raising his left
hand to levitate two guards into midair before running his
blade through each of them. Snarling like a beast, he whirled through a circle, ridding three guards of their heads
and cutting a fourth in half at the waist. The blade impaled a
guard who had flattened himself to the floor in abject terror,
then went straight into the shrieking mouth of the last of
them. As that one collapsed in a heap, Sidious caught a
glimpse of himself in an ornate mirror: face contorted in
rage, red hair in electrified disarray, mouth webbed with
strands of thick saliva, eyes a radioactive shade of yellow. He flew back to the stairwell and raced to the top of the
next flight, which opened into a large room filled with female Gran and younglings, along with Gran and Dug servants.
Having heard the commotion from below, some were
already on their huge flat feet; others, though, were too
shocked to move. All the better for him, and he left not a single one of them
alive.
Then: through a warren of expensively appointed rooms
to another set of closed doors, from behind which issued
the sounds of a banquet in progress—one that had
probably commenced hours earlier and wasn’t meant to
end until hours later, with the deaths of Senator Palpatine, Hego Damask, and the other Muuns an accomplished fact. Now Sidious gave full vent to his ire. Crashing through
the doors, he landed in the center of a table covered with
plates of grains and grassy plants and surrounded by a
herd of grazing Gran, whose boisterous laughs froze in their
throats. From the head of the table, Pax Teem gawked at
him as if he might be a creature escaped from his most
horrifying nightmare. And yet he wouldn’t be the first to taste Plagueis’s blade but the last: once he had been forced to watch the rest of his party butchered, from hooves to
eyestalks; the painted ceiling brought down by Sidious’s
Force pull; the flames of a gentle gas blaze in the room’s
fireplace incited to a blistering inferno that Sidious tugged
behind him as he soared from the table to the floor and
closed on his final victim.
In desperate flight from the Sith and the spreading
flames, Pax Teem had backed himself to a tall window
framed by floor-to-ceiling curtains. Entreaties of whatever
sort tried to thrust themselves through his stricken voice box
and past his square teeth, but none succeeded. Deactivating the lightsaber, Sidious beckoned the
flames with his fingers, encouraging them to leap from the
table to the curtains. A bleating scream finally emerged
from Teem’s narrow muzzle of a mouth as the blazing fabric
collapsed around him, and Sidious watched him roast to
death.
21: INVESTITURE
Assassinations, murders, and other crimes were no match
for the codes of silence that had governed the Order of the Canted Circle, the Gran Protectorate, Santhe Security, and
the Jedi High Council almost since their inceptions. Had
the elite members and private guards of the Canted Circle
not been drugged and found unconscious in dressing
rooms and other places, police investigators summoned to
the headquarters by two Jedi Knights would never have
been allowed to enter the landmark building, let alone the
order’s vaunted initiation room, in which were discovered
the bodies of two Echani, believed to be bodyguards; a
dozen Muuns, killed by decapitator disks and vibroblades;
and three times that number of Maladian assassins
dressed in borrowed robes, who had succumbed to blaster
bolts, blunt-force injuries, and, in some cases, traumatic
amputations. So scattered were the latter, investigators
initially suspected that an explosive device had been
detonated, but no trace of a device was ever uncovered.
The Muuns were quickly identified as top-ranking members
of a clandestine financial group known as Damask
Holdings, though its wealthy founder and chief operating
officer, Hego Damask, was believed to have survived the
sneak attack. The Jedi who had alerted the police never
revealed what had drawn them to the Fobosi district to
begin with, or why they expressed such interest in the case. As well, the members of the Order of the Canted Circle
refused to answer any questions. At the Malastare embassy in the heart of Coruscant the
evidence was even more baffling, and complicated by a fire
and ensuing gas explosion that had swept through the
building. Fire marshals and forensics specialists were
picking through the charred remains of the three-story
resiblock when two members of the Jedi Council had paid
an unannounced visit. Again, the Jedi had declined to
explain their actions, but the police were able to make
progress on their own. The amount of blood residue
discovered at the scene led investigators to determine that,
prior to the arrival of the police, several bodies had been
incinerated on site, which suggested the work of elements
of organized crime. In the wake of the recent assassination
of Senator Vidar Kim, the Senate Investigatory Committee
formed a special task force to look into the matter. Many
beings were interviewed and interrogated, and many
security cam recordings studied during the course of the
investigation, but most of the principal players and witnesses hid behind their lawyers, even when threatened with imprisonment for obstruction of justice.
A standard month after the events on Coruscant, Plagueis
summoned Sidious to Muunilinst. Sidious had visited the High Port skyhook but had never been invited downside,
and now he found himself soaring over one of the planet’s
unspoiled blue oceans in a stylish airspeeder piloted by
two Sun Guards. As the speeder approached Aborah, he
settled deeply into the Force and was rewarded with a
vision of the mountain island as a transcendent vortex of
dark energy unlike anything he had ever experienced. It was something he would have expected to encounter only
on Korriban or some other Sith world.
The droid 11-4D—fully repaired—was waiting for him on
the landing zone and led him inside, leaving the guards to wait with the airspeeder.
“You appear to be in much better condition than when I
last saw you, droid,” Sidious remarked as a turbolift
dropped them deep inside the complex.
“Yes, Senator Palpatine, Aborah is a restorative place.”
“And Magister Damask?”
“I leave it to you to judge for yourself, sir.” Exiting the turbolift, the first thing to catch Sidious’s eye was the library: rack after rack of texts, scrolls, disks, and
holocrons—all the data he had been craving since his
apprenticeship began. He ran his hands lovingly over the
shelves but barely had time to revel in his excitement when
11-4D ushered him onto a descending ramp that led into what might have been a state-of-the-art medical research
facility.
His eyes darting from one device to the next, he asked,
“Is this new since the Magister’s injuries?”
“Only some of what you see,” the droid said. “For the most part this area is unchanged since I was first brought
here.”
“And when was that?”
“Approximately one standard year before I was
introduced to you on Chandrila, sir.” Sidious considered it, then asked, “Is Magister Damask
your maker, droid?”
“No, sir. He is simply my present master.” Deeper in the complex, they moved past cages
containing as many creatures as could be found in a wellstocked zoo. OneOne-FourDee indicated a cluster
separate from the rest.
“These are the Magister’s most recent pregnancies.”
“The Magister’s?” Sidious repeated in bewilderment.
“His success rate has improved.” Sidious was still trying to make sense of the droid’s
statements when they entered a long corridor lined with windowless cells. Through the Force he could sense lifeforms behind each locked door.
“Captives?”
“Oh, no, sir,” 11-4D said. “Ongoing experiments.” As they turned a corner at the end of the corridor Sidious
came to a dead stop. Centered in a kind of operating
theater stood a towering bacta tank, in which floated a male Bith.
“That is Venamis,” Plagueis said in a voice that wasn’t
entirely his. Sidious pivoted to see his Master limp into the room, mouth, chin, and neck concealed behind a breath mask or
transpirator of some sort. Most of the vibroblade wounds
had healed, but his skin looked especially wan. Sidious
had been wondering if Plagueis had been weakened by the
attack, but he saw now that, for all the punishment his body
had sustained at the hands of the Maladian assassins, the Muun was no less strong in the Force.
“Your thoughts betray you,” Plagueis said. “Do you think
that Malak’s powers were weakened by Revan’s
lightsaber? Bane by being encrusted in orbalisks? Do you
think Gravid’s young apprentice was hindered by the
prosthesis she was forced to wear after fighting him?”
“No, Master.”
“Soon I will be stronger than you can possibly imagine.” Plagueis forced himself to swallow, then said, “But come, we have much to discuss.” Sidious followed him into a cool chamber, furnished only with a bed, two simple chairs, a cabinet, and a square,
exquisitely woven rug. Motioning Sidious into one of the
chairs, Plagueis lowered himself with noticeable difficulty
into the other. After a long moment of silence, he nodded in
satisfaction.
“I am pleased to see how greatly you have changed—
how powerful you have become, Lord Sidious. What
happened on Coruscant was meant to happen, but I take
consolation in the fact that the events have shaped you into
a true Sith Lord. You are indeed ready to learn the secrets I
have been safeguarding.”
“What is this place, Master?” Plagueis took a moment to gather enough strength to
continue. “Think of it as a vessel that contains all the things
to which I am devoted. All the things I love.”
“This may be the first time I have ever heard you utter the word.”
“Only because no other term exists that adequately
expresses my unconditional attachment to the creatures
and beings with whom I share this place. Love without
compassion, however, for compassion has no part in this.”
“The Bith—Venamis …”
“Dispatched by Tenebrous to test me—to eliminate me
had I failed. But Venamis has been a gift; essential in
helping me unlock some of the deepest secrets of the
Force. Every creature you have glimpsed or sensed here
has been a similar blessing, as you will see when I lead you
into the mysteries.”
“What did the droid mean when it said the Magister’s
pregnancies?” Beneath the breath mask, Plagueis might have quirked a
smile. “It means that the pregnancies were not achieved by
normal means of conception, but rather through the Force.” Surprise and disbelief mingled in Sidious’s blue eyes.
“The Force?”
“Yes,” Plagueis said pensively. “But I failed to exercise
due caution. As we attempt to wrest the powers of life and
death from the Force, as we seek to tip the balance, the
Force resists our efforts. Action and reaction, Sidious. Something akin to the laws of thermodynamics. I have been
audacious, and the Force has tested me the way
Tenebrous sought to. Midi-chlorians are not easily
persuaded to execute the dictates of one newly initiated in
the mysteries. The Force needs to be won over, especially
in work that involves the dark side. It must be reassured that
a Sith is capable of accepting authority. Otherwise it will
thwart one’s intentions. It will engineer misfortune. It will
strike back.”
“The Maladians—”
“Perhaps. But in any case this is why the Jedi Order has
descended into decadence and is dragging the Republic
down with it. Because the Jedi have lost the allegiance of
the Force. Yes, their ability to draw energy from the Force
continues, but their ability to use the Force has diminished. Each of their actions engenders an opposite, often
unrecognized consequence that elevates those attuned to
the dark side; that buoys the efforts of the Sith and
increases our power. Yet our use of that power requires
delicacy. We must be alert to moments when the light side
falters and openings are created. Then, and only then—
when all the conditions have been met—can we act without
fear of meeting resistance or repercussion.
“To say that the Force works in mysterious ways is to
admit one’s ignorance, for any mystery can be solved
through the application of knowledge and unrelenting effort. As we had our way with the Senate, and as we will soon
have our way with the Republic and the Jedi, we will have
our way with the Force.” Silenced by awe, Sidious scarcely knew how to respond.
“What would you have me do, Master?”
The transpirator emitted a series of tones, and Plagueis
inhaled deeply. “I will relocate to Sojourn in order to devote myself fully to our investigations, to furthering the
imperative, and to healing myself.”
“What will become of Aborah?”
“For the time being it can serve as a repository.”
“And Damask Holdings?”
“The group will not be re-formed, though Imay continue to
host annual Gatherings. And I will tutor San Hill personally,
to prepare him for assuming chairmanship of the Banking
Clan.”
“Why do we need them?”
In a harsh whisper, Plagueis said, “Because war is now
on the agenda, Sidious. But our actions must be
circumspect, restricted to those star systems rife with petty
conflicts, where appropriate beings can be encouraged,
appropriate operations can be funded … We must arrange
for worlds in the Outer Rim to suffer while the Core
prospers. Pathetic as those worlds may be, we have no
choice but to use what we have at hand.
“The IBC will be essential in financing the war we will
slowly foment. We will need the Banking Clan to finance the manufacturers of weapons and to sustain an alternative
economy for the eventual enemies of the Republic.” Plagueis looked directly at Sidious. “Our success will be measured by signs and portents. There is much you need
to learn regarding the Yinchorri and the Kaminoans. But all
in due time. For now, Sidious, know that you are the blade we will drive through the heart of the Senate, the Republic,
and the Jedi Order, and I, your guide to reshaping the
galaxy. Together we are the newborn stars that complete
the Sith constellation.” Sidious touched the cleft in his chin. “I’m relieved to learn
that I didn’t disappoint you, Master. But the Jedi summoned
the police to the Fobosi district moments after we left. The
plan is already endangered.” Color rose in Plagueis’s cheeks. “The Jedi have long
known that the dark side has been reawakened and cannot
be checked by them. Now they have felt it on their own Coruscant.”
“Even so, we can’t continue to risk exposure,” Sidious
said carefully. Plagueis studied him. “You have more to say about this.”
“Master, would you consider training someone in the Sith
arts to execute whatever missions are required?”
“Another Venamis? In defiance of our partnership?” Sidious shook his head. “Not an apprentice; not
someone who could ever aspire to become a true Sith
Lord. But someone skilled in stealth and combat, who could
be eliminated when no longer needed.”
Surprise shone in Plagueis’s eyes. “You already have
someone in mind.”
“You instructed me to keep an eye out for beings who might prove helpful. I found such a one on Dathomir not a
year ago. A male Dathomiri Zabrak infant.”
“Many Zabrak demonstrate strength in the Force. By
nature, it would seem.”
“This infant does. The mother birthed two and sought to
save one from the clutches of the Nightsisters, especially
from one known as Talzin.”
“You purchased him?”
“Accepted him.”
“Where is he?”
“I brought him to the accounting facility that Damask
Holdings maintains on Mustafar, and left him in the care of
the custodial droids.” Plagueis closed his eyes briefly. Mustafar had served as
a place to dispose of enemies and evidence long before Boss Cabra’s reclamation station had been made
available to Hego Damask and others.
“And the mother?” he asked.
“Alive—for now.”
“Might not this Talzin pursue the infant?” Sidious looked inward. “She may.” Plagueis growled in irritation. “Then it will be your
business if she does.” Sidious bowed his head in acceptance.
“Leave the infant on Mustafar in the care of the droids,” Plagueis added at last, “but begin to train him. Inure him to
pain, Lord Sidious, so that he will be able to serve us fully. Should his Force talents fail to mature, eliminate him. But if
he measures up, relocate him at your discretion to Orsis.
There you will find an elite training center operated by a
Falleen combat specialist named Trezza. He and I have
had dealings. Trezza will raise the Zabrak to be fierce but
steadfast in his loyalty. You, however, will supervise his
training in the dark side. Do not speak of the Sith or our
plans until he has proven himself. And do not deploy him
against any of our salient enemies until I have had a chance
to evaluate him.” Sidious inclined his head. “I understand, Master.”
“The Force provides, Sidious,” Plagueis said after a
moment. “As nature provides more male beings in the
aftermath of war, the Force, ever mindful of balance,
provides beings strong in the dark side when light has ruled
for too long. This Zabrak bodes well.”
“The Sith Lords who follow us will pay tribute to your wisdom, Master,” Sidious said in earnestness. Plagueis stood and touched him on the shoulder. “No,
Lord Sidious. Because we are the end of the line.” He
gestured broadly. “Everything done here has been for a
single purpose: to extend our reign indefinitely.”

22: ORDINARY BEINGS
The crepuscular chill of the Senate Rotunda had a way of
lulling many to sleep. Sharpening his senses, Palpatine
could hear the gentle snoring of human and nonhuman Senators seated in hover platforms adjacent to his station; more clearly, Sate Pestage and Kinman Doriana, opposite
him on the platform’s circular seat, gossiping maliciously.
For twenty years now Naboo and the Chommell sector had
occupied the same place in the same tier in that immense mushroom of a building, though platforms had been added
above and below and to both sides over those two
decades to accommodate representatives of worlds newly welcomed to the Republic. Also in those twenty years, Palpatine had sat—and admittedly napped—through the
orations, diatribes, and filibusters of countless beings, as well as State of the Republic addresses by four Supreme Chancellors: Darus, Frix, Kalpana, and Finis Valorum. The
last was nearing completion of a second term of office that
had been beset with challenges, most of which could be
traced—but wouldn’t be for decades to come—to the machinations of Hego Damask and his secret conspirator, Palpatine, in their guises as Sith Lords Plagueis and
Sidious. But in fact, half the Senators in the Rotunda were
leading double lives of one sort or another: pledging
themselves to preserve the Republic while at the same time
accepting bribes from the Trade Federation, facilitating
slavery and the smuggling of spice and death sticks, or
abetting the operations of pirates.
The words of the ancient Republic philosopher Shassium
drifted into Palpatine’s mind: We are all two-faced beings,
divided by the Force and fated for eternity to search out
our hidden identities.
From the Rotunda’s tall pulpit, Supreme Chancellor Valorum was saying, “The crisis unfolding in the Yinchorr
system offers further proof that, in our determination to maintain an era of prosperity in the Core, we have allowed
the outer systems to become lawless realms, with pirates,
slavers, smugglers, and arms merchants operating with
impunity. Proscribed matériel and technologies find their way to species whose appeals for Republic aid have gone
unanswered, and the outcome is antagonism and
intersystem conflict. Brought together by mutual need,
alliances of forgotten worlds turn to the galactic cartels to
furnish what we have denied them: growth, protection, and
security—along with weapons and combat training.” He
gestured broadly to near and distant Senatorial platforms.
“While we sit in cool comfort, a confederacy of the
disenfranchised expands in the Outer Rim.” Close by, someone yawned with theatrical exaggeration,
eliciting a chorus of laughter from beings seated within
earshot. The Senate should have been on vacation, but the
crisis in the Expansion Region had forced Valorum to
convene the governing body in special session. Across the Rotunda from Naboo’s station, Yinchorr’s
platform stood vacant—the result of the Yinchorri severing
ties with the Republic six months earlier and recalling their
diplomatic staff. Six months before that, and armed with weapons Darth Sidious had helped them procure, the Yinchorri had launched attacks on several worlds in
neighboring systems. Supplied by a Devaronian smuggler,
the clandestine shipments had included a cortosis shield
from a secret mining operation on the planet Bal’demnic,
and had factored into the deaths of a pair of unsuspecting
Jedi. Plagueis had said that the Yinchorri could be incited with minimal provocation, but even Sidious had been
surprised by their ferocity.
“Since Yinchorr became a member world twenty-five
years ago,” Valorum continued, “and notwithstanding the
sanctions we attempted to impose, we have allowed the Yinchorri to transform themselves into a militaristic force
that now threatens a vast region of Republic space. Just six months ago, when they augmented their navy with vessels
commandeered from the Golden Nyss shipyards, we voted
to censure them rather than intercede, in adherence to an
antiquated belief that responsibility for policing the outer
systems rests with the worlds that make up those systems. Ultimately, following Yinchorr’s most recent attack on the Chalenor system, the Jedi were persuaded to intervene,
but with grievous results.” Valorum halted briefly.
“As some of you already know, the mutilated bodies of
Jedi Knight Naeshahn and her Padawan, Ebor Taulk, were
transported to Coruscant and somehow delivered to my
office in the chancellery building.” He balled his fist for
everyone to see. “This is when I say that enough is enough!” Palpatine steepled his fingers. Valorum was trying hard
to be stirring, but the sudden edge in his voice was blunted
by the reaction of his audience, which was rote outrage at
best. A call for quiet by the Bothan vice chancellor was
scarcely necessary. Valorum composed himself for the hovercams, his
flushed expression meant to convey indignation rather than
embarrassment.
“The Jedi have since dispatched a larger force to bring
to justice those responsible for this barbaric act, and to
drive the Yinchorri back onto their own world. But I fear that
their efforts won’t be enough. Since we can’t very well
station Jedi or Judicials there as an occupying force, I am
asking this body to sanction the use of private
paramilitaries to enforce a technological blockade of
Yinchorr that will prevent the Yinchorri from rearming and
renewing their nefarious dreams of conquest.”
The shouts of assent and condemnation that met
Valorum’s request were genuine, as were the Bothan vice
chancellor’s calls for order. Finally, Valorum raised his
voice to be heard.
“Militant expansionism cannot be tolerated! Precedent
for the use of paramilitaries was established under Supreme Chancellor Kalpana during the Stark Combine Conflict, as well as in the more recent Yam’rii crisis. In both
cases, diplomatic solutions followed, and it is my belief that
diplomacy will succeed in the Yinchorr system.” Valorum’s political career had been forged during the
Stark Hyperspace War. Now, Palpatine thought, he begins
to sound like his onetime rival Ranulph Tarkin. He waited for the Rotunda to quiet. “The events at
Yinchorr speak to the greater challenge we now face. The Cularin system—our newest member—finds itself plagued
by pirate attacks. The same is true at Dorvalla, in the
Videnda sector. The so-called free-trade zones have
become battlegrounds between defenseless worlds and
corporate giants like the Trade Federation, or criminal
cartels like Black Sun, which are squeezing these outlying
systems dry.”
In an act of what some deemed fair play and others
political guile, the vice chancellor took that moment to allow
the Trade Federation’s platform to leave its docking station
and hover into the dark chill of the Rotunda.
“With the Bothan’s customary impeccable timing,” Pestage remarked to Doriana.
The Trade Federation’s Senator was an unctuous Neimoidian named Lott Dod, whose sussurant, snake
charmer’s voice wafted through the hall’s enunciators. “I must protest the Supreme Chancellor’s accusations.” His words didn’t convey anger so much as the arrogance of wealth—a strategy he had learned from his predecessor, Nute Gunray. “Should the Trade Federation be expected to
absorb the losses it has sustained because of pirate
attacks? The Republic refuses to create a military to police
those sectors while at the same time prohibiting us from
protecting our cargoes with defensive weapons or droid
soldiers.”
“Now is not the time for this argument, Senator,” Valorum
said, showing the palms of his soft hands. But a hundred voices overruled him.
“If not now, then when, Supreme Chancellor?” The
question came from the wheedling, cranial-horned
humanoid magistrate of the Corporate Alliance, Passel
Argente. “How many cargoes will the Trade Federation or
the Commerce Guild have to lose before we arrive at the
proper moment to air this debate. If the Republic cannot
protect us, then we have no recourse but to protect
ourselves.” Again Valorum’s face flushed. “In every crisis we have
dispatched paramilitary forces—”
“With impressive results.” The interruption came from
Lavina Durada-Vashne Wren, the human female
representative of the newly admitted Cularin system. “The
Thaereian military made quick work of the pirates who were raiding our transports.” Raucous laughter drowned out the rest of her words.
“The only thing Colonel Tramsig did at Cularin was make
himself more contemptible!” Twi’lek Senator Orn Free Taa
bellowed from his platform. “The good Senator from Cularin was merely deceived by his dubious charms.” Argente spoke once more. “Does the Supreme Chancellor advocate that each system have a paramilitary
force at its command? If so, then why not a pan-galactic military?” Palpatine’s eyes sparkled in sadistic delight. Valorum
was getting everything he deserved. He had demonstrated
some diplomatic skill during the Stark Hyperspace War, but
his election to the chancellorship had more to do with a
pedigree that included three Supreme Chancellors and
deals he had cut with influential families like the Kalpanas
and the Tarkins of Eriadu. His adulation of the Jedi Order was well known; less so his hypocrisy—much of his family wealth derived from lucrative contracts his ancestors had
entered into with the Trade Federation. His election seven
years earlier had been one of the signs Plagueis had been waiting for—the return to power of a Valorum—and had
followed on the heels of a remarkable breakthrough
Plagueis and Sidious had engineered in manipulating midichlorians. A breakthrough the Muun had described as
“galactonic.” Both of them suspected that the Jedi had
sensed it as well, light-years distant on Coruscant.
“There will be no Republic military,” Valorum was saying,
having taken Argente’s bait. “The Ruusan Reformations must be upheld. A military force has to be financed. Taxes
imposed on the outlying systems would only add to their
burden and lead to talk of secession.”
“Then let the Core Worlds pay!” someone seated below
Palpatine shouted.
“The Core has no need of a military force!” the Kuati
Senator responded. “We know how to live in peace with
one another!”
“Why are the Jedi unable to serve as a military?” the Senator from Ord Mantell asked. Valorum turned to look at him. “The Jedi are not an army,
and they number too few, in any case. They intercede at our
request, but also at their own discretion. Furthermore, the Order has seen more deaths in the past twelve years than it
saw in the previous fifty. Yinchorr is fast shaping up to be
another Galidraan.” Palpatine took secret pleasure in Valorum’s reference,
since what had occurred at Galidraan had been clear
evidence of the dark side acting in concert with his and
Plagueis’s subterfuges. Most important, for Plagueis the
provincial conflict had had a devastating effect on Jedi
Master Dooku, deepening his schism with the High Council
regarding its decisions to deploy the Jedi as warriors.
“Once again we come full circle.” Orn Free Taa’s voice
boomed through the Rotunda. “The Republic can find the
credits to contract with private militaries but not to raise a military of its own. And yet the Supreme Chancellor sees fit
to lecture us on antiquated thinking. Why not simply turn
those credits over to the outlying systems and let them do
their own contracting?”
“Perhaps the Senator from Ryloth has touched on
something,” Valorum said when the applause died down.
“Better still, perhaps the time has come to impose a tax on
the free-trade zones to supply the outlying systems with the
funds they require.” Palpatine reclined in the platform’s padded seat as
angry rebuttals spewed from the stations of the Rim Faction worlds, as well as from those belonging to the Trade
Federation, the Commerce Guild, the Techno Union, and
the Corporate Alliance. How wonderfully and predictably
the Senate had deteriorated over the course of twenty
years. As had so many ordinary and extraordinary
sessions, this one would end in chaos, with nothing
resolved.
For the screens that filled the Rotunda, hovercams
captured Valorum’s sad expression of impotence. Soon, very soon, it would fall to Palpatine to impose
order on everyone.
Outside the curved walls of the Senate, the crises in the
outlying systems had little effect on the lives of the billions who resided on Coruscant. Beings living in the lower levels
continued to do their best to survive, while those living
closer to the sky continued to spend lavishly on food, fine
cloaks, and tickets to the opera, which Valorum had
returned to fashion. Palpatine was an exception to the rule.
In what sometimes seemed to him like perpetual motion, he met frequently with his peers in the Senate, listening
carefully to what each had to say about galactic events, but
not so carefully that any had reason to suspect him of being
anything other than a career politician, fixed on enhancing
his profile. If there was anything that set him apart, it was an
impression he gave of taking his job perhaps too seriously. With just over a year remaining in Valorum’s second term
of office, the chancellorship was up for grabs, and those who knew Palpatine best suspected that he might actually
pursue the position if asked. His equivocations on the matter only made him more desirable to those who thought
he could bring something new to the mix—an authentic
centrist viewpoint. Others questioned why, given the
unprecedented challenges of the times, he or anyone else would aspire to the position. Several days after the Senate met in special session, Palpatine violated the privacy he so valued to host an
informal gathering in his suite in 500 Republica. The move
to Coruscant’s most exclusive address had coincided with
Ars Veruna’s ascent to the Naboo monarchy twelve years
earlier. Veruna’s victory had hinged on a renegotiated
contract with the Trade Federation for Naboo’s plasma,
although it was widely believed that the King and his
cronies had fared better from the deal than the citizens of
Naboo. Unlike the apartment Palpatine had occupied when
he first arrived on the capital world, this one had a dozen
rooms and views of the government district surpassed only
by those from the building’s spacious penthouses. The
neuranium-and-bronzium statue of Sistros—which still
concealed the lightsaber he had constructed early in his
apprenticeship—shared space with antiquities that had
been procured from remote worlds.
Fashionably late, Finis Valorum was one of the last
guests to arrive. Palpatine welcomed him at the door, while
a contingent of cloaked and helmeted Republic guards
took up positions in the corridor. The Supreme Chancellor’s round face looked drawn, and perspiration
beaded his clean-shaven upper lip. Clinging to his arm like
an adornment was Sei Taria, ostensibly his administrative
aide but also his lover. Just inside the threshold, Valorum
hooked his thumbs in the wide blue cummerbund that
cinched his robe and stopped to take in the suite and nod
in appreciation.
“What the HoloNet newshounds would give to see this.”
“It’s hardly a penthouse,” Palpatine said dismissively.
“Not yet, he means,” Corellia’s Senator remarked,
causing several others to lift their drink goblets in a kind of
toast. Palpatine pretended to mask embarrassment. Once he would have been acting; now he wore the guise of Naboo’s Senator as effortlessly as he wore his robes and cloak.
“Journalists are more than welcome to visit,” he said. Valorum cocked a silver eyebrow in doubt.
“Now that you’ve gotten them accustomed to
transparency and accessibility,” Palpatine added. Valorum laughed without mirth. “For all the good it has
done me.” Sei Taria broke an awkward silence. “You certainly make
no secret of your favorite color, Senator.” The lids of her
oblique eyes were colored to match the burgundy of her
septsilk robe; her dark hair was twisted into an elaborate
bun behind her head, while in front, bangs bisected her
flawless forehead.
“Scarlet figures prominently in the crest of my ancestral
house,” Palpatine explained evenly.
“And yet you favor black and blue in everything you wear.” Palpatine’s thin smile held. “I’m flattered that you notice.”
Taria’s expression turned devious. “Many have taken
notice of you, Senator.” Servants hurried over to take Valorum’s and Taria’s veda
cloth cloaks.
“I hired them expressly for the evening,” Palpatine said
quietly. “I’m a solitary man at heart.”
Taria spoke before Valorum could. “The title of the latest
HoloNet piece about you, if I’m not mistaken. The Senator who turned his back on a vast fortune to devote himself to
politics. Who worked his way up from Naboo’s legislative
body to the ambassadorship to the Galactic Senate …” She smiled without showing her teeth. “A heartwarming
story.”
“And every word of it true,” Palpatine said. “From a
certain point of view.”
The three of them shared a laugh, and then Palpatine led
them deeper into the press of guests, all of whom were well
disposed toward Valorum. There was no one in the suite
the Supreme Chancellor didn’t know, and he greeted every
one of them by name. The ability to make beings feel as if
they mattered to him, personally as well as politically, was
one of his few strengths. A protocol droid delivered drinks on a tray, and Valorum
and Taria helped themselves to glasses. When Valorum’s
trophy excused herself to make conversation with the wife
of Alderaanian Senator Bail Antilles, Palpatine steered
Valorum into the suite’s main room.
“How is it that you manage to enjoy the support of both
the Core and Rim Factions?” Valorum asked in genuine
interest.
“A consequence of Naboo’s location more than anything
else. Mine is something of a displaced world—located in
the Rim but sharing the sensibilities of many of the Core worlds.” Valorum gestured to a figurine in a wall niche.
“Exquisite.”
“Quite. A gift from Senator Eelen Li.”
“From Triffis.” Palpatine reoriented the figurine slightly. “A museum
piece, actually.” Valorum continued along the wall, indicating a second
piece. “And this?”
“A ceremonial Gran wind drum. Over one thousand years
old.” He glanced out of the corner of his eye at Valorum. “A
present from Baskol Yeesrim.” Valorum nodded. “Senator Ainlee Teem’s aide. I didn’t
realize you were on good terms with the Gran Protectorate.” Palpatine shrugged. “For a time I wasn’t—owing to a
long-standing feud over Naboo’s abstention in a Senatorial
vote of some significance at the time, but ancient history
now.” Valorum lowered his voice to ask, “Do you think you
could bring Malastare over to my side?” Palpatine swung to look at him. “Regarding the embargo
of Yinchorr? Possibly. But not on the matter of taxing the
free-trade zones. Both Ainlee Teem and Aks Moe have
become allies of the Trade Federation.”
“An even more bewildering reversal.” Valorum sighed.
“Friends become enemies; enemies, friends … I suspect
I’m going to have to call in every political favor I’m owed to
succeed at Yinchorr.” He compressed his lips and shook
his head. “I fear my legacy is on the line here, old friend. I’ve
only one year left of my term, but I’m determined to see
things though.” Palpatine conjured a compassionate tone. “If it’s any
solace, I support the use of a paramilitary force—even at
the risk of escalating the crisis—if only to silence those who
have accused the Republic of being spineless.” Valorum clapped Palpatine on the shoulder. “Your
support is appreciated.” He looked around the room, then
asked even more quietly, “Whom can I count on, Palpatine?” Palpatine’s eyes scanned the crowd, alighting briefly on
two human males, an Anx who wouldn’t have fit in a room
with lower ceilings, an Ithorian, and finally a Tarnab.
“Antilles. Com Fordox. Horox Ryyder. Tendau Bendon. Perhaps Mot-Not-Rab …” Valorum eyed them in turn, then let his gaze settle on a Rodian. “Farr?” Palpatine laughed to himself; Onaconda Farr thought of
politics the way his Rodian brethren thought of bounty
hunting: Shoot first; ask questions later.
“He’s a militant, but I may be able to persuade him, as he
enjoys close ties with House Naberrie, of Naboo.”
“Tikkes?” Valorum asked, gazing covertly at the Quarren Senator, whose facial tentacles were manipulating snacks
into his mouth.
“Tikkes will want something in return, but yes.” Valorum’s pale blue eyes found Wookiee Senator Yarua. Palpatine nodded. “Kashyyyk will support you.” Valorum drained his drink glass and set it aside. “And my opponents?”
“Aside from the obvious ones? The entire Ryloth group—
Orn Free Taa, Connus Trell, and Chom Frey Kaa. Also
Toonbuck Toora, Edcel Bar Gan, Po Nudo … Do you want me to go on?” Valorum looked discouraged as they stepped out onto
the balcony. A tone sounded, indicating that the noise
cancellation feature had been activated. Valorum continued
to the railing and stared off into the distance.
“A rare dark night,” he said after a moment. Palpatine joined him at the railing. “Weather control is
brewing a storm.” He turned slightly to adjust the noise
cancellation system. “Listen: peals of thunder over The Works. And there,” he added, pointing, “lightning.”
“How unnatural it seems here. If only we might be as
easily cleansed as this vast sky and these monumental
buildings.” Palpatine glanced at him. “The Senate has obstructed
you, but you’ve brought no dishonor to the office.” Valorum considered it. “I knew when my first term began
that I would face opposition; that events had been spiraling
out of control since the Stark Conflict. But since then I’ve
sensed a darkness approaching from the outer reaches of
the galaxy to shake Coruscant to its foundations. You would
think, after a thousand years of peace, that the Republic would be unshakable, but that isn’t the case. I’ve always
placed my faith in the Force, believing that if I acted in
accordance with its guiding principles, the galaxy would act
in kind.” Palpatine frowned in the dark. “The Republic has grown
unwieldy. We are coerced and cajoled into deals that
compromise our integrity. We are criticized as much for what we do as what we don’t do. Most beings in the Core
couldn’t point to Yinchorr in a star map, and yet the crisis
there becomes your problem.” Valorum nodded in a distracted way. “We can’t stand by
and do nothing. The Jedi express as much in private, and
yet even they are divided. If Master Dooku becomes any more vocal in his criticisms of the Senate and the Order,
the Council may have to restrict him to the Temple.” He fell
silent, then said, “Well, I certainly don’t have to tell you. People tell me you’ve become his confidant.”
Instead of responding to that comment, Palpatine said,
“And Master Yoda?”
“Inscrutable as ever,” Valorum said. “But troubled, I think.” Palpatine turned away from him slightly. “The Jedi have
faced down darkness in the past.”
“True. But a study of history reveals that they have been
defeated by it, as well.”
“Then the outcome is not in our grasp.”
Valorum raised his gaze to the night sky. “Whose, then?”
23: UNDER THE MIDNIGHT SUN
Just arrived on the Hunters’ Moon, Sidious studied
Plagueis as the Sith Lord and his droid, 11-4D, viewed a
holorecording of a black-robed Zabrak assassin making
short work of combat automata in his home on Coruscant,
some hovering, some advancing on two legs, others on
treads, and all firing blasters.
Twenty years had added a slight stoop to the Muun’s
posture and veins that stood out under his thinning white
skin. He wore a dark green utility suit that hugged his
delicate frame, a green cloak that fell from his bony
shoulders to the fort’s stone floor, and a headpiece that
hewed to his large cranium. A triangular breath mask
covered his ruined, prognathus lower jaw, his mouth, part of
his long neck, and what remained of the craggy nose he’d
had before the surprise attack in the Fobosi. A device of
his own invention, the alloy mask featured two vertical slits
and a pair of thin, stiff conduits that linked it to a transpirator
affixed to his upper chest, beneath an armored torso
harness. He had learned to ingest and imbibe through
feeding tubes, and through his nose. Seen through the Force, he was a nuclear oval of mottled
light, a rotating orb of terrifying energy. If the Maladian
attack had weakened him physically, it had also helped to
shape his etheric body into a vessel sufficiently strong to
contain the full power of the dark side. Determined never
again to be caught off guard, he had trained himself to go without sleep, and had devoted two standard decades to
day-and-ni ght experimentation with midi-chlorian manipulation and attempts to wrest a few last secrets from
the Force, so that he—and presumably his human
apprentice—might live forever. His inward turn had enabled
him to master the equally powerful energies of order and
disorder, creation and entropy, life and death.
“You have made him fearsome,” Plagueis remarked without turning from the recording, as the athletic Zabrak
cleaved a Colicoid Eradicator droid down the middle and whirled to cut two others in half. The yellow-eyed
humanoid’s hairless head bore a crown of small horns and
geometrical patterns of black and red markings.
“Fearless, as well,” Sidious said.
“Still, they are only droids.”
“He’s even more formidable against living beings.” Plagueis looked over his shoulder, his eyes narrowed in
question. “You’ve fought him in a serious way?” Reconstructed vocal chords and trachea imparted a metallic quality to his voice, as if he were speaking through
an enunciator.
“I stranded him on Hypori for a month without food and with only a horde of assassin droids for company. Then I
returned to goad and challenge him. All things considered,
he fought well, even after I deprived him of his lightsaber. He wanted to kill me, but was prepared to die at my hand.” Plagueis turned fully to face him. “Rather than punish him
for disobedience, you praised his resolve.”
“He was already humbled. I chose to leave his honor
intact. I proclaimed him my myrmidon; the embodiment of
the violent half of our partnership.”
“Partnership?” Plagueis repeated harshly.
“His and mine; not ours.”
“Regardless, you allowed him to believe that he is more
skilled than he actually is.”
“Did you not do the same for me?” Plagueis’s eyes reflected disappointment. “Never, Sidious. I have always been truthful with you.” Sidious bowed his head in acknowledgment. “I am not
the teacher you are.” Plagueis spent a long moment observing the
holorecording. The Zabrak’s fists and legs were as lethal
as his lightsaber, and his speed was astounding. “Who
applied the markings?”
“The mother did—in keeping with rituals enacted shortly
after birth. An initiation, during which a Dathomirian Zabrak
infant is submerged in an oily bath, energized with ichor
conjured by the Nightsisters’ use of magicks.”
“A peculiar decision, given her hope to send the child
into hiding.”
“The Nightsisters rarely leave Dathomir, but
Nightbrothers are sometimes sold into servitude. I believe
the mother wished him to be aware of his heritage, wherever he ended up.” On seeing the Zabrak’s lightsaber produce two blades, Plagueis drew in his breath. “A saber-staff! The weapon of
Exar Kun! Did he construct that?”
“The prototype was two lightsabers he had welded
pommel-to-pommel in imitation of the Iridonian zhaboka. I
furnished the knowledge that allowed him to improve on the
original design and construct the one he is using.” Plagueis watched as droid after droid was impaled on
the opposing crimson blades. “It strikes me as
unnecessary, but I won’t deny his mastery of the Jar’Kai
technique.” Again, he turned to Sidious. “Niman and teräs
käsi will never substitute for dun möch, but I appreciate that
you have trained him to be a fighting machine rather than a
true apprentice.”
“Thank you, Master.” Plagueis’s eyes wrinkled—in suspicion? In amusement?
“I agree with you that he should bear witness to the Yinchorri attack on the Jedi Temple.”
“I will tell him. He already thinks of the Jedi as
abominations. The sight of their sanctuary being violated will quicken his blood.”
“Even so, hold him back. Let his anger and hatred
fester.” Sidious bowed his head. Plagueis deactivated the holoprojector. “The gift you
requested for him is nearly complete. Raith Sienar has
agreed to have the vessel delivered to Sojourn, and I will
arrange to have it brought to the LiMerge Building.” He made a beckoning motion with his fingers. “Come, Darth
Sidious, there is much to discuss.”
The ancient fort had never felt more forlorn. A company of
Sun Guards still resided on Sojourn, escorting visitors to
the surface and keeping the ground-based turbolasers in
good working order. Authentication codes were still
required for ships entering Sojourn space, but the moon’s
coordinates were no longer the secret they had once been.
For the most part Plagueis had lived like a hermit among
his droids, seldom venturing offworld, though continuing to
use his vast wealth and influence to support those
organizations that furthered the Sith cause and crush the
plans of those he opposed. For the first year following the
attack, rumors swirled that Hego Damask was dead, but word gradually began to circulate that he was merely living
in seclusion on Sojourn. Four years later, the annual
Gatherings had resumed, but only for five years, and now
there hadn’t been a Gathering in more than a decade.
Fewer and fewer beings had attended the events in any
case, many having distanced themselves from Damask in
the wake of the murders on Coruscant. During the long period between the Gran’s sneak attack
and the first Gathering of the new era, Sidious had spoken with Plagueis only by holo. Left to progress on his own, he
had trained the Zabrak in secret on Mustafar, Tosste, and
Orsis, visited several Sith worlds, and spent considerable
time studying the Sith texts and holocrons that remained
under guard on Aborah. From the Sun Guards, Sidious
heard that Damask had locked himself away in the fort and was scarcely seen. On the few occasions Damask had
summoned them, they had found the living quarters in
shambles, some of the experimental subjects dead in their
cages or cells, and many of the droids malfunctioning. Creatures from the surrounding greel forests had invaded
and taken up residence in the place, making nests in the
turrets and devouring anything edible. While Damask—
unwashed, emaciated, erratic in his behavior—had
seemed capable of speech, it was 11-4D who had
communicated Damask’s orders and requests to the
guards. At one point, the guards had been ordered to install more than two hundred holoprojectors in what had been the
fort’s armory, so that Damask could both monitor current
events and immerse himself in historical recordings, some
of which dated back hundreds of years. Sidious knew that his own powers had increased tenfold
over the decades, but he couldn’t be certain he had learned
all of Plagueis’s secrets—“his sorcerer’s ways,” as the Sun Guards referred to them—including the ability to prevent
beings from dying. He sometimes wondered: Was he a
level behind? Two levels behind? Such questions were
precisely what had driven generations of Sith apprentices
ultimately to challenge their Masters. The uncertainty about who was the more powerful. The need to test themselves,
to face the definitive trial. The temptation to take the mantle
by force, to put one’s own spin on the power of the dark
side—as Darth Gravid had attempted, only to set the Sith
back countless years …
And so it had been left largely to Sidious to bring the
same fervor to the manipulation of events in the mundane world that Plagueis brought to the manipulation of midichlorians. Instead of challenging each other, they had both
dedicated themselves to executing the Grand Plan. Political mastery and mastery of the Force. Someday soon,
the Sith would wield both, with Sidious the face of the
former and Plagueis behind the scenes, advising him about
the latter. Like Plagueis, Sidious had moved judiciously, for
unintended repercussions in the real world could be as
damaging to the Sith imperative as blowback from the
Force. The fact that the Force had not struck back argued
that their partnership was something unique and in
accordance with the will of the Force. Plagueis’s selfimposed isolation had taken a toll on some of the plans he
and Sidious had engineered for the Trade Federation and
other groups. But Plagueis had made what amounted to a
full recovery from his injuries, and the dark side was no
longer simply on the ascendant but risen and climbing
toward the zenith.
The Yinchorri Crisis was the first time that Plagueis had
sanctioned Sidious’s direct involvement in galactic events. Until then, events manipulated by the Sith had been
accomplished through the use of intermediaries. But when Sidious enlisted the aid of the Devaronian smuggler to
instigate the Yinchorri, he had not only made contact by
holoprojector—without revealing his Sith identity, of course —but also put him in touch with Pestage and Doriana, who
had assisted in the dumping of the bodies of the dead Jedi
on Valorum’s threshold and had facilitated the insertion of
the Yinchorri warriors tasked with infiltrating the Jedi
Temple.
Initially the plan had been devised as a test, to see whether the Force-suggestion-resistant reptilian sentients
could be fashioned into an anti-Jedi army. But in the same way that repeated attempts at replication by cloning had
failed, all efforts to fashion them into an obedient army had
proved futile. Custom-made for aggression they were, but
also unpredictable and unruly. As a result, a redesigned
stratagem had been put into motion to test Valorum’s ability
to manage a crisis and the Senate’s resolve to end one. But neither Plagueis nor Sidious had expected the Supreme Chancellor to involve the Jedi, and now the modified plan was at risk, as well.
“It’s well and good that Jedi have died,” Plagueis was
saying as he, Sidious, and 11-4D entered his cluttered
study, “but we must guard against revealing our hand too
soon. Was it wise to have the corpses shipped to Coruscant?”
“They had the intended effect on Valorum,” Sidious said.
“Nevertheless, we may have misjudged him.”
“He’s more concerned about his legacy than he is about
the Republic, but he may yet win a majority of the Senate
over to his side, even at the cost of all his political cachet.”
“We need to engineer a crisis from which he can’t
recover,” Plagueis said.
“I have set just such events in motion.” Plagueis nodded in satisfaction. “Then perhaps there is
a beneficial side to this. If the Senate approves an
embargo, he will be indebted to you.” Sidious smiled tightly. “A blockade enacted for a
blockade broken.”
“To that end, we must begin to move Viceroy Nute Gunray and King Veruna into position. The Neimoidian was
partnered with Valorum during the Stark Conflict. This time we will pit them against each other.”
“I knew Gunray slightly when he served as a Senator. He
is acquisitive and ambitious, but oddly immune to
intimidation. We will need to win him over.”
“And so we shall: with procurements that will earn him a
position among the seven who make up the Trade
Federation directorate.”
“How should we approach him?”
“The gift you requisitioned for the Zabrak prompted an
idea,” Plagueis said. “Gunray is fond of pylats, which the Neimoidians associate with wealth. The avians are
abundant on Neimoidia, but Sojourn’s forests support a
rare red-spotted white one, which the Kaminoans supplied. He will never identify it as a clone.”
“A gift from Hego Damask or Senator Palpatine?”
Plagueis looked him up and down. “From Darth Sidious,
I think.” Sidious stared at him in doubt. “By name?”
“Not merely by name, but by title, as well. It is time we make our presence known to a select few.”
“Will the Sith title have any meaning for him?”
“When we make his dreams come true.” Plagueis began to pace the cool floor. “No Sith have ever
been in the position in which we now find ourselves, Darth
Sidious: in step with the reemergence of the dark side,
fortified by the signs and omens, certain that revenge and
victory are near at hand. If the Jedi would abide by their
philosophy of acting in accordance with the Force, of doing what is right, they would roll over for the dark. But they
resist. Yoda and the rest of the Council members will
double their meditation sessions in an effort to peer into the
future, only to discover it clouded and unknowable. Only to
discover that complacency has opened the door to
catastrophe.
“If indeed they have been acting in accordance with the
Force, how could we be succeeding in tipping the balance?
How could the dark side be gaining ground? In fact, the
Jedi have fallen away from their self-assigned duty, their
noble path. Could they have prevented it? Perhaps by
having remained in control of the Republic, by electing and
reelecting Jedi Supreme Chancellors. Or perhaps by
absenting themselves completely from the affairs of the Republic, and attending to their arcane rituals in the belief
that right thinking by them would keep the Republic strong
and on course, the galaxy tipped into the light, instead of
having allowed themselves to become marshals and
enforcers.” He cast a questioning look at Sidious. “Do you see the
grand error of their ways? They execute the Republic’s
business as if it were the business of the Force! But has a
political body ever succeeded in being the arbiter of what is
right and just? How easy it is for them to bask in selfassurance in their castle on Coruscant. But in so doing,
they have rendered themselves ill equipped for the world we have spent a millennium bringing into being.” He cleared his throat.
“We’re going to back them into a contradiction, Darth
Sidious. We’re going to force them to confront the moral
quandary of their position, and reveal their flaws by
requiring them to oversee the conflicts that plague their
vaunted Republic.
“Only Dooku and a handful of others have grasped the
truth. All those years ago when I first met him on Serenno, I
thought: What a blowit would be to the Order if he could be
enticed to leave and embrace the dark side. What a panic
it might incite. For if one could leave, then ten or twenty or
thirty could follow, and the hollowness at the center of the Order would be plain for all to see.”
The Muun’s eyes narrowed. “One can’t be content to
abide by the rules of the Jedi Order or the Force. Only by making the Force serve us have we prevailed. Eight years
ago we shifted the galaxy, Darth Sidious, and that shift is
now irreversible.” Approaching, he rested his bony hands on Sidious’s
shoulders. “On my first visit to your homeworld I recognized
it as a nexus in the Force. And I remember thinking how
appropriate it was that the dark side should be hiding on
such a beautiful planet.” He paused, straightened, then
asked with sudden gravity, “Is Veruna ready, Sidious? I’m
concerned that he might be as uncontrollable as the Yinchorri, and that a more malleable leader would better
serve our interests.” Sidious considered the question. “It may not be
necessary to remove him, Master. Like Gunray, he favors wealth over honor.” Plagueis nodded his head slowly. “Then nudge him, Darth Sidious. And let us see which way he leans before we decide his fate.”
24: SITH’ARI
Their targets were only asteroids, but the chromium-nosed
yellow starfighters attacked the microcratered rocks as if
they posed a threat to Naboo itself. Products of the Theed
Space Vessel Engineering Corporation and Nubian Design, and King Veruna’s pet project since his
coronation, the sleek, short-winged craft exemplified
Naboo’s infatuation with classic design and flagrant
extravagance. The starfighters’ engines were said to have
set a new standard for emissions control, but for a world
that prided itself on environmental awareness, the N-1s
seemed entirely out of character and out of place.
“We’re expected to have two additional squadrons ready
for flight by the start of the year,” Veruna told Palpatine as
they stood at a dorsal viewport in the King’s even more
grandiose, mirror-finish Royal Starship. “All will feature twin
laser cannons, proton torpedo launchers, and deflector
shields, along with R-two astromech droids.”
“A dream come true,” Palpatine said. “Both for you and
for the Nubian Design Collective.” Veruna arched a bushy, gray-and-white eyebrow. “Our
deal with Nubian Design was mutually beneficial.”
“Of course it was,” Palpatine said, wondering how much
Veruna and his cronies had pocketed on a contract most
Naboo had opposed. Palpatine had arrived with Pestage, and had met
downside with Janus Greejatus before rendezvousing with
Veruna and some of the members of his advisory council at
Theed Hangar, including Prime Counselor Kun Lago and
the King’s sharp-featured female security chief Maris Magneta. Conspicuously absent was Theed’s teenage
governor, Padmé Naberrie, whose appointment had been Veruna’s compromise to an electorate that had been
growing more oppositional with each passing year. Veruna,
however, looked none the worse for wear. With his flaring
eyebrows, long silver hair, and fussily pointed beard, he still
cut a fine, swashbuckling figure. Lago and Magneta were
considerably younger and more rough-cut, and had made
their distaste for Palpatine and his party felt the moment
they had boarded the gleaming starship. Outside the viewport, strafing runs by Bravo Squadron were reducing asteroids to gravel and space dust.
“That’s Captain Ric Olié in Bravo One,” Veruna said.
“Battle-hardened at Chommel Minor.” Pestage failed to restrain a short laugh. “Against that
pirate group whose ships collided with one another?” Veruna glared at Palpatine. “Your aide seems to have
forgotten his place, Senator.” Palpatine flashed Pestage a look that said nothing and
turned back to Veruna. “My apologies, Your Majesty.”
If Veruna was unconvinced, he kept it to himself and fixed
his gaze on the distant starfighter exercise. “I plan to end
our partnership with the Trade Federation,” he said after a
long moment of silence, and without looking at Palpatine. Palpatine moved slightly to place himself in Veruna’s
peripheral view, his eyes wide in genuine surprise. “Is that
the purpose of this demonstration?”
The King turned to him. “If I had wanted it to be a show of
force, I would have waited until the next scheduled plasma
collection. However, since you seem to be asking, both
Theed Engineering and Nubian Design assure me that the
Federation’s Lucrehulk freighters would be easy prey for
our N-Ones.” Palpatine cut his eyes to Pestage and Greejatus and
shook his head in dismay. “Then it’s good you thought to
invite me aboard, Your Majesty, because I bring news that may persuade you to rethink your position.”
“What news?” Magneta demanded. Palpatine ignored her by continuing to speak to Veruna.
“This matter has yet to reach the Rotunda, but there is every
indication that the Republic is eventually going to grant the
Trade Federation permission to arm its ships.” Veruna’s jaw dropped and he blinked. “With what?” Palpatine pretended to become flustered. “I don’t know
precisely. Turbolasers, certainly, as well as droid
starfighters. Whatever combat automata are being
produced by Baktoid, Haor Chall, and the hive species.” He
gestured out the viewport. “Weapons that will prove to be a
deadly match for those starfighters.” Veruna was still trying to make sense of it. “Why is the Republic doing this?”
“Because of what happened at Yinchorr. Because of
persistent attacks by pirates and would-be insurrectionists. And because the Republic refuses to reverse its position
on creating a military.” Veruna stormed away from the viewport, then stopped
and whirled on Palpatine. “I don’t believe it. Valorum was
successful at Yinchorr. He would never bow to pressure
from the Trade Federation.”
“He isn’t bowing to pressure. His strategy is to enter into
a deal with the Federation: defensive weaponry in
exchange for taxation of the free-trade zones.” Veruna was speechless.
“This is why I urge Your Majesty to keep Naboo on the
proper side of this.”
“Do tell us, Senator,” Lago interrupted, “what it means to
be on the proper side?” Palpatine glanced from Lago to Veruna. “When the matter reaches the Rotunda, Naboo must vote in protest of
taxation of the free-trade zones.” Veruna swallowed and found his voice. “In support of the
Trade Federation? With my reelection approaching? You must be mad, Palpatine. Naboo has been under the yoke
of the Federation for more than thirty years. The people would never forgive me.”
“Your base remains strong,” Palpatine said. “The people will gradually come to understand that you made the correct
decision.” Veruna smoldered. “I don’t like being put in this position, Palpatine.” Palpatine adopted a pensive pose, then looked at the King. “There may yet be a way … I’m certain that Hego Damask would be willing to broker a renegotiated deal with
the Neimoidian bloc of the Trade Federation—”
“I don’t need Damask to broker anything,” Veruna
snapped. “The Muun’s time has come and gone. He’s an
anachronism. His enemies did us all a favor by forcing him
into early retirement.”
Palpatine’s eyes narrowed imperceptibly. And so, with a
nudge, he reveals himself.
“If I recall correctly, Damask’s enemies paid dearly.” He
fell silent for a moment, repositioning himself in front of the
viewport, so that Veruna would have the strafing starfighters
in direct view while he listened. “Granted, Sojourn isn’t the
impregnable fortress it once was. But Damask’s reach is
as long as it ever was, and his ties to the Banking Clan
have never been stronger.”
“In case you haven’t noticed, Senator,” Magneta
interjected, “Naboo’s reach is now long, as well.” Palpatine glanced over his shoulder at the starfighters,
then fixed his eyes on Veruna. “Your Majesty, Damask will
not take kindly to being cut out of our dealings with the
Trade Federation. He can make trouble.” Veruna’s gaze wandered back to him. “Let him try. Naboo isn’t the only world he has exploited. We would not want for allies. I’m more concerned about how the Senate would react to our voting against taxation of the trade
zones.” Palpatine forced a breath. “It’s a hopeless situation. The Rim Faction worlds rely on the Trade Federation for goods,
so they will likely vote in the negative. The Core Worlds, on
the other hand, will vote in favor of taxation, if only to bring
revenue to the Republic and avoid having to support the
outlying systems. Occupying the middle ground, the Trade
Federation stands to win no matter what, in that it will finally
be allowed to defend itself, and will force its clients to
shoulder the increased costs that will result from taxation.”
“What does all this mean for Valorum?” Lago said.
“I fear that he may not complete his term of office.”
“Who will succeed him?” Veruna asked.
“That’s difficult to say, Your Majesty. Ainlee Teem, I think.
Though Bail Antilles enjoys some support.” Veruna thought about it. “What are the implications for Naboo should the Gran win over the Alderaanian?”
“Then, of course, you would have a friend in the
chancellorship.” Veruna tugged at his beard. “I’ll take your
recommendations into account. But be forewarned, Palpatine, I will brook no deception. From you”—he fixed
Pestage and Greejatus with a gimlet stare—“or any of your
cabal. Remember: I know where the bodies are buried.”
Time is short. Vines and creepers had clawed their way up the walls
and towers of the old fort, and lianas linked the crenellated
parapets to the leafy crowns of nearby trees. Insects
scurried underfoot, foraging for food or laden with bits of
vegetation or scraps of splintered wood. The previous
night’s storms had left puddles ankle-deep on the walkway,
and runoff cascaded through firing holes. The forest
Plagueis had planted and stocked with rare and exotic
game seemed determined to rid Sojourn of the fortress that
had been erected in its midst.
From the tallest of the towers, he gazed over the treetops
at the rim of the moon’s parent world and the distant star
they shared. Sojourn was running fast and the last light was
fading. The air was balmy and riotous with the drone and
stridulation of insects, the territorial cries of avians, the mournful waking howls of creatures of the night. Clouds of
bats spilled from caves in the escarpment, devouring
bloodsuckers born by the strong rains. A breeze rose out of
nowhere.
Time is short. Still in safekeeping on Aborah were texts and holocrons
that recounted the deeds and abilities of Sith Masters who,
so it was said and written, had been able to summon wind
or rain or fracture the skies with conjured lightning. In their
own words or those of their disciples, a few Dark Lords
claimed to have had the ability to fly, become invisible, or
transport themselves through space and time. But Plagueis
had never succeeded in duplicating any of those
phenomena.
From the start Tenebrous had told him that he lacked the
talent for Sith sorcery, even though the inability hadn’t owed
to a deficiency of midi-chlorians. It’s an innate gift, the Bith would say when pressed, and one that he had lacked, as well. Sorcery paled in comparison with Bith science,
regardless. But Plagueis now understood that Tenebrous
had been wrong about sorcery, as he had been wrong
about so many things. Yes, the gift was strongest in those who, with scant effort, could allow themselves to be
subsumed by the currents of the Force and become
conduits for the powers of the dark side. But there was an
alternative path to those abilities, and it led from a place
where the circle closed on itself and sheer will substituted
for selflessness. Plagueis understood, too, that there were
no powers beyond his reach; none he couldn’t master
through an effort of will. If a Sith of equal power had
preceded him, then that one had taken his or her secrets to
the grave, or had locked them away in holocrons that had
been destroyed or had yet to surface.
The question of whether he and Sidious had discovered
something new or rediscovered something ancient was
beside the point. All that mattered was that, almost a
decade earlier, they had succeeded in willing the Force to
shift and tip irrevocably to the dark side. Not a mere
paradigm shift, but a tangible alteration that could be felt by
anyone strong in the Force, and whether or not trained in
the Sith or Jedi arts.
The shift had been the outcome of months of intense meditation, during which Plagueis and Sidious had sought
to challenge the Force for sovereignty and suffuse the
galaxy with the power of the dark side. Brazen and
shameless, and at their own mortal peril, they had waged
etheric war, anticipating that their own midi-chlorians, the
Force’s proxy army, might marshal to boil their blood or
stop the beating of their hearts. Risen out of themselves,
discorporate and as a single entity, they had brought the
power of their will to bear, asserting their sovereignty over
the Force. No counterforce had risen against them. In what
amounted to a state of rapture they knew that the Force had
yielded, as if some deity had been tipped from its throne. On the fulcrum they had fashioned, the light side had
dipped and the dark side had ascended. On the same day they had allowed Venamis to die.
Then, by manipulating the Bith’s midi-chlorians, which
should have been inert and unresponsive, Plagueis had
resurrected him. The enormity of the event had stunned
Sidious into silence and overwhelmed and addled 11-4D’s
processors, but Plagueis had carried on without
assistance, again and again allowing Venamis to die and
be returned to life, until the Bith’s organs had given out and
Plagueis had finally granted him everlasting death. But having gained the power to keep another alive hadn’t
been enough for him. And so after Sidious had returned to Coruscant, he had devoted himself to internalizing that
ability, by manipulating the midi-chlorians that animated
him. For several months he made no progress, but
ultimately he began to perceive a measured change. The
scars that had grown over his wounds had abruptly begun
to soften and fade, and he had begun to breathe more
freely than he had in twenty years. He began to sense that
not only were his damaged tissues healing, but his entire
body was rejuvinating itself. Beneath the transpirator, areas
of his skin were smooth and youthful, and he knew that
eventually he would cease to age altogether. Drunk on newfound power, then, he had attempted an
even more unthinkable act: to bring into being a creation of
his own. Not merely the impregnation of some hapless, mindless creature, but the birth of a Forceful being. The
ability to dominate death had been a step in the right
direction, but it wasn’t equivalent to pure creation. And so
he had stretched out—indeed, as if invisible,
transubstantiated—to inform every being of his existence,
and impact all of them: Muunoid or insectoid, secure or
dispossessed, free or enslaved. A warrior waving a banner
in triumph on a battlefield. A ghost infiltrating a dream. But ultimately to no end.
The Force grew silent, as if in flight from him, and many
of the animals in his laboratory succumbed to horrifying
diseases. Regardless, eight long years later, Plagueis remained
convinced that he was on the verge of absolute success.
The evidence was in his own increased midi-chlorian count;
and in the power he sensed in Sidious when he had finally
returned to Sojourn. The dark side of the Force was theirs
to command, and in partnership they would someday be
able to keep each other alive, and to rule the galaxy for as
long as they saw fit. But he had yet to inform Sidious of this.
It was more important that Sidious remain as focused on manipulating events in the profane world as Plagueis was
intent on dominating the realm of the Force, of which the mundane was only a gross and distorted reflection.
To be sure, the light had been extinguished, but for how
long and at what cost?
He recalled a stellar eclipse he had witnessed on a longforgotten world, whose single moon was of perfect size and
distance to blot out the light of the system’s primary. The
result hadn’t been total darkness but illumination of a
different sort, singular and diffuse, that had confused the
birds and had permitted the stars to be seen in what would
have been broad daylight. Even totally blocked, the primary
had shone from behind the satellite’s disk, and when the moon moved on there had been a moment of light almost
too intense to bear. Gazing into Sojourn’s darkening sky, he wondered what
calamity the Force was planning in retreat to visit upon him
or Sidious or both of them for willfully tipping the balance. Was retribution merely waiting in the wings as it had been
on Coruscant twenty years earlier? It was a dangerous
time; more dangerous than his earliest years as an
apprentice when the dark side might have consumed him
at any moment.
For now, at least, his full convalescence was near
complete. Sidious was continuing to become more
powerful as a Sith and as a politician, his most intricate
schemes meeting with little or no resistance. And the Jedi
Order was foundering …
Time would tell, and time was short.
The Dathomirian Zabrak sat cross-legged on the duracrete
floor, recounting for Sidious the surveillance mission he had
completed at the Jedi Temple, weeks earlier, at the height
of the Yinchorri Crisis.
“It sickened me to see how easily the reptilian infiltrators were deceived, Master, even by the fair-haired human
female sentry they thought they had taken by surprise
outside the Temple. From where I watched I knew that she
had feigned surprise when her lightsaber failed to
penetrate her assailant’s cortosis shield, and that she had merely been faking unconsciousness when the Yinchorri
had yanked her to her feet and she impaled him on her
activated blade.” Maul snarled, revealing sharply filed teeth.
“Their stupidity allowed me to revel in the fact that their mission had been compromised—that the Jedi were
simply luring them into a trap.”
The abandoned LiMerge Building had become the
assassin’s home and training center; The Works and the
fringes of the nearby Fobosi district, his nocturnal haunts. Circling him with the cowl of his robe raised over his head, Sidious asked, “The Jedi gained your respect?”
“They might have, had the infiltrators showed any skill. Had I been leading them …” Sidious stopped. “The mission would have been
successful? Jedi Knights and Padawans killed; younglings
slaughtered.”
“I’m certain of it, Master.”
“Just you, against the Masters who make up the High
Council.”
“By hiding and striking I could have killed many.” Plagueis was right, Sidious thought. I have made him
prideful.
The Yinchorri stratagem had failed, in any case. Additional Jedi had died, but Jedi deaths had never been
the primary reason for instigating the crisis. What mattered was that Valorum had triumphed, with some help from
Palpatine, it was true, but mostly on his own, by managing
to bring Senators Yarua, Tikkes, Farr, and others over to
his side and establishing an embargo. But with his political
currency spent, Valorum’s position was more tenuous than
ever. Even a hint of scandal and the Senate would lose what little confidence they had in him.
“You are formidable,” Sidious said at last, “but you are
not a one-being army, and I’ve not spent years training you
only to have you sacrifice yourself. When I bestowed upon
you the title of Darth, it was not in reward for your having
survived dangerous missions, starvation, and assassin
droids, but for your obedience and loyalty. No doubt you will
have ample opportunities to demonstrate your superior skill
to the Jedi, but bringing down the Order is not your mandate, your hatred of them notwithstanding.” Maul lowered his head, displaying his crown of sharptipped horns in their red-and-black field. “Master. As long
as those who do derive the joy and satisfaction Iwould.”
“We shall see, my apprentice. But until then, there are matters we need to attend to.” He motioned for Maul to stand and follow him to the
holoprojector table and transmission grid—the same ones
the Gran had left behind decades before, but fully modernized and enhanced.
“Stand out of view of the cams,” Sidious said, indicating
a place. “For now, we want to keep you in reserve.”
“But—”
“Be patient. You will have a part to play in this.” Sidious settled into a high-backed chair that wrapped
around him like a throne and had a remote control built into
one of the arms, his thoughts set aswirl by what he was
about to do. Had Plagueis felt the enormity of the moment
on Naboo all those years before when he had revealed his
true self; removed, for the first time, the mask he wore in
public? As empowering as it might have been, had the moment also been tainted by a kind of nostalgia; the loss of
something so personal, so defining? What had been secret would never be secret again …
The comm caught Viceroy Nute Gunray in the midst of
eating, and without the ear-flapped tiara and ornate
azurestone collar that made him look like a jester.
“Greetings, Viceroy,” Sidious said.
The nictitating membranes of the Neimoidian’s crimson
eyes went into spasm, and his mottled muzzle twitched.
“What? What? This is a secure address. How did you—”
“Don’t bother attempting to trace the origin of this
communication,” Sidious said, while Gunray’s tapered gray
fingers flew across the keypad of his holotable. “A trace will
only lead you in circles and waste what limited time we
have.”
“How dare you intrude—”
“Recently, I sent you a gift. A red-spotted pylat.” Gunray stared. “You? You sent it?”
“I trust you had sense enough to have it scanned for monitoring devices.” Gunray whirled to look at something off cam; probably
the crested bird itself. “Of course I did. What was your
purpose in sending it?” His accent elongated the words
and softened the T sounds.
“Consider it a token of my appreciation for the
unrewarded work you have done for the Trade Federation.
The directorate fails to recognize your contributions.”
“They—that is, I … Why are you hiding inside the cowl of
your cloak?”
“It is the clothing of myOrder, Viceroy.”
“You are a cleric?”
“Do I seem a holy man to you?” Gunray’s expression soured. “I demand to see your
face.”
“You have yet to earn the privilege of seeing me.”
“Privilege? Who do you think you are?”
“Are you certain you want to know?”
“I demand to know.” Sidious’s smile barely escaped the cowl. “Even better,
then. I am a Sith Lord.”
There. I said it.
I said it …
“Sith Lord?” Gunray repeated.
The response came from deep inside him, from the
center of his true being. “You have permission to refer to me as Darth Sidious.”
“I’ve not heard of Darth Sidious.”
“Ah, but now that you have, our partnership is forged.” Gunray shook his head. “I am not looking for a partner.” Sidious showed some of his face. “Don’t pretend to be
content with your position in the Trade Federation, or that
you are without aspirations. We are now partners in the
future.” Gunray made a hissing sound. “This is a joke. The Sith
have been extinct for a thousand years.”
“That’s precisely what the Republic and the Jedi Order would like you to believe, but we never disappeared.
Through the centuries we have taken up just causes and
revealed ourselves to select beings like yourself.” Gunray sat back in his chair. “I don’t understand. Why me?”
“You and I share an avid interest in where the Republic is
headed, and I have deemed it time that we begin to work in
concert.”
“Iwon’t be part of any covert schemes.”
“Truly?” Sidious said. “Do you think that out of millions of
influential beings I would choose you without knowing you
inside and out? I realize that your voracious desires stem
from the cruel conditions of your upbringing—you and your
fellow grubs in ruthless competition for limited supplies of
fungus. But I understand. We are all shaped by our infantile
desires, our longing for affection and attention, our fears of
death. And judging by how far you have come, it’s clear that
you were unrivaled and continue to be. Your years in the Senate, for example. The clandestine meetings in the Claus Building, the Follin Restaurant in the Crimson Corridor, the funds you diverted to Pax Teem and Aks Moe,
the secret dealings with Damask Holdings, the
assassination of Vidar Kim—”
“Enough! Enough! Do you mean to blackmail me?” Sidious delayed his reply. “Perhaps you didn’t hear me when I spoke of a partnership.”
“I heard you. Now tell me what you want of me.”
“Nothing more than your cooperation. I will bring about
great changes for you, and in exchange you will do the
same for me.” Gunray looked worried. “You claim to be a Dark Lord. But how do I know that you are? How do I know you have
any ability to help me?”
“I found you a rare bird.”
“That hardly validates your claim.” Sidious nodded. “I understand your skepticism. I could, of
course, demonstrate my powers. But I’m reluctant to
convince you in that way.” Gunray sniffed. “I haven’t time for this—”
“Is the pylat nearby?”
“Just behind me,” Gunray allowed.
“Show me.” Gunray widened the scope of the holotable’s cams to
include the bird, perched in a cage that was little more than
a circle of precious metal, crowned with a stasis field
generator.
“I was concerned, when I extracted him from the jungle
habitat, that he would die,” Sidious said. “And yet he
appears to be at home in his new environment.”
“His songs suggest as much,” Gunray replied.
“What if I told you that I could reach across space and
time and strangle him where he perches?” Gunray was aghast. “You couldn’t. I doubt that even a
Jedi—”
“Are you challenging me, Viceroy?”
“Yes,” he said abruptly; then, just as quickly: “No—wait!” Sidious shifted in the chair. “You value the bird—this
symbol of wealth.”
“I am the envy of my peers for possessing it.”
“Would not actual wealth generate even greater envy?” Gunray grew flustered. “How can I answer, when I know
that you might strangle me should Irefuse you?” Sidious loosed an elaborate sigh. “Partners don’t
strangle each other, Viceroy. I would prefer to earn your
trust. Are you agreeable to that?”
“Imight be.”
“Then here is my first gift to you: the Trade Federation is
going to be betrayed. By Naboo, by the Republic, by the members of the directorate. Only you can provide the
leadership that will be needed to keep the Federation from
splintering. But first we must see to it that you are promoted
to the directorate.”
“The current directorate would never welcome a Neimoidian.”
“Tell me what it would take—” Sidious started, then cut
himself off. “No. Never mind. Let me surprise you by
arranging a promotion.”
“You would do that and ask nothing in return?”
“For the time being. If and when I’ve earned your full trust,
Iwill expect you to take my suggestions to heart.”
“Iwill. Darth Sidious.”
“Then we will speak again soon.” Sidious deactivated the holoprojector and sat in silence.
“There is a world in the Videnda sector called Dorvalla,”
he said to Maul a long moment later. “You will not have
heard of it, but it is a source of lommite ore, which is
essential to the production of transparisteel. Two
companies—Lommite Limited and InterGalactic Ore—
currently control the mining and shipping operations. But for
some time the Trade Federation has had its sights on
overseeing Dorvalla.”
“What is thy bidding, Master?” Maul asked.
“For now, only that you acquaint yourself with Dorvalla, for
it may prove the key to ensnaring Gunray in our grasp.”
25: THE DISCREET CHARM OF THE
MERITOCRACY
A more outlandish quartet hadn’t set foot, belly, claw, and
jaw on Sojourn in twenty years. A half-breed Theelin female,
her Hutt master, his Twi’lek majordomo, and his Chevin
chief of security crossed the fort’s leaf-litterd courtyard and
entered Plagueis’s reception room. With the exception of
the Theelin, they looked as if they might have wandered in
from the greel forests to consort with the creatures that had
constructed nests and burrows in the fort’s dank corridors
and lofty turrets. Plagueis and 11-4D were waiting just inside the gaping
entrance.
“Welcome, Jabba Desilijic Tiure,” Plagueis said through
his transpirator mask. Droids had restored some semblance of order to the
room and installed tables and chairs. Morning light
streamed through square openings high in the wall, and a
fire crackled in the stone hearth.
“A pleasure to see you again after so many years, Magister Damask,” Jabba said in coarse Basic. The
ageless criminal lolled his huge tongue and maneuvered
his great slug body onto a low platform the droids had
erected. Gazing around, he added, “You and your droid must visit my little place on Tatooine in the Western Dune Sea.”
“Someday soon,” Plagueis said as he lowered himself
into an armchair across from the platform.
Like Toydarians and Yinchorri, Hutts were immune to
Force suggestions. Had Jabba known how many of his
species Plagueis had experimented on over the decades,
he might not have been as sociable, but then the Hutt’s own
penchant for ruthlessness and torture were legendary. As a
tattoo on his arm attested, he cared only for members of his
clan. He didn’t bother to introduce his subordinates by
name, but as was often the case with many of the thugs and
ne’er-do-wells with whom he surrounded himself, two of
them had reputations that preceded them. The pinkcomplexioned Twi’lek was Bib Fortuna, a former spice
smuggler whose own species had turned its back on him.
Tall and red-eyed, he had sharp little teeth and thick, shiny
lekku growing from a hairless cranium that looked as if it
had been inexpertly stuffed with rocks. The Chevin—a two- meter-high snout that had sprouted arms, legs, and tail—
was Ephant Mon. Celebrated as a warrior among his own
kind—and mildly Force-sensitive—he wore a blanket
someone might have thrown over him to hide his ugliness. Plagueis knew from contacts in the Trade Federation that
Mon was involved in a smuggling operation on
technophobic Cerea, supplying swoops to a gang of young
upstarts.
The Theelin was unknown to Plagueis. Pale and shapely,
she had lustrous orange hair and purple beauty marks that
ran down her face and neck to disappear beneath a
revealing costume.
“Diva Shaliqua,” Jabba said when he realized that
Plagueis was studying her. “A singer in the band.”
“As her name suggests.”
“A gift from Ingoda, in place of credits owed to me.”
Jabba’s big eyes settled on the Theelin. “She and Diva
Funquita came as a pair, but I made Funquita a present to Gardulla in the hope of smoothing over our lingering rivalry.” He grunted. “My first mistake. The second: introducing
Shaliqua to Romeo Treblanc, who would move worlds to
possess her.” Notorious for his gambling, Treblanc owned the Galaxies Opera House on Coruscant. Why Jabba chose to
associate with gamblers and other lowlifes was a mystery
to Plagueis. In some ways the Hutt’s illicit empire was the
inverse of Hego Damask’s, where, if nothing else, the
criminals were at least politicians, corporate honchos, and
financiers. His coming to Sojourn was both uncharacteristic
and unexpected.
“Are you here to talk about Treblanc or Gardulla?” Plagueis asked.
Jabba reacted in annoyance. “As always, straight to the
heart of the matter. But I can appreciate the fact that you’re
a busy Muun.” He wriggled to adjust his position on the
platform. “I know you were instrumental thirty years ago in
giving Gardulla the run of Tatooine, as a base for her
slavery operations and Podracing events. I’ve come this far
to inform you that Tatooine will soon have a new overseer.” He gestured to himself. “Me.” Plagueis said nothing for a long moment. “I was under
the impression that Tatooine was already as much yours as Gardulla’s.”
“Appearances can be deceiving,” Jabba said. “I’ve tried
to undermine her influence by fomenting distrust among the
so-called Sand People—the Tusken Raiders—but success
at chasing her offworld continues to elude me.” Plagueis made an adjustment to the breath mask. “How
can I help?”
Jabba appraised him. “I happen to know that Gardulla
hasn’t been able to make good on the loans you extended. What she earns from events like the Boonta Eve Classic,
she loses to gamblers.”
“That much is true,” Plagueis said. “But what of it?”
“Iwant you to stop funding her, so I can starve her out.” Plagueis shrugged. “Your information is incomplete,
Jabba. I haven’t funded her enterprises in a decade.”
Jabba balled his hands in anger. “You have influence
over members of the Banking Clan and the Trade
Federation who are funding her.” Plagueis lifted his head, as if in revelation. “I see. And what can I expect in exchange?”
“To start with, a better percentage of the profits from the
races and other enterprises.” Plagueis frowned in disappointment. “You must know that
I’ve no need of credits, Jabba.And you wouldn’t have come
this far, as you say, unless you had learned a few things
that might sway me over to your side.”
Jabba wriggled, restraining his anger. “In return for your
help, I will weaken Black Sun’s influence with the Trade
Federation Directorate—”
“I need no assistance.” Plagueis leaned forward in the
armchair. “What do you know that Imay not know?”
Jabba inflated his body, then allowed the air to escape
him in a protracted, mirthless laugh. “I know something you may not yet know about the Bando Gora.” Plagueis raised himself somewhat in the chair. Hideously
masked Bando Gora assassins had become a growing
concern in the Outer Rim, posing a problem to the
leadership of some of the cartels Plagueis backed. “Now
you have my interest, Jabba.”
“The cult has a new leader,” Jabba went on, happy to
have the high ground. “A human female, she has entered
into a plan with Gardulla, a Malastare Dug named Sebolto,
and a Republic Senator to distribute contaminated death
sticks, as a means of supplying the Bando Gora with braindead recruits.” Plagueis stretched out with the Force to peer into the Hutt. Jabba wasn’t lying. “This human female,” he said.
“I’ve heard rumors.” Again Jabba was telling the truth. “Rumors will suffice for
now.”
The Hutt rubbed his meaty hands together. “Her name is Komari Vosa, and word has it that she is a former Jedi.” Plagueis knew the name only too well. Some ten years
earlier, Komari Vosa had been a Padawan of Master Dooku.
Behind each of the Rotunda’s hover platform docking
stations extended wedge-shaped office complexes more
than half a kilometer in length, where Senators met with one
another, entertained guests, and, on rare occasions,
carried out the work they had been elected or appointed to
perform. Some of the offices were sealed environments, in which the atmospheres of member worlds were replicated;
others, especially those belonging to hive species, were
staffed by hundreds of beings who performed their duties in
cubicles that resembled nectarcomb cells. By comparison, Naboo’s was rather prosaic in design and adornment, and
yet unrivaled in terms of the number of high-profile visitors it
received.
“I’m giving thought to leaving the Order,” Master Dooku
told Palpatine in the windowless room that was the Senator’s private study. “I can no longer abide the
decisions of the Council, and I have to be free to speak my mind about the wretched state of the Republic.”
Palpatine didn’t reply, but thought: Finally. With Darth Maul traveling to Dorvalla on his first mission,
Palpatine had been preoccupied all afternoon, and now
Dooku’s disclosure: long anticipated and yet still something
of a surprise.
“This isn’t the first time you’ve been exasperated with the Council,” he said carefully, “and it probably won’t be the
last.” Dooku shook his head firmly. “Never more than this. Even after Galidraan. I’ve no recourse.”
Frigid Galidraan was years behind him, but for Dooku
the incident remained an open wound. A local governor had
succeeded in luring the Jedi into a conflict with Mandalorian mercenaries that had left eleven Jedi dead and the True Mandalorians—largely innocent of the charges that had
been leveled against them—wiped out, save for one. Since
then, and on each occasion he and Palpatine had met, Dooku had begun to look less and less like a Jedi Master
and more like the noble he would have been on his native Serenno. Meticulously groomed, he carried himself like an
aristocrat, affecting tailored tunics and trousers, and a
velvety black cloak that gave him a dashing, theatrical look. His slightly curved lightsaber hilt, too, might have been a
prop, though he was known to be one of the Order’s most
skilled duelists. And behind a mask of arrogant civility, Palpatine knew him to be capable of great cruelty.
“By request from the Senate,” Dooku went on, “the Council dispatched several Jedi to Baltizaar, and my
former Padawan somehow succeeded in accompanying
them.” Palpatine nodded soberly. “I know something of that. Baltizaar’s Senator petitioned for help in fending off attacks
by the Bando Gora.”
“Sadistic abductors and assassins,” Dooku said in
anger. “Military action was called for, not Jedi intercession. But no matter, the Council complied with the request, and
now Komari Vosa and the others are believed to be dead.” Palpatine raised an eyebrow. “The young woman who
became infatuated with you?”
“The same,” Dooku said quietly. “At Galidraan she fought
brutally against the Mandalorians, almost as if in an attempt
to impress me. As a result I told the Council that she wasn’t
ready for the trials and Jedi Knighthood. Compounding
their initial error in dispatching Jedi, Master Yoda and the
rest have refused to send reinforcements to search for
survivors.” Palpatine considered it. “If Baltizaar was meant to be
another attempt to impress you, all Komari Vosa did was
prove that you were right about her all along.” Dooku regarded him. “Perhaps. But the failure is mine.” He ran a hand over his short beard. “As skilled as I am with
a lightsaber, I’ve turned out to be an ineffectual teacher. Master Qui-Gon Jinn has become a solitary and secretive
rogue. And now Vosa …” He snorted. “I declined to be a member of the Council in order to devote myself to
diplomacy, and look how that has turned out. The Republic
is sliding deeper into chaos.”
“You’re one man against a galaxy full of scoundrels,” Palpatine said. Dooku’s eyes flashed. “One man should be able to make
a difference if he is powerful enough.” Palpatine let the silence linger. “You would claim the title
of Count of Serenno?”
“By right of birth. My family is agreeable. Now it’s simply
a matter of informing the High Council.”
“Has anyone ever left the Order?”
“Nineteen before me.”
“Have you shared your discontent with any of them?”
“Only Master Sifo-Dyas.”
“Of course.” Dooku looked up. “He worries that I’m going to do
something rash.”
“Leaving the Order isn’t rash enough?”
“He fears that I will denounce the Council openly, and
reveal how divided its members are about answering to the Senate.” He looked Palpatine in the eye. “I’ve half a mind to
join your cause.”
Palpatine touched his chest. “My cause?” Dooku adopted a sly smile. “I understand politics, my
friend. I know that you have to be circumspect about what
you say and to whom. But that the disenfranchised worlds
of the Outer Rim enjoy any support at all is largely due to
you. You speak honestly and you champion the
underprivileged, and you may be the only one capable of
bringing the Republic back from the brink. Unless, of
course, you have been lying to me all these years.”
Palpatine made light of the remark. “Perhaps a few lies
of omission.”
“Those I am willing to forgive,” Dooku said, “whether or
not we become partners in addition to being allies.” Palpatine interlocked his hands. “It is an interesting
notion. We would have to deepen our conversations,
become completely honest with each other, bare our
innermost thoughts and feelings to determine whether we
truly share the same goals.”
“I’m being honest when I tell you that the Republic needs
to be torn down and built up again from the ground up.”
“That is a tall order.”
“Tall, indeed.”
“It might require a civil war.”
“And how far from that are we now?” Dooku fell silent for
a moment, then said, “The Senate grapples with trying to
solve disputes the Jedi often see firsthand. What laws are
enacted only follow from our having brought our lightsabers
to bear.”
“It was the Jedi who pledged to support the Republic.”
“The Order’s place in this is a matter Sifo-Dyas and I
have discussed endlessly,” Dooku snapped. “But the members of the Council are not similarly inclined. They are
entrenched in archaic thinking, and slow to embrace
change.” He paused, and adopted a sinister look. “Don’t let
yourself be fooled, Palpatine. They see dark times ahead.
In fact, they think of little else. That’s why they have allowed
the Jedi to become involved in parochial conflicts like those
at Galidraan, Yinchorr, and Baltizaar, which are like brush
fires born of windblown embers from a massive blaze just
beyond the horizon. But instead of actually rising up against
the corruption in the Republic, perhaps disbanding the Senate entirely for a period of time, they have become
fixated on prophecy. They await the coming of a
prophesized redeemer who will bring balance to the Force
and restore order.”
“A redeemer?” Palpatine stared at him in authentic
surprise. “You’ve never alluded to this prophecy.”
“Nor would I now if I still thought of myself as loyal to the Order.”
“I never considered that the Force needed to be
balanced.”
Dooku’s lip curled. “The Order interprets the prophecy to mean that the dark tide needs to be stemmed.”
“You don’t accept it?” Dooku had an answer ready. “Here is the truth of it: the
Jedi could fulfill the prophecy on their own, if they were willing to unleash the full powers of the Force.”
“The full powers of the Force,” Palpatine said. “I’m afraid
you’ve lost me.” Dooku blew out his breath. “Perhaps it’s something we
can discuss in the future.”
“You’ve made your decision, then?” Dooku nodded. “If one more Jedi dies because of
indolence on the part of the Republic and moral
equivocation on the part of the Council, I will leave the
Temple and refuse to look back.”
No sooner had Dooku left the office than Sidious was
donning his cloak and hurrying off to his next appointment. Hailing a sky-cab in Senate Plaza, he instructed the Gran
driver to deliver him to Tannik Spaceport. Relaxing back into the padded seat, he exhaled for what
felt like the first time all day. In the space of a standard year
he had gone from leading two lives to managing almost half
a dozen: apprentice to Plagueis; Master to Maul;
distinguished Senator; ally of Supreme Chancellor Valorum; and leader of a growing cabal of conspirators that
included Pestage, Doriana, Greejatus—in line to replace
him in the Senate—the Force-sensitive human Sim Aloo,
intelligence analyst Armand Isard, Eriadu Senator Wilhuff
Tarkin, and Umbaran telepath Sly Moore, whom he had made his covert aide. And leading a double life of his own: Dooku. Carrying out
Jedi business while in private moments flirting with the dark
side, hungry to bring the full power of the Force to bear in
the mundane realm, his slow reorientation a curious
inversion of Darth Gravid’s, whose similar reach for
preeminence had exceeded his grasp.
For the Jedi, Mastery was conferred when one attained a
true understanding of the ways of the Force; for the Sith,
that level of understanding was merely the beginning. The
Jedi Order’s homespun cloaks announced: I want for
nothing, because I am clothed in the Force; the cloaks of
the Sith: I am the light in the dark, the convergence of
opposing energies. And yet, while all Sith Lords were
powerful, not all were brilliant or in complete possession of
the powers the dark side granted them. Darth Millennial
had rebelled against the teachings of his Master, Darth
Cognus, and even Plagueis spoke of having reached a
philosophical impasse with his Master, Tenebrous. A human Sith Lord whose short reign had elapsed some
five centuries earlier, Gravid had been persuaded to
believe that total commitment to the dark side would
sentence the Sith Order to eventual defeat, and so had
sought to introduce Jedi selflessness and compassion into
his teachings and practice, forgetting that there can be no
return to the light for an adept who has entered the dark wood; that the dark side will not surrender one to whom, by mutual agreement, it has staked a claim. Driven
increasingly mad by his attempts to straddle the two
realms, Gravid became convinced that the only way to
safeguard the future of the Sith was to hide or destroy the
lore that had been amassed through the generations—the
texts, holocrons, and treatises—so that the Sith could
fashion a new beginning for themselves that would
guarantee success. Barricaded within the walls of a bastion
he and his Twi’lek apprentice, Gean, had constructed on
Jaguada, he had attempted as much, and was thought to
have destroyed more than half the repository of artifacts
before Gean, demonstrating consummate will and courage,
had managed to penetrate the Force fields Gravid had
raised around their stronghold and intercede, killing her Master with her bare hands, though at the cost of her arm,
shoulder, and the entire left side of her face and chest. A Jedi Master of high standing, Dooku possibly already
had some theoretical understanding of the dark side;
perhaps more, if he had access to Sith Holocrons vaulted within the Temple. He could certainly be a nuisance to the Republic, though hardly an agent of chaos, as Plagueis and
Sidious had been. Still, it would be interesting to see just
how far Dooku might be willing to go …
Palpatine would have to inform Plagueis of their
conversation. Or would he? Was an apprentice ever
permitted to conceal knowledge from his or her Master?
No. Never. Especially not when there was a chance that
Plagueis might learn of Dooku’s apostasy on his own, in ways that remained unfathomable.
* * *
Executing a reckless series of maneuvers, the Gran driver
had changed lanes and was descending rapidly for Tannik
Spaceport—a semicircular docking pad located at the
edge of the Manaai district and surrounded on all sides by
towering monads. Reserved for low-impact freighters, the
port was a haven for drugged and abducted crew members, itinerant workers, and undocumented migrants
of diverse species, most of whom were in search of
steerage passage to distant worlds. Glad to be released from the sky-cab, Palpatine edged
his way into the crowds and set a course for the
headquarters of the Refugee Relief Movement, whose stark
offices were tucked under the port’s recessed upper level. Halfway to his destination he spied the stout Naboo he had
come to see, standing alongside his slender wife and
issuing commands to a group of young volunteers. Adopting an expression of good cheer and waving a hand
in the air, Palpatine shouted, “Ruwee.”
The man swung to the sound of his voice and smiled
broadly. “Palpatine!” President of the RRM, Ruwee Naberrie had a large
square head, thin lips, a clean-shaven face, and short hair
clipped in high bangs. A onetime mountain man, a builder
by trade, and a frequent guest lecturer on microeconomics
at Theed University, he was not easily fooled, and his
default expression was one of sincerity. The nonprofit
organization he directed was devoted to providing aid for Coruscant’s billions of lower-tier dwellers.
“What a happy coincidence,” Ruwee said, pumping
Palpatine’s hand. The two Naboo were close in age, but
Ruwee was a product of public education rather than the
series of private institutions young Palpatine had attended.
“You remember Jobal?” A tall woman with a triangular-shaped face and widespaced and compassionate eyes, she was allowing herself
to age gracefully, though her long hair was still dark and
luxuriant. Married to Ruwee by arrangement, she was every
bit as serious as he was, and equally committed to the
refugee movement.
“Of course,” Palpatine said. Bowing his head, he added,
“Madame Naberrie.” She made a move to hug him, then thought better of it
and simply smiled in acknowledgment. “How good to see
you again, Senator.” Ruwee touched him on the back. “I never had a chance to
thank you in person for allowing me to address the Senate
about the refugee crisis on Sev Tok.” Palpatine shrugged it off. “It was my honor to be affiliated with such a worthy cause. Speaking of which, Onaconda
Farr sends his regards.”
“Rodia should be proud of him,” Ruwee said. “One of the
few in the Senate who recognizes that good fortune should
not be taken for granted but should serve as an impetus for
bringing comfort to those less fortunate.” Palpatine smiled tightly.
“What brings you to the docks, Senator?” Jobal asked.
“More than coincidence, m’lady. In fact, a matter of
utmost urgency that involves your daughter, Padmé.”
“She’s here,” Ruwee said. Palpatine looked at him. “On Coruscant?”
“Here, at Tannik.” He pointed to a nearby dock, where an
energetic dark-haired girl was directing an antigrav pallet of
foodstuffs into the bay of a waiting freighter. Catching sight
of her father, Padmé waved.
“Who is the young man with her?” Palpatine asked.
“Ian Lago,” Jobal said. Palpatine sharpened his vision. “The son of King
Veruna’s counselor?”
Jobal nodded. “He’s become a bit lovesick.”
“And Padmé with him?”
“We hope not,” Ruwee said. “Ian’s a nice boy,
but … Well, let’s just say that Kun Lago would not be happy
to learn that his son has been fraternizing with the enemy,
so to speak.” Realizing that young Ian was eyeing him with sudden
interest, Palpatine returned the look for a moment, then
said, “This brings me directly to the point of my visit. As
you’re no doubt aware, our King has instructed me to
support the Trade Federation on the issue of taxation of the
free-trade zones.”
“Of course he would,” Ruwee said with clear disdain.
“How otherwise would Veruna continue to line the pockets
of his robes with kickbacks.” Palpatine nodded. “You and I and some of the nobles
know as much. But now may be the time to let the rest of
Naboo in on his secrets.”
Jobal’s expression soured. “If you’re talking about
challenging him in the coming election, you’re facing a lost
cause.”
“I beg to disagree, madame,” Palpatine said. “With
discretion I have already approached several members of
the electorate, and they concur that Veruna can be
defeated by the right candidate.” When he cut his gaze to Padmé, Ruwee’s mouth fell
open. “You can’t be serious.”
“But I am, Ruwee. A member of the Legislative Youth
Program at eight years of age; a full Apprentice Legislator
at eleven. Her refugee work on Shadda-Bi-Boran. Plus, she
enjoys more popular support in Theed than any governor
has enjoyed in generations.”
Jobal blinked and shook her head in disbelief.
“Palpatine, she has only just turned thirteen!” Palpatine spread his hands. “Naboo has elected younger Queens, m’lady. And hers could be a reign that will last fifty
years.” He refused to yield to Ruwee or Jobal. “The
constitution has a provision that would allow the monarchy
to become hereditary for a worthy dynasty. And what more worthy family is there than the Naberries?” Husband and wife traded looks. “That’s very flattering, Senator—” Jobal started to say when Palpatine cut her off.
“The Naboo are exasperated with monarchs like Tapalo
and Veruna. Padmé would allow Naboo to reinvent itself.” Ruwee mulled it over momentarily. “Even if Padmé were
to entertain the idea, I’m not sure she could be persuaded
to support taxation of the trade zones, knowing what that might mean for Naboo and other outlying worlds.”
“She wouldn’t have to take a stand,” Palpatine countered.
“She need only campaign against corruption and secret
deals, and the embarrassing position in which Veruna has
placed Naboo.”
Jobal’s eyes narrowed in uncertainly. “At the risk of
touching on a sore point, Senator, you helped put Veruna
on the throne and have been his advocate ever since.” Palpatine shook his head. “Never an advocate. I have
always considered myself to be a counterbalance, and in
the past few years we’ve found ourselves on opposite
sides of almost every issue, including the library he built
and the credits he lavished on creating a space force for Naboo.” He fell silent for a moment, then said, “Trust me, Veruna can be defeated.” Again, Ruwee and Naberrie exchanged worried looks.
“We’re provincial people, Palpatine,” Ruwee said at last.
“The world of politics … galactic politics, no less …” Palpatine compressed his lips. “I understand. But what
compelled the two of you to abandon the mountains for
Theed, if not for Padmé and Sola, and the opportunities
that might be available to them?”
Palpatine held Ruwee’s pensive gaze. He is beginning
to waver.
“I wouldn’t want to put Padmé through this only to see her
lose, Palpatine.” Palpatine beamed. “I will work with you to see that that
doesn’t happen. I don’t wish to speak out of turn, but I can
almost guarantee the support of the Supreme Chancellor,
as well.”
“Valorum knows of Padmé?” Jobal asked in delighted
surprise.
“Of course he does.” Palpatine paused. “Faced with
Padmé as competition, perhaps Veruna will see the light
and abdicate.”
Jobal laughed, then showed Palpatine a serious look.
“You have come a long way, Senator.”
26: THEIR BASER NATURE
On a clear day, looking northwest across The Works from a
debris-strewn room in the circular crown of the LiMerge Building, Maul could just see the elegant centermost spire
of the Jedi Temple, poking above the horizon. With his Master en route to Eriadu to attend a trade summit Sidious
himself had proposed, the Zabrak had made a habit of
climbing to the crown at least once a day and, with
electrobinoculars in hand, gazing at the distant spire in the
hope of catching sight of a Jedi. But that hadn’t happened.
If any Jedi were present, they would be sitting in
contemplation, as Maul knew he should be doing, as well. Or if not meditating, then completing work on the graciously
curved speeder bike he had named Bloodfin or the droid
called C-P3X, or perfecting his skill at using the wrist- mounted projectile launcher known as the lanvarok. Devoting himself to those tasks would have met with more
approval from Darth Sidious than Maul’s staring at the
Temple’s fin-ornamented pinnacle and dreaming of the day
he could pit himself against a Jedi Master. But ever since
his return from Dorvalla several standard weeks earlier, he
had been too restless to sit cross-legged on the floor,
immersed in the flow of the dark side, or to pore over the
probe droid schematics Darth Sidious had furnished
before he’d left. When Maul reflected on the time he had spent on Dorvalla, his thoughts weren’t focused on the
assassinations he had carried out. He had murdered many
in his short life, and there was nothing about the deaths of
Patch Bruit, Caba’Zan, and the others involved in the
business of mining lommite ore that distinguished them
from previous killings. In fact, the miners’ carelessness
should have condemned them to lingering deaths rather
than the quick ends Maul had dispensed. What he
remembered instead was the feeling of participation the
mission had afforded. Not only had he been able to draw
on his talents for stealth, tracking, and combat, but he had
used them in a manner that furthered the Sith Grand Plan,
as hadn’t been the case during his years of training on Orsis, or during the forays Darth Sidious had allowed him
to make to other worlds. On his return to Coruscant, the Dark Lord had praised him, which, Maul supposed, should
have been reward enough. And might have been, had the mission led to another. But Darth Sidious had excluded him
from participating in the Eriadu operation, and had been
vague about future plans. A direct outcome of what Maul had accomplished on Dorvalla, Lommite Limited and InterGalactic Ore had merged and been taken over by the Trade Federation, which in turn had resulted in Nute Gunray’s promotion to the
company’s seven-member directorate. In further
conversations with the viceroy, Darth Sidious had
demanded that the Neimoidians willingly sacrifice one of
their Lucrehulk freighters, along with a shipment of
aurodium ingots, as a means of funding an Outer Rim
insurgent group known as the Nebula Front. Maul had been
nonplussed by his Master’s decision to reveal himself to the
group’s leader, as Darth Sidious had done in his initial
communication with Gunray; then dismayed to learn that the
leader—a human named Havac—had betrayed Darth
Sidious by attempting to assassinate Supreme Chancellor Valorum on Coruscant. The realization that his Master
could be deceived, that he wasn’t infallible, had had a
curious effect on Maul. It had caused him unease, a sudden
concern for his Master’s safety that had intruded on his
ability to still his mind and find reassurance in the dark side.
It was not fear—for fear was something alien to Maul’s makeup—but a troublesome disquiet. Disquiet for the
being he had once tried to kill, and was perhaps expected
to kill. All these weeks later he would still sometimes spend
hours wandering through the LiMerge Building like a house
pet picking up on the scent of its owner …
When, though, he had expressed a desire to take part in
the Eriadu operation, even if that only meant assisting the Neimoidians in procuring weapons from the hive species
or commencing manufacturing operations on Alaris Prime
and other remote worlds, his Master had rejected the idea
out of hand. You have no role in this, he had said, without
explanation, and in compensation, Maul surmised, had
given him the dark eye schematics.
The rejection, too, had prompted questions of a novel
sort. Of all the beings in the galaxy, the Dark Lord had
chosen him to serve as his apprentice and eventual
successor, and yet Darth Sidious had neglected to equip
him with the very tools he would need to carry the Sith
imperative forward. For all his attempts to familiarize
himself with the political landscape and with criminal
organizations—some of which were allied to Darth Sidious,
others antithetical to his plans—he had a limited
understanding of precisely how the galaxy worked. He
grasped that the Sith’s war was with the Jedi Order rather
than the Republic, but he had no real inkling as to how
revenge was to be meted out. What, then, if—beyond contemplation—something
untoward should befall his Master? Was there a
contingency plan? Unlike Darth Sidious, who masqueraded
as Republic Senator Palpatine and debated complex
issues in the Senate, Maul lacked a secret identity. With his
yellow eyes and horned head a black-and-red mask of
arcane sigils, it was all he could do to prowl the fringes of
The Works in the dead of night without instilling fear in
nearly every being whose gaze he caught. Maul had expected his life to change when Darth Sidious
had relocated him to Coruscant. But in many ways the move struck him as a return to his days as a combat
trainee on Orsis, waiting to be allowed to fight, receiving
praise and rewards, only to be commanded to train harder.
The occasional visits from his Master had allowed him to
endure the isolation and superficiality of his existence. Only when his instruction in the Sith arts had begun, had he felt
singular, purposeful …
But he wasn’t entirely without hope. On occasion Darth Sidious would hint at a mission of
utmost importance that they would need to carry out
together; one that would call on them to make use of all
their powers. He had yet to provide details, even with
regard to Maul’s studies. But he continued to imply that the mission was looming. And more and more, Maul sensed
that it was somehow linked to his Master’s homeworld, Naboo.
* * *
His presence requested by King Veruna, Palpatine
interrupted his journey to the Eriadu summit to stop at
Naboo. The spaceport was crowded with ships of unusual
design, and Theed was teeming with citizens who had
packed the streets and lanes surrounding Palace Plaza to
hear young Padmé Naberrie speak. In stark contrast with
the joyous enthusiasm demonstrated by the crowds, and
seemingly organized as a kind of counterevent, the palace
throne room was the scene of an extravagant fete, attended
by the most corrupt of Veruna’s supporters in the electorate
and several dozen offworlders of dubious character. The
announcement of Palpatine’s arrival at the room met with
hushed innuendos and malicious laughter that continued while he was ushered to a place at the King’s table,
opposite Veruna and sandwiched between Kun Lago and
security chief Magneta. Motioning with his royal baton for decorum, Veruna
greeted Palpatine with an exaggerated smile. “Welcome, Palpatine.” Drinking had imparted a slight slur to his
speech. Clapping his hands, he added, “Bring wine for Naboo’s celebrated Senator.”
“Thank you, Majesty,” Palpatine said, playing along with
Veruna’s insincerity. “I’ve gone without blossom wine for
too long.” Veruna pounded a fist on the long wooden table. “Then
bring him two goblets, and keep the supply flowing until his
thirst is slaked.” Palpatine sat back as servants hurried in to honor Veruna’s command. Both ends of the table were anchored
by beings he knew by reputation rather than acquaintance.
Far to Veruna’s right sat Alexi Garyn, head of the Black Sun
crime syndicate; and to his left, elevated on durable
cushions and drawing smoke from a water pipe, lounged a
female Hutt named Gardulla, from Tatooine. Among her
retinue of beings were two humanoids whose martial
uniforms identified them as members of the Bando Gora
terrorist group.
More ammunition for Padmé Naberrie, he thought.
“Tell us, Palpatine,” Veruna said, after wiping his mouth
on the sleeve of his gaudy robe, “what prompted you to
propose this summit on Eriadu?” Palpatine ignored the goblets of wine. “The summit will
provide an opportunity for everyone involved to air their
thoughts and grievances regarding taxation of the trade
zones.”
“I’m certain that your friends in the Trade Federation are
very appreciative.” Palpatine waited for the laughter to end, pleased to find
that the conversation was headed in the direction he had
expected it to go. “Naboo has a great stake in what
emerges from the summit, Majesty.”
“Ah, then you arranged this for the sake of Naboo.” Veruna raised his voice so that everyone at the table could
hear. “Palpatine did this out of concern for Naboo!” His
expression toughened as he leaned forward. “And no doubt
you were thinking of Naboo when you approached the Naberries about having their daughter oppose me in the
coming election.”
“Think twice before you offer any denials,” Magneta told
him quietly.
Lago leaned over to add, “My son was present when you
tendered the offer.”
“With Padmé Naberrie, if I’m not mistaken,” Palpatine
said in like conspiracy. While Lago was trying to puzzle it
out, he looked at Veruna. “We discussed the refugee movement.”
The monarch glared at him, then motioned dismissively with his fingertips. “What’s done is done.And I’m afraid that
includes you, Senator.” Gesturing broadly in the direction of
Palace Plaza, he said, “Do you really believe that that little
political upstart can unseat me? The daughter of mountain
peasants?” Palpatine shrugged. “The crowd she has drawn seems to
think so.”
“Idealists,” Veruna said, sneering. “Regressives. They
dream of the Naboo of fifty years ago, but they’re not about
to have their wish.” His finger jabbed the air in front of
Palpatine’s face. “My first official act following my reelection will be to recall you as Senator.” He looked at Lago. “Kun
will be Naboo’s new representative.” Palpatine frowned in mock disappointment. “Janus Greejatus would be a better choice.” Veruna grew flustered. “A recommendation from you is a
condemnation! And I suggest strongly that you remain on Coruscant, because you will no longer be welcome on Naboo.” He lowered his voice. “Keep in mind that I have
information that can ruin you, Palpatine, in the same way
that you, the Naberries, and the rest are attempting to ruin me.”
The table fell silent as a squadron of N-1 starfighters shot
past the arched windows to disrupt the rally in the plaza. Palpatine conjured a smile. “The Naboo will be pleased
to see that your space force is good for something, Majesty.” Veruna’s bloated face flushed. “More than you know. I
told you that I meant to end our partnership with the Trade
Federation and Hego Damask, and so I shall.” Palpatine glanced at the Hutt and her Bando Gora minions. “With the help of your new partners. And what will
you do—chase the Trade Federation’s freighters out of the Chommel sector? Challenge Damask openly?”
“Damask has betrayed everyone. Ask Gardulla. Ask
Alexi Garyn. The Muun should have learned a lesson thirty
years ago from the Gran who targeted him.”
Palpatine took secret pleasure in the remark. And you
commit the same egregious blunders they did.
“What makes you think he didn’t?” Veruna started to speak, but bit back what he had in mind to say and began again. “From this point on, Naboo will manage its own resources. Gardulla and Black Sun will
supervise the export of plasma and the import of goods,
and the Bando Gora will protect our interests in the space
lanes. It’s a pity you won’t be a part of it.”
“A pity to be sure,” Palpatine said, rising to his feet. “Until
such time as you replace me, Majesty, I will continue to act
in Naboo’s best interests, at Eriadu and on Coruscant. Should I see Damask, I’ll be certain to tell him that he
underestimated … your ambitions.” Veruna locked eyes with him. “Don’t concern yourself
unduly, Palpatine. You won’t be seeing him again.”
The transpirator affixed to his face, Plagueis moved with
agile purpose through the stone-cold rooms that had
housed twenty years of experiments. Most of the cages and
cells were empty now—the captives they had contained,
released. He wondered if Sojourn’s greel forests would
become a kind of laboratory, a great scarlet-wood medium
for mutant evolution. OneOne-FourDee shuffled past him on
the way to the courtyard, alloy storage boxes piled high in
its quartet of appendages.
“Be certain that all the data has been permanently
deleted,” Plagueis said.
The droid nodded. “I will make certain for the third time, Magister Damask.”
“And FourDee, carry my instructions to the Sun Guards
that Iwill contact them on Thyrsus.”
“Iwill see to it, Magister.” Plagueis entered the room that had served as his meditation chamber. Though the high-ceilinged space was
already fixed in his memory, he studied the few pieces of
furniture in silence, as if searching for some detail that had
escaped his notice. His eyes lingered on the small
antechamber in which he and Sidious had been sitting when they had brought about the shift, and the strength of
that memory was such that he was catapulted into a moment of intense reverie.
For some time he had been aware that Sidious had
grown critical of his fixation with unraveling the secrets of
life and death. Surely Sidious felt as if Plagueis had made
himself too much of a project, often to the neglect of the Grand Plan; that Plagueis had come to place more
importance on his own survival than that of the Sith. Meanwhile, to Sidious had fallen the responsibility for
arranging and executing the schemes that would place the
two of them in power on Coruscant. Sidious directing
galactic events in much the same way that Plagueis was
overseeing the currents of the dark side. And yet the
arrangement was as it should be, for Sidious had a gift for
subterfuge that surpassed the talents of any of the Sith
Lords who had preceded him, including Bane. Plagueis found irony in the fact that Sidious had come to
feel about him as he himself had felt about Tenebrous at
the end of his long apprenticeship. Tenebrous trusted more
in Bith science and computer projections than he had in the Sith arts … But Plagueis understood, too, that the time had
come for him to rejoin the world and stand with Sidious to
see this most important phase of the plan to fruition: Palpatine’s ascendancy to the chancellorship and the
unprecedented appointment of Hego Damask as cochancellor of the Republic. Ageless Hego Damask, as it would ultimately emerge. When that was behind them, they
could turn to the bigger task of obliterating the Jedi Order. Master Dooku’s dithering over leaving the Order came
as no surprise. Yoda had taken Dooku from Serenno, but
he had failed to take Serenno from Dooku. Twenty years
earlier Plagueis had seen the stirrings of the dark side in
him and had attempted since—whenever and wherever
possible—to coax more of those latent powers to the
surface. At Galidraan, in clandestine partnership with the
local governor and members of the Death Watch to lure the
Jedi into an ultimately hopeless confrontation with the True Mandalorians; at Yinchorr and Malastare; and most
recently, through Sidious’s efforts, at Asmeru and Eriadu. Already strong in the Force, trained in combat, and a
diplomat, as well, Dooku might have made for a powerful
partner under different circumstances. Except for the fact
that Dooku, unlike the Dathomiri Zabrak whom Sidious had
trained, would never be content to serve as an apprentice
or a mere assassin. He would demand to become a true Sith, and that would lead to trouble. A better course of
action would be to allow Dooku to find his own way to the
dark side—whatever version of it might be accessible to
him through study of the Sith Holocrons the Jedi
possessed. Better to have him leave the Order of his own
accord and become the benevolent spokesperson for the
disenfranchised, as one might expect from a being of high
status. Yes, better to let him persuade worlds and systems
to secede from the Republic and foment a civil war into which the Jedi could be drawn …
The sudden blare of klaxons put an abrupt end to his musings.
Time is short. OneOne-FourDee returned, moving quickly for a droid.
“Five battleships have been detected, Magister.”
“Ahead of schedule.”
“Perhaps your enemies received intelligence that their
attack plan had been compromised.”
“A sound speculation, FourDee. Is the ship ready?”
“Standing by, Magister.” After a final look around, Plagueis hurried out the gaping
door that led to the courtyard, where the sleek starship
designed by Rugess Nome and built by Raith Sienar was waiting. Styled loosely after a courier ship that had been
commonplace during the ancient Sith Empire, the Infiltrator
still looked as if it had flown out of the past. Just under thirty meters in length and shaped like a throwing dart, it had two
short wings where fletching feathers might have been,
jutting from a round command module and ending in curved
radiator fins that enclosed the module parenthetically when
deployed. But what made the ship unique was a stygiumcrystal-powered cloaking array that occupied much of the
long, tapered prow of the fuselage. As Plagueis entered the cockpit, 11-4D abandoned the
single pilot’s chair for one of the seats that lined the aft
circumference of the module.
“Systems are enabled, Magister.”
Folding himself into the swivel chair, Plagueis secured
the harness, clamped his hands on the yoke, and raised the
ship, which spiraled as it climbed above the towering walls
of the old fort before rocketing into Sojourn’s opaque sky,
invisible to any scanners that might be aimed downside. Already the first energy beams from the enemy flotilla were
streaking into the greel forests, hurling vegetation and
igniting firestorms. Another extinction for some of the
creatures that had been cloned exclusively for the moon, Plagueis thought. A second onslaught of laser beams
struck the tower where he had passed so many hours in
contemplation, toppling it into the courtyard. Outside the
Infiltrator, the air was growing hot and jolting winds were
being whipped up by what had been unleashed from
above. Far to starboard, starlight glinted off an attack ship
that was racing toward the surface. Ground-based turbolaser batteries began to answer with
reciprocating fire, making it appear as if the sky were at war with itself. At the edge of space, short-lived explosions
blossomed, as the shields of targeted ships were
overwhelmed. But others broke through the barrages, their
weapons reducing swaths of forest to ash and blowing
huge chunks of rock from the escarpment. The ground
shook and great columns of smoke poured upward. One,
then another gun emplacement exploded, taking with them
an entire wall of the fort. Plagueis studied the cockpit displays as the Infiltrator
continued to gain elevation and velocity, racing through
smoke and fleeing clouds.
“Rendezvous coordinates are already programmed into
the navicomputer,” 11-4D said from behind him. “The
comm frequency is also preset.” Plagueis swung to the navicomputer as concussions
rocked the ship. He had placed one hand on the device’s
keyboard when the sky seemed to give birth to a sphere of
blinding light. Following a moment of absolute stillness, a
cascade of infernal energy descended on what remained of
the fort and concentric rings of explosive power radiated
outward, leveling everything within a twenty-kilometer radius
from ground zero. The Infiltrator was lifted like a bird caught
in a thermal, and for a moment all its systems failed. Plagueis sat in enraged disbelief. Somehow, Veruna and his cohorts—Gardulla, Black
Sun, and the Bando Gora—had gotten their hands on a
proscribed nuclear device. None of the Sun Guards could
have survived the blast; but then they didn’t deserve to. Nuclear weapons were scarce, and the Echani had
obviously neglected to check with the few black-market
suppliers that had access to them. A pillar of roiling fire and smoke was clawing into the sky,
fanning out in the thinning atmosphere to become a mushroom-shaped cloud. The greel forests were
blackened wastelands; the fort was slagged and turned to
glass. Deeply moved, Plagueis realized that he hadn’t
experienced such powerful emotions since he had bid
good-bye to Mygeeto so many decades earlier and placed
himself in the care of Darth Tenebrous. Adhering to course, the Infiltrator rose out of the turmoil. Stars winked into visibility, and the fleet ship was suddenly
free of the moon’s gravity and pulled into the powerful
embrace of Sojourn’s parent. No sooner had it entered the
planet’s night side than the comm board issued an urgent
tone.
“Magister Damask, we find no trace of your ship on any
of our scanners, but we trust that you’re out there
somewhere.” Plagueis disabled the ship’s cloaking device and
swiveled to the board. “Star Jewel, this is Damask. Your
scanners should be able to find us now.”
“Affirmative, Magister Damask. You are clear to proceed
to Docking Bay Four.” A space cruiser of gargantuan size and ostentatious
design could be seen hanging in the middle distance. Shaped like an arrowhead, the vessel was heavily armed
and large enough to accommodate half a dozen
starfighters. While Plagueis was maneuvering toward it, the
comm board’s enunciators were rattled by a resonant
laugh.
“I hope to persuade you one day to share the secret of
your invisible ship, Magister Damask.”
“I appreciate your punctuality, Jabba Desilijic Tiure. As I
do the advance intelligence that allowed me to avoid being
atomized.”
“Thus are lasting partnerships solidified, Magister. What
is our destination?”
“Coruscant,” Plagueis said. “But I’ve one more favor to
ask before we arrive.”
“Simply state it, and it will be done.”
“Then arrange for communications with Naboo. King
Veruna needs to be informed of what he has brought down
on himself and his confederates.”
Jabba guffawed again. “It will be my pleasure.”
27: CALIBRATIONS
Hego Damask didn’t simply keep a penthouse on Coruscant; he owned an entire building. While it wasn’t as
grand as 500 Republica, Kaldani Spires was the Galactic Center’s most desired address outside the Senate District.
Towering over Monument Plaza, the stately building was as
fine an example of Hasennan Period architecture as could
be found onworld, and from its uppermost suites residents
could see from the peaks of the Manarai Mountains clear to
the Western Sea—Coruscant’s only instances of naked
rock and surface water. A neighborhood for neither
politicians nor the newly arrived, the district catered to solid
old-money citizenry: financiers, corporate chiefs,
industrialists, and bankers. Damask’s residence took up the whole of the Kaldani’s
summit. A pair of Sun Guards rode with Palpatine in the private
turbolift, only to surrender him to another pair stationed in
the penthouse’s light-filled atrium. But it was the droid 11-
4D that escorted him into Damask’s study, which was
darkened by tall, brocade curtains and filled with masterpieces of galactic art. The masked Muun himself
rose from a plush armchair to greet Palpatine as he was
shown into the room.
“Master,” Sidious said, interlocking his hands in front of
him and bowing his head. Plagueis lowered his head in a gesture of mutual
respect. “Welcome, Darth Sidious. It’s good to see you.” As the room was the opposite of the one he had often
confined himself to on Sojourn, Plagueis no longer looked
like the wide-eyed mystic he had seemed only months
earlier. Except for having to wear the breathing device, he
struck Palpatine as a slightly older version of the Muun who
had visited him on Naboo so many decades before.
The two Sith moved to a sunken area of the room and sat
across from each other. Plagueis filled two glasses with
clear wine and passed one to his apprentice. He made the
act of imbibing through his nasal passages seem almost
routine.
“After Sojourn, I find it somewhat dislocating to be back
in the greater world.”
“Master, I’m sorry I wasn’t the first to warn you of the
attack,” Sidious said. “I didn’t think Veruna had the courage
to carry out his veiled threats. Perhaps I nudged him too
far.”A long moment of silence passed between them.
“What you did and didn’t do is immaterial,” Plagueis said
at last. “Coming when it did, at almost precisely the same
time the members of the Trade Federation Directorate were meeting their fates, the attack was the work of the
Force, substantiating our ambitions, especially.” He took more wine and set the glass down. “I never would have had
the heart to destroy Sojourn, though it needed to be done;
and so the Force saw to it. The incident reminds us of the
need to be prepared for sudden eventualities, whether
harmonious or inimical to our plans, and compliant to
circumstance.”
“And now we are justified in striking back,” Sidious said.
“We no longer need to justify our actions to anyone. But
bear in mind what I told you long ago: by killing one, we can
frighten many.” Sidious nodded. “We owe Jabba a great debt.”
“I spoke briefly with Veruna from the Hutt’s ship.” Sidious grinned slightly. “I suspected as much when I
learned just prior to the summit that he had abdicated, and
that Padmé Naberri had been appointed Queen. He has
apparently hidden himself away in Naboo’s Western Reaches.”
“That’s not hiding,” Plagueis said with a note of menace.
“All went well on Eriadu?”
“Better than expected, what with the Jedi running in
circles and convinced that Valorum was the target. I
savored their dismayed incredulity on learning that the
droids had emptied their weapons on the members of the
directorate. In the end, the leaders of the Nebula Front died,
as well, and our friend Wilhuff Tarkin is making matters
difficult for Republic investigators. Soon the aurodium
stolen from the Trade Federation freighter will be
discovered to have been invested in Valorum Shipping and
Transport, making it appear that the Supreme Chancellor’s
push for taxation was motivated by greed and illegal
enrichment. He is brought down. Even his power to deploy
the Jedi or Judicials will be stripped from him.” Plagueis’s eyes narrowed. “And Gunray?”
“Precisely where we want him: leader by default of the
Trade Federation, and busy acquiring the droid weapons
the Senate will sanction. Where the Neimoidians should be
grateful to Senator Palpatine for proposing the summit, they
are instead furious. Everything is in place for launching the
blockade.”
“Almost everything,” Plagueis said. “First, there is the matter of our revenge.”
“Shall I task Maul to pay Veruna a visit?” Plagueis shook his head. “I intend to see to him
personally. Is the Zabrak—Maul, as you call him—capable
of dealing with Alexi Garyn and his Vigos?”
“He will not fail us.” Plagueis considered that for a moment, then said, “The
Infiltrator sits under guard at West Championne Starport. Have Pestage transport the ship to the LiMerge Building,
so that you can present it as a gift to your apprentice. I will
provide you with information about Garyn’s current whereabouts.”
“That leaves only the Hutt and Bando Gora,” Sidious
said.
“I have promised Gardulla to Jabba. As for the Bando Gora …” Plagueis rose from the chair, walked to the
curtained windows, and peered outside. “There is a rumor worth pursuing that Master Dooku’s former apprentice, Komari Vosa, is not only alive but the cult’s newest leader,
and eager to avenge herself on the Jedi Order for having
abandoned her and her comrades on Baltizaar.”
“Vosa turning to the dark side,” Sidious said, as if
thinking aloud. “Dooku trained her better than he knows.”
“Yes, but she is a fallen Jedi, not a Sith. We will exact
revenge on the Bando Gora at another time.” Sidious stood up and joined Plagueis at the parted
curtains. “I will inform Viceroy Gunray to prepare his armed
ships for relocation to the Naboo system.”
In a midlevel hangar in the LiMerge Building, Sidious watched Maul stow the last of his gear and hand-built
contrivances aboard the Infiltrator, which, like the Zabrak’s
speeder bike, now had a name: Scimitar. Closing a cargo
hatch in the forward portion of the hull, Maul stepped back
to admire the ship, then swung to Sidious and genuflected.
“I am not deserving of such a gift, Master.” Sidious glowered. “If you feel that way, then prove your worth to yourself and me by succeeding in your mission.”
“I pledge as much.” Sidious watched him carefully. “We need to dismantle
the Black Sun criminal cartel. The Vigos had strong ties to
some members of the Trade Federation Directorate, and
they suspect there was foul play at Eriadu. Right now, the Neimoidians are in their sights, and we can’t risk having
them interfere with our plans.” He made no mention of Black Sun’s complicity in the
attack on Sojourn. Maul nodded. “I understand, Master.” Sidious made a beckoning motion with his hands. “Rise
and listen carefully, Darth Maul. Time doesn’t permit hunting
down Alexi Garyn and his Vigos one by one. Therefore, make Boss Darnada your first victim. You will find the Dug
at his deep-space reclamation station. Then jump your ship
to Mon Calamari and kill the Vigo called Morn. By then, word of your actions will have reached Garyn, and he will
likely summon the remaining seven Vigos to his fortress on Ralltiir. Narees, Mother Dean, Nep Chung, and the rest. You are to contact me when you have verified that they are
all in one place.” He glanced at the Scimitar. “It will be an
opportunity to put your probe droids to the test.” A look of eagerness took shape on Maul’s fearsome
face. Sidious walked to him and placed his hands atop
Maul’s shoulders. “You will be facing many skilled
opponents, my apprentice. Darnada’s Twi’lek bodyguard, Sinya; Garyn himself, who has some strength in the Force;
and Garyn’s chief protector, Mighella, who is a Nightsister
and will immediately identify you as a Nightbrother.” Maul scowled. “A Nightsister is not a Sith.” Sidious’s eyes narrowed. “As you well know. But as on Dorvalla, take care to leave no witnesses.” Maul showed his sharpened teeth. “It shall be done. And
Black Sun will cease to be an impediment.” Sidious nodded. “Then be on your way, Darth Maul. The
dark side is with you.” Maul bowed his head and hurried up the rear boarding
ramp into the cockpit module. Sidious lingered to watch the
ship rise and edge out of the hangar, becoming invisible as
it flew over The Works. Through the dark side, he continued
to track the Scimitar as it angled north toward the Jedi
Temple rather than south, and away from the Senate District. Sidious recalled the voyages he had taken ten
years earlier to watch Maul fight in gladiatorial matches on Orsis and nearby worlds. Driven to win against all odds,
unaffected by pain, daring, and terrifying. An up-andcoming contender at ten years of age and a champion at
twelve. Under the markings that masked his face, sleeved
his arms, and twisted around his legs and torso, the scars
of those battles to the death. But this one will not be content until he has killed a Jedi
Master, Sidious thought. Assuming that pride didn’t defeat him first.
Leaving the hangar space, Sidious made his way to the
holoprojector in the building’s only refurbished room. What would become of Maul once Palpatine and Damask
assumed control of the Republic? he asked himself. As a
secret weapon, he would continue to be useful, but could he
ever be eased into public life? How would he react to
learning that his Master answered to a Master?
With his feet planted on the transmission grid, Sidious
sat in the chair that was positioned for the holoprojector’s
cams, adjusted the controls built into one of the armrests,
and raised the cowl of his cloak over his head. For twenty
years he had enjoyed living a double life, but now he felt an
urge to be known for who he was, and feared for how
powerful he could be. He directed his thoughts forward in
time, yearning for a clear vision of the future, but none
came. Did the dark side blind even its most devoted
advocates to what was looming on the horizon? Plagueis
had said that they needed to be prepared for sudden
eventualities. Was he withholding knowledge of events he
knew were imminent?
The Muun’s renewed vigor had taken Sidious by
surprise. The mere fact that he had escaped the
devastation on Sojourn made him seem almost
omnipotent. Though even when ensconced in his affluent
citadel in the Manarai district, he had yet to relax his
vigilance or submit to sleep. Repressing a sudden feeling of envy, Sidious began to wonder if—blinded by the dark side—he had actually failed
to divine Veruna’s attack on Sojourn, or if he hadn’t allowed
himself to divine it. A touch of his forefinger activated the holoprojector, and moments later a half-sized eidolon of Nute Gunray resolved
in midair. As in recent transmissions, the viceroy’s Neimoidian underlings, chief litigator Rune Haako, Captain Daultay Dofine, and Deputy Viceroy Hath Monchar were
hovering in the background.
“Lord Sidious,” Gunray said, with a slight stammer in his
voice. “We have been waiting—”
“Do you imagine yourself centermost in my thoughts that I
should neglect other matters to communicate with you
precisely on time?”
“No, Lord Sidious, I simply meant to say—”
“Are you gratified with your new position, Viceroy?”
“Very gratified. Though I appear to have inherited control
of the Trade Federation at a time of crisis.”
“Save your whining for another occasion, Viceroy, for matters are about to become worse.” Gunray’s nictitating membranes spasmed. “Worse? How
can that be?”
“The Republic Senate is on the verge of passing
legislation that will enact taxation of the free-trade zones.”
“This is an outrage!”
“To be sure. But I warned you that this was coming. Supreme Chancellor Valorum has lost all credibility, and
after what occurred at Eriadu, the Senate is determined to weaken the Trade Federation further. King Veruna may
have been able to stall the Senate, but he has abdicated,
and young Queen Amidala and Naboo’s Senator are
leading the call for taxation. With the Senate preoccupied,
the moment is right for you to begin assembling a fleet of
armed freighters to impose a blockade.”
“A blockade? Of what system, Lord Sidious?”
“I will inform you in due time.” When Gunray didn’t
respond, Sidious said, “What is it, Viceroy? Across the
vastness of space, I can perceive the reeling of your feeble
brain.”
“Forgive me, Lord Sidious, but, as my advisers have
pointed out, the redistribution of our vessels carries with it
considerable financial risk. To begin with, there is the cost
of fuel. Then, with so many ships allocated to an embargo,
a disruption in trade in the Mid and Outer Rims for however
long the blockade is maintained. Finally, there is no telling
how our investors might react to the news.” Sidious leaned forward. “So this is about credits, is it?” Gunray’s muzzle twitched. “We are, after all, Lord
Sidious, a commercial enterprise, not a navy.” Sidious didn’t respond immediately. When he did, his
voice oozed disgust. “Even after all I have engineered on
your behalf you fail to grasp that by allying with me you are
investing in the future.” He flicked his right hand in
dismissal. “But no matter. Does it not occur to you that your most valued investors are in a position to reap great profits
from your knowledge of what is about to happen? Would
they not profit from learning that the Xi Char, the Geonosians, and other unionized insectoids have turned
their pincers and claws to the manufacture of weapons?
Might you not balance your precious budget by gaining
from other shipping companies what revenue the Trade
Federation risks losing?” Gunray looked uncertain. “We feared that such actions might undermine the element of surprise, Lord Sidious.”
“That is the reason for swift action.” Gunray nodded. “Iwill order a fleet assembled.” Sidious sat back in the chair. “Good. Remember, Viceroy, that what I have delivered to you I can just as easily
take away.” Sidious ended the transmission and lowered the cowl. Was this a vision of the future? A life of micromanaging
the affairs of incompetent beings while he and Plagueis set
in motion the final phases of the Grand Plan? Or was there
perhaps some other way for him to govern, in malevolent
satisfaction?
* * *
Even without the drenching rain, the ground would have
been soft under Plagueis’s booted feet, composed as it was of eons of decayed organic matter. Water dripped
from the transpirator mask and the raised hood of his cloak
and splashed in the puddles that had formed beneath him.
The castle that had once belonged to Veruna’s ancestor
the Earl of Vis crowned a desolate hill, with no road leading
to it and a view in all directions of the rolling, sodden,
treeless terrain. Through night-vision electrobinoculars Plagueis studied the scanners that studded the castle’s walls and the disposition of the guards, some of whom
were keeping dry in the shelter of an arch that crowned an
ornate portcullis. Parked near the entrance was a veritable
fleet of landspeeders, and off to one side, centered in a
circular landing zone, sat a space yacht whose gleaming
hull even the torrent couldn’t dull. Illumination arrays glowed
behind drifting curtains of rain.
Following a deep, fast-moving rivulet, Plagueis
descended the hill he had climbed to where he had set his
own starship down among a riot of drooping wildflowers
and falconberries. OneOne-FourDee was waiting at the
foot of the boarding ramp, raindrops pinging on its alloy
shell.
“Their scanners may have picked up the ship,” Plagueis
said.
“Given that all countermeasures were enabled, that
seems unlikely, Magister.”
“They’ve flooded the area with light.”
“As any vigilant being might on a night such as this.”
“A night fit for neither Muun nor shaak.”
The droid’s photoreceptors tightened their focus on him.
“The reference escapes my data bank.”
“Seal the ship and remain in the cockpit. If I comm you,
reposition the ship above the castle’s southwest corner and
keep the boarding ramp extended.”
“Are you anticipating resistance, Magister?”
“Merely anticipating, FourDee.”
“I understand. Iwould do the same.”
“That’s comforting to know.” Plagueis fixed the lightsaber hilt to his hip and set out at
a fast clip, all but outracing the rain. If the scanners and motion detectors were as precise as they appeared to be,
they would find him, though his speed might cause whoever
was monitoring the security devices to mistake him for one
of the wild, bushy-tailed quadrupeds that inhabited the
landscape. He paused at the nebulous edge of the
illuminated area to confirm his bearings, then made straight
for the castle’s ten-meter-high southern wall and leapt to the
top without breaking stride. Just as quickly and as
effortlessly he dropped into the garden below and sprinted
into the shadows cast by an ornamental shrub trimmed to
resemble some whimsical beast. Plagueis reasoned that
security would be lax inside the manse, but that Veruna’s wing of rooms would be outfitted with redundant monitoring
devices and perhaps pressure-sensitive floors.
That he hadn’t been able to procure an interior plan of the
castle was a testament to the self-exiled regent’s
hypervigilance. Plagueis moved to a stained-glass window just as two
humans were hurrying through a hallway beyond. With rain
overflowing a gutter high overhead, he felt as if he were
standing behind a waterfall.
“Check on him and report back to me,” the female was
saying. Plagueis recognized the voice of security chief Magneta. Sticking close to the outer wall, he paralleled the movement
of Magneta’s subordinate to the end of the hallway, then
through a right-angled turn into a broader hall that led to a
control room tucked beneath the sweep of a grand
staircase. Plagueis sharpened his auditory senses to hear Magneta’s man ask after Veruna, and a human female
reply, “Sleeping like a baby.”
“Good for him. While the rest of us drown.”
“If you’re so miserable, Chary,” the woman said, “you
should consider returning to Theed.”
“I’m thinking about it.”
“Just don’t expect me to follow you.” Plagueis stepped away from the wall to glance at the
upper-story windows, all of which were dark, save for an
arched opening near the end of the wall. Crouching, he maneuvered through bushes under a series of wide windows, then began to scale the wall, fastened to it like an
insect. The tall and narrow target opening turned out to be a
fixed pane of thick glass; the source of the light, a pair of
photonic sconces that flanked a set of elaborately carved
wooden double doors. Peering through the glass, he flicked
his fingers at a security cam mounted high on the inner wall
and aimed at the doorway, dazzling the mechanism and
freezing the image of an unoccupied antechamber. Then,
placing his left hand at the center of the glass, he called on
the Force, pushing inward on the pane until it broke free of
the adhesive weatherseal that held it in place.
Telekinetically, he manipulated the intact pane to rest atop
a table snugged to the opposite wall of the antechamber,
and slipped through the opening. For a long moment he
remained on the inner windowsill, waiting for his cloak and
boots to dry and studying the patterned floor and double
doors for evidence of additional security devices. Satisfied
that the stunned cam was all there was, he planted his feet
on the floor and walked to the doors, using the Force to
trick them into opening just enough to accommodate his
passing between them.
The only light in Veruna’s enormous bedroom came from
a cam similar to the one in the antechamber, and just as
easily foiled. The former King himself was sleeping on his
back under shimmersilk sheets in the center of a canopied
bed large enough to fit half a dozen humans of average
size. Plagueis disabled a bedside panel of security alarms, moved an antique chair to the foot of the bed, and switched
on a table lamp that supplied dim, yellowish light. Then,
sitting down, he roused Veruna from sleep.
The old man woke with a start, blinking in response to the
light, then propping himself up against a gathering of
pillows to scan the room. His eyes widened in
thunderstruck surprise when they found Plagueis seated at
the edge of the light’s reach.
“Who—”
“Hego Damask, Your Majesty. Beneath this mask my
former enemies may as well have fashioned for me.” Since Veruna’s eyes couldn’t open any wider, his jaw
dropped and he flailed for the security control panels,
slamming his hand down on the buttons when they didn’t
respond.
“I’ve rendered them inoperative,” Plagueis explained,
“along with the security cams. Just so that you and I could
converse without being interrupted.” Veruna swallowed and found his voice. “How did you get
past my guards, Damask?”
“We’ll come to that in a moment.”
“Magne—” Veruna attempted to scream until his voice went mute and he clutched at his throat.
“There will be none of that,” Plagueis warned.
“What do you want with me, Damask?” Veruna asked when he could, breathing hard.
“Closure.” Veruna stared at him in disbelief. “You got what you wanted. Isn’t it enough that I abdicated?”
“Your abdication would have been enough, had you not
tried first to have me killed.” Veruna gritted his teeth. “Everything I built was in
jeopardy of being taken from me—even the monarchy! You
left me no choice!” Plagueis stood and reseated himself on the edge of the
bed, like some macabre confessor. “I understand. Faced with a similar choice, I might have done the same. The
difference is that Iwould have succeeded where you failed.”
“I’ll remain here,” Veruna said in a grasping way. “I won’t
cause you or Palpatine any more trouble.”
“That’s true.” Plagueis paused, then said, “Perhaps I
should have been more honest with you from the start. I
delivered the Trade Federation to you; I put Tapalo, then
you on the throne. How did you imagine I came by such
power?” Veruna ran a trembling hand over his thinning hair. “You were born the son of a wealthy Muun, and transformed that wealth into power.” Plagueis made a sound of disappointment. “Have you
not yet learned that the galaxy isn’t moved by credits
alone?” Veruna gulped and found his voice. “How did you come
by such power, Damask?” he asked in a whisper of
genuine interest.
“I was shown the way to power by a Bith named Rugess Nome.”
“I know the name.”
“Yes, but his true name was Darth Tenebrous, and he wore the mantle of the Dark Lord of the Sith. I was at one
time his apprentice.”
“Sith,” Veruna said, as if weakened by the very word.
“Had you known, would you have allied with me?” Veruna marshaled the strength to shake his head.
“Political power is one thing, but what you represent …” Plagueis made his lips a thin line. “I appreciate your
honesty, Veruna. Are you beginning to tire of my
presence?”
“Not … of you,” Veruna said, with eyes half closed.
“Let me explain what is happening to you,” Plagueis said.
“The cells that make up all living things contain within them
organelles known as midi-chlorians. They are, in addition to
being the basis for life, the elements that enable beings like me to perceive and use the Force. As the result of a
lifetime of study, I have learned how to manipulate midichlorians, and I have instructed the limited number you
possess to return to their source. In plain Basic, Veruna, I
am killing you.” Veruna’s face was losing color, and his breathing had
slowed. “Bring … me back. I can still be … of service … to
you …”
“But you are, Your Majesty. A celebrated ancient poet
once said that every death lessened him, for he considered
himself to be a brother to every living being. I, on the other
hand, have come to understand that every death I oversee
nourishes and empowers me, for I am a true Sith.”
“No … better than … an Anzati.”
“The brain eaters? What does better than mean to those
of us who have passed beyond notions of good and evil?
Are you better than Bon Tapalo? Are you better than Queen Padmé Amidala? I am the only one fit to answer the
question. Better are those who do my bidding.” Plagueis
placed his hand atop Veruna’s. “I’ll remain with you for a while as you meld with the Force. But at some point, I will
have to leave you at the threshold to continue on your own.”
“Don’t do this … Damask. Please …”
“I am Darth Plagueis, Veruna. Your shepherd.” As life left Veruna’s body, the path he and Plagueis
followed wound deeper into darkness and absence. Then Plagueis stopped, overcome by a sudden sense that he
had already seen and traveled this path. Had he? he wondered as Veruna breathed his last. Or had the Force afforded him a glimpse of the future?
28: CHAIN OF COMMAND
Returned from Ralltiir, Maul sat cross-legged on the floor in
the LiMerge Building while Sidious debriefed him. Having
just terminated an irritating communication with the Neimoidians, Sidious was in no mood for games.
“The way you make it sound, my apprentice, it seems
almost an indignity that none survived to spread the word of
your massacre.”
“You orders were that none should, Master.”
“Yes,” Sidious said, continuing to circle him. “And not one
of them proved a challenge?”
“No, Master.”
“Not Sinya?”
“I decapitated the Twi’lek.”
“Not Mighella?”
“My blade halved the Nightsister after she tried to defeat me with summoned Force-lightning.” Sidious paused for a moment. “Not evenGaryn?”
“No.” Sidious detected a note of hesitation. “No, what, Darth
Maul?”
“I drowned him.”
Touching his chin, Sidious stood where the Zabrak could
see him.
“Well, someone had to have dealt the wound you suffered
to your left hand. Unless, of course, you gave it to yourself.” Maul clenched the black-gloved hand. “There is no pain where strength lies.”
“I didn’t inquire if the wound hurt. I asked who was
responsible.”
“Garyn,” Maul said quietly.
Sidious feigned surprise. “So he was something of a
challenge. Being slightly Force-sensitive.”
“He was nothing compared with the power of the dark
side.” Sidious studied him. “Did you tell him as much, my
apprentice? Answer honestly.”
“He came to the conclusion.”
“He identified you as a Sith. Did he assume, then, that
you were a Sith Lord?” Maul stared at the floor. “I—”
“You revealed that you answer to a Master. Am I
correct?” Maul forced himself to respond. “Yes, Master.”
“And perhaps you went so far as to say something about
the revenge of the Sith.”
“I did, Master.” Sidious approached him, his face contorted in anger.
“And if by some marvel Garyn had managed to escape, or
even defeat the one-being army that is Darth Maul, what
repercussions might we be facing, apprentice?”
“I beg your forgiveness, Master.”
“Perhaps you’re not worthy of the Infiltrator, after all. The moment you allowed yourself to become distracted, the Black Sun leader cut open your hand.” Maul remained silent.
“I hope you thanked him before you killed him,” Sidious went on, “because he taught you a valuable lesson. When
you face someone strong in the Force you must remain
focused—even when you’re convinced that your opponent
is incapacitated. Then is not the time to bask in the glory of
your victory or draw out the moment. You must deliver a
killing strike and be done with it. Reserve your self-praise
for after the fact, or you will suffer more than a hand wound.”
“Iwill remember, Master.”
The silence attenuated. “Iwant you to leave Coruscant for
the time being.” Maul looked up in alarm.
“Take the Infiltrator and your combat droids and return to
your former home. There, train and meditate until I recall
you.”
“My lord, I beg—” Sidious held up his hands. “Enough! You executed the mission well, and I am pleased. Now learn from your mistake.” Maul rose slowly, bowed his head once, and headed for
the hangar. Watching him leave, Sidious examined the
nature of his unease.
Might he, in a similar situation, have given in to an urge to
gloat and reveal his true identity?
Had Plagueis done so before killing Veruna? Had he felt
compelled to come out from behind his mask? To be
honest?
Or was Maul’s revelation to Garyn nothing more than a
symptom of the dark side’s growing impatience, and its
demand for full disclosure?
“Black Sun is in utter disorder,” Palpatine told Hego Damask as they strolled among the sightseers that
crowded Monument Plaza. Hundreds were clustered
around the summit of Umate, which jutted from the center of
the bowl-shaped park, and mixed-being groups of others were trailing tour guides toward the old Senate agora or the Galactic Museum. “Prince Xixor and Sise Fromm will
inherit the dregs.”
“Again, the Zabrak proves his value,” Damask said. “You
trained him well.”
“Perhaps not well enough,” Palpatine said after a moment. “While I was questioning him about a wound he
received, he confessed to having divulged his identity to Alexi Garyn.” Angling his masked face away from Palpatine, Damask
said, “Garyn is dead. What does it matter now?”
The Muun’s flippant tone put Palpatine further on edge,
but his composure held.
“This may be the last time I’m permitted to appear in
public without armed escort,” he said in a casual way.
“When Queen Amidala informed me of Veruna’s
unexpected death, she mentioned that her new chief of
security—a man named Panaka—will be taking
unprecedented steps to ensure the safety of all Naboo
diplomats. The Queen, for example, is to be surrounded by
a clutch of handmaidens, all of whom resemble her to some
extent.”
“And you’re be to chaperoned at all times?” Damask
asked. “That won’t do.”
“I’ll convince Panaka otherwise.”
They stopped to watch a group of younglings at play
under one of the plaza’s banners. Plagueis indicated a
nearby bench, but Palpatine’s disquiet wouldn’t allow him to
sit.
“Did the Queen express any concern about the presence
of so many Trade Federation freighters?” Palpatine shook his head. “The fleet is holding at the
edge of the system, awaiting word from me to jump to Naboo. As angry as Gunray is about the taxation
legislation, I had to convince him that Naboo is significant
enough to ensure galactic interest in the blockade. I
assured him that Amidala will not allow her people to suffer,
and that before a month has elapsed she will sign a treaty
that will make Naboo and Naboo’s plasma property of the
Trade Federation.”
The transpirator concealed Damask’s smile, but it was
clear that he liked what he heard. “While Valorum dithers, Senator Palpatine garners the sympathy of the electorate.” He tracked Palpatine. “Is it not a measure of our success
that we can award worlds as if they were mere business
contracts?” A group of well-dressed Twi’leks sauntered by, gaping at
Palpatine in recognition. That he should openly fraternize with a Muun was an indication of the power and influence of
both beings.
It was Damask who had stressed the importance of their
being seen together in public; and so, in the weeks since
the Muun had arrived on Coruscant, they had dined on
several occasions at the Manarai and other exclusive
restaurants, and had attended recitals at both the Coruscant and Galaxies operas. Most recently they had
been present at an elite gathering in 500 Republica, hosted
by Senator Orn Free Taa, at which Plagueis had overheard
the Rutian Twi’lek discussing plans to nominate Palpatine
for the chancellorship. Next on their busy agenda was a
political rally scheduled to take place on Coruscant’s Perlemian Orbital Facility, where potential candidates for
the office of Supreme Chancellor would have a chance to mingle with corporation executives, lobbyists,
campaigners, and even some Jedi Masters.
“A blockade followed by an actual invasion isn’t likely to win the Trade Federation any new allies,” Damask was
saying. “But if nothing else we’ll be able to assess the
performance of Gunray’s droid army and make adjustments
as necessary.”
“Through their own carelessness, the Neimoidians managed to compromise their secret foundries on Eos and
Alaris Prime,” Palpatine said, letting some of his
exasperation show. Damask eyed him. “For the moment, they have what they
need. The acquisition of Naboo will demonstrate the
failings of diplomacy, and prompt a sense of militancy
among the Jedi.” Keeping his gaze fixed on Palpatine, he
added, “In preparation for the coming war, we will relocate Baktoid Armor to Geonosis. Even then, however, we can’t
equip our allies with sufficient weapons to secure a quick
victory. A drawn-out conflict will ensure a galaxy pounded to
a pulp and eager to embrace us.” Palpatine finally sat down. “We still need to raise an army
for the Jedi to command. But one that answers ultimately to
the Supreme Chancellor.”
“A grown army could be designed to do just that,” Damask said. Palpatine considered it. “It sounds too simple. Jedi are
not easily taken by surprise. Honed for warfare, they will be
even more difficult to ensnare.”
“At the end of a long war, perhaps? With victory in sight?”
“To achieve that, both sides would have to be managed.” Palpatine blew out his breath. “Even if a surprise attack
could be launched, not every Jedi would be in the field.”
“Only those suitable for combat would need concern us.” Palpatine broke a long silence. “The Kaminoan cloners
failed you once.” Damask acknowledged the statement with a nod.
“Because I gave them a Yinchorri template. They told me
then that your species might be easier to replicate.”
“You’ll contact them again?”
“This army must not be traced to us. But there is
someone I might be able to persuade to place the initial
order.” Palpatine waited, but Damask had nothing to add. The
fact that he had said as much about the matter as he
intended to say brought Palpatine full-circle to
consternation. Abruptly, he stood and paced away from the
bench.
“Instruct the Neimoidians to launch the blockade,”
Damask said to his back. “It’s important that events be set
in motion before the orbital facility congress.” When Palpatine didn’t respond, Plagueis stood and followed him.
“What’s troubling you, Sidious? Perhaps you feel that
you’ve become nothing more than a messenger.” Palpatine whirled on him. “Yes, at times. But I know my
place, and am content with it.”
“What, then, has whipped you to a froth?”
“The Neimoidians,” Palpatine said with sudden
conviction. “In addition to Gunray, I have been dealing with
three others: Haako, Daultay, and Monchar.”
“I know Monchar slightly,” Damask said. “He maintains a
suite in the Kaldani Spires.”
“He was absent when I last spoke withGunray.” Suspicion bloomed in the Muun’s eyes, and he hissed,
“Where were they, then?”
“Aboard their flagship. Gunray claimed that Monchar had
taken ill as a result of rich food.”
“But you know better.” Palpatine nodded. “The sniveling toady knows about the
blockade. I suspect that he’s on the loose, and out for
profit.” Damask’s eyes flashed yellow. “This is what happens when beings are promoted beyond their level of
competence!” Palpatine tensed in anger.
“Not you,” Damask said quickly. “Gunray and his ilk! The
Force harrows and penalizes us for consorting with those
too ignorant to appreciate and execute our designs!” Palpatine took comfort in the fact that even Plagueis had
his limits. “I failed to heed your words about sudden
reversals.” Damask frowned at him, then relaxed. “I ignore my own
advice. The blockade must wait.”
“Iwill recall Maul,” Palpatine said.
* * *
Two weeks after the Neimoidian’s unannounced
disappearance from the flagship Saak’ak, Plagueis and
Sidious knew only that Darth Maul had succeeded in
tracking down and killing Hath Monchar—though not without
wide-ranging collateral damage—and that Maul had piloted
the stealth Infiltrator to a docking station linked by a series
of zero-g air locks to the Perlemian Orbital Facility’s
principal reception dome, a grand enclosure that looked
out on a sweep of Coruscant and the stars beyond, and was designed to feel more like a garden in space than a
sterile conference hall. Just then the dome was filled with
Senators and judges, corporate leaders and ambassadors,
power brokers and media pundits, and contingents of
Senate Guards and Jedi.
“Why did you order him to come here, of all places?” Damask asked Palpatine during a respite from the
handshaking, casual conversation, and forced conviviality. Dressed in their finest robes, they were standing near a
back-lighted waterfall, nodding to passing beings, even as
the two of them conspired. “He has cut a swath of
destruction through the Crimson Corridor and killed two
Jedi, along with beings of a dozen species, including a Hutt. We can’t trust that someone isn’t on his scent—if not
Jedi then perhaps law enforcement personnel. If by some
fluke he were to be apprehended, he has the skill to
scramble the minds of ordinary beings, but not to cloak
himself from a Jedi. Both our existence and our plans for
the blockade could be endangered.”
“Jedi were on his scent,” Palpatine explained. “That’s
precisely why I ordered him offworld.” Damask started to respond, but stopped himself and
began again. “He is in possession of this holocron Monchar
recorded?” Palpatine nodded. “I instructed Pestage to clear a route
through a seldom-used docking bay. I merely have to
rendezvous with Maul at the prearranged time and place.” Damask still wasn’t convinced. The Monchar affair had
almost ended in catastrophe. It was as if the Force, so
often compared to a current, had been diverted into a sheer
canyon and twisted back on itself to generate treacherous
eddies and hydraulics. “Why not simply have him surrender
the crystal to Pestage?” he asked at last.
“We don’t know what other sensitive data the holocron might contain.” Damask exhaled forcefully through the mask. “I trust that
at least you instructed him not to be seen.” He glanced
around him. “A tattooed Zabrak enrobed in head-to-toe
black would certainly stand out among this crowd.” Palpatine couldn’t argue the point. Off to one side of
them stood Senator BailAntilles and his aides.A Prince on
his homeworld of Alderaan and chair of the Senate’s
Internal Activities Committee, the handsome, dark-haired
Antilles was surrounded by a crowd that included Core World Senators and businessbeings, all of whom had
pledged to support him in the coming election, and Jedi
Master Jorus C’baoth, who had been enlisted to arbitrate a
dispute among some of Alderaan’s royal houses. An
arrogant, wild-eyed human, C’baoth was cut from the same
cloth as Dooku, whose absence from the political gathering
had been noted by many. Antilles had been the Sith’s pawn
in bringing to the fore accusations of wrongdoing on the
part of Valorum during the Eriadu crisis, but the notoriety he
had gained as a result—in the Senate and in the media—
had bolstered his campaign and made him the current top
candidate for the chancellorship. No Jedi had attached themselves to Ainlee Teem, who was also within view. But the Malastare Gran was widely
popular on many Mid and Outer Rim worlds, and enjoyed
the support of Senator Lott Dod, of the Trade Federation,
and Shu Mai, of the Commerce Guild. At the center of the domed hall stood Valorum and Sei
Taria, who was as media-savvy as she was lovely. Though
ineligible for reelection, recently stripped of some of his Senatorial powers, and frequently engaged in defending
himself against accusations by the Ethics Committee, Valorum had managed to make himself the center of
attention, due to the presence of Masters Yoda, Mace Windu, and Adi Gallia among his followers. Merely by
standing with the Supreme Chancellor, the Jedi were
sending a message that they would continue to support him
for the remainder of his term of office, the calumny of illegal
enrichment notwithstanding. With the Trade Federation fleet still holding in the Chommell sector, and without a besieged world to
generate sympathy and support for his nomination, Palpatine might have been just one more potential nominee —but for the company of Hego Damask; Banking Clan cochairman San Hill; recently appointed Senate Vice
Chairman Mas Amedda; and Senator Orn Free Taa, a moving target for Antilles’s investigation into corruption and
now ostracized by the Rim Faction for backing Palpatine.
“It’s almost time,” Palpatine said. He indicated a
gardened area of dwarf trees and shrubs close to where Ainlee Teem was conferring with a handful of Senators. “I’ll
trade quips with the Gran, then find some pretext to excuse myself.” Damask grunted noncommittally. “My own target is in
sight, in any case.” Without further word the two separated, Damask weaving his way through the crowd toward a grim-faced,
bearded human Jedi who was standing apart from
everyone, observing the scene.
“Master Sifo-Dyas,” he called.
The topknotted Jedi turned and, recognizing him, nodded
in greeting. “Magister Damask.”
“I hope I’m not intruding.” Sifo-Dyas shook his head, his gaze fixed on the breath mask. “No, I was …” He exhaled and began again,
adjusting his stance. “Until your recent arrival on Coruscant,
Iwas under the impression that you had retired.” Damask loosed an exaggerated sigh. “It is not in a Muun’s blood to retire. I work now with only a few powerful
but largely invisible clients.”
The Jedi lifted a graying eyebrow. “It seems I can’t view a
news holo that doesn’t feature you and Senator Palpatine, who is anything but invisible.”
“To my thinking, he is the only one capable of rescuing
the Republic from the brink.” Sifo-Dyas grunted. “To remain untouched by scandal for
twenty years is in itself extraordinary. So perhaps you’re
right.” Damask waited a moment, then said, “I have never
forgotten our discussion on Serenno.”
“What discussion was that, Magister?”
“We spoke at some length of threats that were assailing
the Republic even then.” Sifo-Dyas grew pensive. “I have some vague
recollection.”
“Well, what with assassinations, taxation of the free-trade
zones, posturing by the Trade Federation, and accusations
of political impropriety, the conversation has been much on my mind of late. Fractiousness, factionalism, intersystem
conflicts … Even in this hall the Jedi appear to be divided
in their loyalties. Master C’baoth here, Masters Yoda and
Gallia there, and yet no sign of Master Dooku.” Sifo-Dyas said nothing.
“Master Jedi, I want to share with you a suspicion I’ve
been carrying like a burden.” Damask paused. “I have
reason to suspect that the Trade Federation has secretly
been procuring more weapons than anyone realizes.” Sifo-Dyas’s forehead furrowed. “Do you have evidence
of this?”
“No hard evidence. But my business demands a
thorough knowledge of the investment markets. Also, my
clients sometimes reveal information to me in private.”
“Then you’re breaking confidentiality by coming to me with this.”
“I am. But only because I believe so strongly that what was once speculation is now fact. To go further, I predict
that a civil war is brewing. I give the Republic fifteen years
at the most. Soon we’ll see disgruntled star systems begin
to secede. They will lack only a strong, charismatic leader
to unite them.” He fell briefly silent before adding: “I will be
blunt with you, Master Sifo-Dyas: the Republic will be
vulnerable. The Jedi will be too few to turn the tide. A military needs to be created now, while there’s still a
chance.” Sifo-Dyas folded his arms across his chest. “I encourage
you to share this with Supreme Chancellor Valorum, or
even Senator Palpatine, Magister.”
“I intend to. But even under Chancellor Valorum’s watch
this Senate will not overturn the ReformationAct. Too many
Senators have a financial stake in galactic war. They are
heavily invested in corporations that will grow fat on profits
from weapons and reconstruction. War will be beneficial for
an economy they now view as stagnant.”
“Are you willing to state this in front of an investigatory
committee?” Damask frowned with his eyes. “You have to understand
that many of these corporations are owned and operated
by my clients.” A dark look came over the Jedi’s face. “You have read
my thoughts, Magister. I have also sensed that war is
imminent. I’ve confessed as much to Master Yoda and
others, but to no avail. They give all appearances of being
unconcerned. Or preoccupied. I’m no longer sure.”
“Master Dooku, as well?” Sifo-Dyas sniffed. “Unfortunately, Magister, Dooku’s
recent statements about Republic discord and our Order’s
‘self-righteousness’ have only added to my concern.”
“You said that you have some vague recall of our
conversation on Serenno. Do you remember my mentioning a group of gifted cloners?”
“I’m sorry, I do not.”
“They are native to an extragalactic world called Kamino.
I have on occasion done business with them on behalf of
clients who desire cloned creatures, or require cloned
laborers capable of working in harsh environments.”
The Jedi shook his head in uncertainty. “What does this
have to do with anything?”
“I believe that the Kaminoans could be induced to grow
and train a cloned army.” Sifo-Dyas took a long moment to reply. “You said
yourself that the Republic would never sanction an army.”
“The Republic needn’t know,” Damask said cautiously.
“Neither would the Jedi Order have to know. It would be an
army that might never have to be used, and yet be available
in reserve should need ever arise.”
“Who in their right mind would fund an army that might
never be used?”
“I would,” Damask said. “Along with some of my
associates in the Banking Clan—and in conjunction with
contacts in Rothana Heavy Engineering, which would
supply the ships, armaments, and other matériel.” Sifo-Dyas fixed him with a look. “Come to the point, Magister.”
“The Kaminoans will not create an army for me, but they would do so for the Jedi Order. They have been fascinated
by the Jedi for millennia.” Sifo-Dyas’s dark brown eyes widened. “You’re not
proposing cloning Jedi—”
“No. I have been assured that such a thing is impossible,
in any case. But I have also been assured that a human
army a million strong could be ready for deployment in as
few as ten years.”
“You’re suggesting that I circumvent the High Council.”
“I suppose I am. The Kaminoans need only a modest
down payment, which I could provide to you through
untraceable accounts Imaintain inOuter Rim banks.” Again, the Jedi remained silent for a long moment. “I
need time to consider this.”
“Of course you do,” Damask said. “And when you’ve
reached a decision, you can contact me at my residence
downside.” Sifo-Dyas nodded in glum introspection, and Damask
spun on his heel and disappeared into the crowd. Palpatine was just returning to the place where they had been
standing earlier, his eyes and his movements suggesting
unusual excitement.
“You have the holocron?” Damask said as he
approached.
“Yes, but not from Maul.” Damask waited for an explanation.
“It was dropped into my hand by none other than the
information broker Maul had been pursuing and thought
dead—Lorn Pavan. The fact that Pavan’s right hand had
been cleanly and recently amputated told me at once that
the two fought in one of the air locks.”
“This Pavan defeated Maul?” Palpatine shook his head. “But I suspect that Pavan
somehow managed to outwit him and take him by
surprise.”
“Incredible,” Damask said, astonished that events could
become even more convoluted. “Then Pavan must know
what the holocron contains.”
“I’m supposed to deliver it to the Jedi,” Palpatine said with obvious amusement; and looking around, added,
“Perhaps to Yoda or Windu …”
“Pavan,” Damask snapped. Palpatine squared his shoulders. “Pestage and Doriana
are escorting him downside, where he’ll receive medical
attention, maybe even a new hand, and a comfortable hotel
suite in which to spend the final day of his life.”
“A reward we should withhold from Maul, but probably won’t.” Damask glanced at Palpatine. “In any event, it wasn’t Pavan who handed you the holocron. It was
delivered by the dark side.” Palpatine thought about it for a moment. “And Sifo- Dyas? Will he do it?”
“Even if he decides against it, there may be a way to
place the order in his name. But the Force tells me that he will do it.”
“That will make him a potential danger to us.” Damask nodded. “But it won’t matter. We have become
invincible.”
This will never do, Palpatine thought as he sat opposite Valorum in the Supreme Chancellor’s cloudcutting office in
the Senate Building, listening to him drone on about his
troubles with the Ethics Committee.
The view through the large triangular windows was
pleasant enough, but the office was far too small. Worse, it
felt more like a relic from a bygone age rather than a nerve
center for the New Order. No amount of remodeling could
transform it into the space Palpatine imagined for himself. Perhaps a new building was required; an annex of sorts or,
better still, an executive office building—if only to grant
those who would work there the illusion that their pitiful
efforts mattered …
“The deeper my lawyers and accountants pursue this matter, the more dead ends they encounter,” Valorum was
saying. Dark circles underscored his eyes, and his hands were trembling slightly. “The aurodium ingots the Nebula
Front stole from the Trade Federation freighter were
converted to credits, which were used to finance their
operations on Asmeru and Eriadu. But the ingots
themselves moved through a series of specious banks and
other financial institutions, and were ultimately invested in
Valorum Shipping by unknown parties. I say unknown
because the beings listed as investors appear never to
have existed.”
“Baffling,” Palpatine said, drawing out the word. “I don’t
know what to think.” A week had passed since the Perlemian political
gathering. Lorn Pavan was dead by Maul’s lightsaber, a
day before an artificial hand was to have been grafted to
the information broker’s stub of forearm.Cost cutting,
Plagueis had remarked at the time. Valorum was resting his head in his hands. “That
someone or some organization engineered this to cripple me is beyond doubt. The question of why anyone—even my most stalwart detractors in the Senate—would essentially
discard tens of millions of credits to achieve this in the final months of my term is inexplicable.” He raised his face to Palpatine. “My immediate predecessors were bold, and
they knew how to manage the Senate. I believed I could
bring something different to the office. A quieter diplomacy;
one informed by the Force, and by the ideals of the Jedi
Order.” Palpatine suppressed an urge to leap across the desk
and strangle him.
“I realize that I’ve made some poor decisions. But has
any chancellor in the past century had to face more
challenges than I have? Has any chancellor had to deal with
a more corrupt and self-serving Senate, or more megalomaniacal corporations?” Valorum closed his eyes
and exhaled. “Whoever is behind this machination wants
nothing more than to destroy my legacy entirely; to make
the name Valorum seem a stain on history …”
“Then we must double our efforts to exonerate you,” Palpatine said. Valorum laughed without amusement. “I’m useless to the Republic if we can’t. Until the matter is resolved, I’m
prohibited from sanctioning the use of Jedi or Judicials to
intervene in disputes. I’m not permitted to convene special
sessions without the express consent of this new vice
chancellor, Mas Amedda, who blocks my every proposal
and venerates procedure as if it were holy text.”
“Deception begins with bureaucracy,” Palpatine said. Silent for a moment, Valorum adopted an expression of
resolve. “I’m not without ideas.” He tapped a touch screen built into his desk, and a large
data display resolved above the holoprojector. Rising from
his chair, he indicated a graph on which several dozen
corporations were listed.
“One might assume—in light of the accusations stacked
against me—that my family’s concern on Eriadu would
suffer a sudden decline in the market. But precisely the
opposite is happening. Credits have been flowing into
Valorum Shipping at an unparalleled rate, and to several
other shipping and transport concerns, as well—many of
them based in the Outer Rim. And that’s not all.” His hands returned to the touch screen, and a second
graph took shape alongside the first. “Investments in minor
suppliers of plasma and alternative energy conglomerates
have increased threefold. But most important, a surge has
occurred in the military supply sector, with astonishing
growth in Baktoid Armor Workshop, Haor Chall
Engineering, the Colicoid Creation Nest, and similar
providers.” Palpatine, despite himself, was impressed. “What do
these data suggest?”
“That some nefarious business is unfolding under our
very noses. That even the scandal in which I’m embroiled may be part of a larger plan.” Palpatine was about to respond when the voice of
Valorum’s personal secretary issued from the intercom.
“Supreme Chancellor, I apologize for interrupting, but we
have received an urgent transmission from Queen Amidala,
of Naboo.”
“The Queen!” Palpatine said with theatrical surprise.
“Can you direct the transmission to my office?” Valorum
said.
“Our comm techs are telling me that the signal is very weak, but that they will do their best.” Palpatine and Valorum turned to the office holoprojector
table and waited. Within moments a noisy, fluctuating 3-D
image of Naboo’s pale-faced teenage queen appeared.
“Supreme Chancellor Valorum,” she said. “We bring
news of a grave development on our homeworld. Without warning, the Neimoidian faction of the Trade Federation
has initiated a blockade. Their massive freighters encircle
our world, and no ships are permitted to arrive or depart.” Palpatine and Valorum exchanged stunned looks. How perfectly she plays her part, Palpatine thought. Sitting on her throne like some costumed and overly madeup animatronic doll. The stately pose, the uninflected voice,
long-bearded adviser Sio Bibble standing to one side,
dark-complected security chief Panaka to the other …
“Your Highness, have the Neimoidians communicated
any demands?” Valorum asked as the blue-tinged image
flickered, stabilized, and flickered again.
“Viceroy Gunray states that the blockade has been
launched in protest of the Senate’s decision to tax shipping
in the free-trade zones. He assures that any attempts to
break the embargo will meet with deadly force. Unless the
new regulations are rescinded, he is prepared to see
everyone on Naboo starve.” Valorum clenched his hands. “Your Majesty, Senator Palpatine is here with me.” Neither Amidala’s expression nor her flat tone of voice wavered. “Senator Palpatine, we are pleased that you are
able to hear this news firsthand.”
“Your Highness,” Palpatine said, stepping into view of the
holoprojector cams and inclining his head. “I will contact the
Trade Federation delegates immediately and demand that
this blockade be terminated.”
“Demands may not be enough to sway them, Senator. Naboo requests that the Republic intervene in this matter
as quickly as possible.”
“And it will, Your Highness,” Valorum said all too quickly.
“I will convene a special session … I pledge that Naboo will
have my undivided attention.” Amidala nodded. “You have shown us much courtesy in
the past, Supreme Chancellor. We trust that you will do
everything in your power, as you are our only hope.”
The transmission ended abruptly.
“The face of this nefarious business reveals itself,” Palpatine said. Valorum returned to his desk and sat. “I give you my word —for your help during the Yinchorri Crisis and for so many
years of friendship—that this situation will not stand.
Though my hands be bound, I will find some way to resolve
this.”
“I know that you will try, Supreme Chancellor.” Valorum took a deep breath. “One word of advice, Palpatine. Prepare to be thrust into the spotlight.”
29: THE FORCE STRIKES BACK
Though the blockade of Naboo had been launched in direct
defiance of Republic law—as much a protest against
taxation as it was a challenge to the jurisdiction of the Jedi —it failed to achieve the immediate effect Plagueis and
Sidious had anticipated. Far from the Core, Naboo hadn’t
been invaded, and no important beings had died, as had
occurred during the Yinchorri Crisis and at the summit on Eriadu. Thus the blockade was viewed by many as little more than saber rattling by the vexed Trade Federation; an
inconvenience to those worlds that relied on the consortium
for goods; the latest in a series of confrontations to expose
the incompetence of a hopelessly splintered Senate. Nevertheless, the two Sith had worked tirelessly to make
the most of Naboo’s predicament to secure support among
Palpatine’s peers, and ensure not only that his name would
be placed in nomination, but that he could win if nominated. Equally important, they had to make certain that Palpatine
could marshal enough votes in the Senate to ratify his
decision to appoint Hego Damask co-chancellor.
For a change, Damask had taken the lead—making the
rounds, making promises, calling in long-overdue favors
and debts—while Palpatine, for appearances’ sake, made
several futile attempts to meet privately with Trade
Federation representative Lott Dod. Pestage, Doriana,
Janus Greejatus, Armand Isard, and others were also busy
behind the scenes, planting incriminating evidence where
necessary, and seeing to it that instances of graft were made public.
Their joint efforts did not constitute a political campaign
so much as an exercise in elaborate subterfuge.
“Bail Antilles remains the front-runner,” Plagueis told
Sidious when he arrived at the Muun’s penthouse.
“Ironically, the crisis at Naboo has drawn the Core Worlds
into a tighter circle. Where Antilles has always been in
danger of being dismissed as the candidate most likely to
follow in Valorum’s footsteps, he is suddenly the darling of
those advocating for strong, central authority.”
“He can be undermined,” Sidious said. “What about
Teem?”
“In addition to the Trade Federation, Teem now has the
backing of the Corporate Policy League.” Sidious remained indifferent. “The Senate is not ready to
elect a militant, much less a militant Gran. Embracing the
support of the CPL is equivalent to promising the repeal of
anti-slavery restrictions.” Plagueis’s frustration was evident, even if his frown was
hidden. “Interest in Naboo is already beginning to wane,
and with it the sympathy vote we counted on.” Sidious had his mouth open to respond when his comlink
chimed, and he held the device to his ear. Plagueis watched him closely.
“That is most welcome news,” Sidious said into the
device, as if in a daze. “I didn’t expect this … A good
choice, I think … I am certain of it, Supreme Chancellor … Yes, I’m sure she meant every word of it.”
“What now?” Plagueis asked the moment Palpatine
broke the connection. Sidious shook his head in disbelief. “Valorum somehow managed to persuade the Council to send two Jedi to Naboo.” Despite all his talk about invincibility, Plagueis looked
confounded. “Without Senate approval? He tightens the
noose around his own neck!”
“And ours,” Sidious said, “if the Neimoidians panic and
decide to admit the truth about the blockade.” Plagueis paced away from him in anger. “He must have
approached the High Council in secret. Otherwise, Mas Amedda would have apprised us.” Sidious followed the Muun’s nervous movements.
“Dooku mentioned that the Council would continue to
support him.”
“Did Valorum say which Jedi were sent?”
“Qui-Gon Jinn and his Padawan, Obi-Wan Kenobi.” Plagueis came to an abrupt halt. “Worse news yet. I have met Qui-Gon, and he is nothing like some of the others Dooku trained.”
“They are a pesky duo,” Sidious said. “The nemesis of
the Nebula Front at Dorvalla, Asmeru, and on Eriadu.”
“Then Gunray and his sycophants stand no chance
against them.” Sidious had an answer ready. “Two lone Jedi are no match for thousands of battle droids and droidekas. I will
order Gunray to kill them.”
“And we will have another Yinchorr, and the added
danger of Gunray divulging our actions, past and present.” Plagueis thought for a moment. “Qui-Gon will evade
detection by the droids and wreak slow but inevitable havoc
on the flagship.”
“Then I will command Gunray to launch the invasion
ahead of schedule. Protecting the Naboo will become the
immediate concern, as opposed to arresting the Neimoidians. Gunray may balk at the idea, but I will assure
him that the Republic will not intervene.” Plagueis agreed. “Amedda can deny any request
Valorum makes to convene the Senate in special session. Still …”
They regarded each other in stony silence; then Sidious
nodded.
“Iwill see to it that Maul is ready.” Plagueis pressed his hands together. “It is the will of the
dark side that we finally reveal ourselves,” he said in a
solemn voice.
It certainly wasn’t that he didn’t trust Darth Sidious. But
Plagueis had never observed Maul at close range, and he was curious about Sidious’s relationship with him. He knew
that they had seldom met outside The Works, let alone walked together on a balcony of one of Coruscant’s most
stylish monads in the dead of night, wrapped in their
cowled cloaks. But it was only fitting that they should finally
do so. With 11-4D close at hand, Plagueis stood observing
the two of them from afar, his presence in the Force minimized.
The invasion and occupation of Naboo were proceeding
on schedule, and the swamps were being searched in an
effort to locate and isolate the principal underwater habitats
of the planet’s indigenous Gungans, before they could pose
a threat. But the two Jedi, Queen Amidala, and her retinue
of body doubles and guards had succeeded in blasting
their way through the blockade. With Maul’s help,
counterfeit messages from the Queen’s adviser Sio Bibble
had been transmitted to the missing starship, and one
transmission had returned a faint connection trace to the Hutt-owned world of Tatooine. On learning as much, Plagueis had considered asking Jabba to apprehend the Queen, but not for long, out of concern for what the dark
side might demand of him in return.
“Tatooine is sparsely populated,” 11-4D said, repeating what the Dathomiri Zabrak was saying to Sidious. “If the
trace was correct, Iwill find them quickly, Master.”
“Go on,” Plagueis said quietly.
“In reply, Sidious is instructing Maul to make the Jedi his
first priority. Once Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan are disposed of, Maul is to return Queen Amidala to Naboo and force her to
sign a treaty that cedes control of the planet and its plasma
reserves to the Trade Federation.”
The droid paused, then added, “Maul says, ‘At last we
reveal ourselves to the Jedi. At last we will have revenge.’ ”
In the distance, Sidious turned to Maul.
FourDee sharpened its auditory inputs. “Sidious says:
‘You have been well trained, my young apprentice. They will
be no match for you.’ ”
The words stirred deep misgiving in Plagueis and he
stretched out with the Force, attuned to its swirling currents. Momentarily, the gates that obscured the future parted and
he had a glimpse of events to come, or events that might
come. Either way, he was not encouraged. Had he and Sidious misunderstood? Would it be better
to abort the plan and trust that Palpatine would be elected
even without having Naboo fall to the Trade Federation?
Once the Jedi learned of the existence of one Sith, would
they launch an intense hunt for the other?
Sidious had formed an almost filial bond with Maul. Attached to the present, he failed to grasp the truth: that this was the last time he and his apprentice might see each
other in the flesh.
* * *
Events were converging rapidly. Unexpected obstacles notwithstanding, Maul’s tracking
skills had led him to the missing Queen. But he had failed in
his mission. Despite a brief confrontation with Qui-Gon
Jinn, the Jedi Master and his party had managed a second
successful escape. The Zabrak hadn’t been killed, as Plagueis had initially feared, but his crimson blade had
identified him as a Sith, and now the Jedi, Amidala, and
her retinue of guards and handmaidens were inbound to Coruscant in the Queen’s reflective starship. Sidious had
ordered Maul to go to Naboo to oversee the Neimoidian
occupation.
“Pestage and Doriana have put a plan in place that will weaken the campaigns of your chief rivals,” Plagueis was
saying as he and Palpatine hurried toward the skyhopper
that would carry them to the antigrav platform on which the Royal Starship had been cleared to land. “Coruscant will
soon know that Senator Ainlee Teem has been protecting a Dug who is deeply involved with Gardulla the Hutt and the Bando Gora’s death stick distribution network.”
“Another favor from Jabba?” Sidious asked.
“The Hutt has become an ally,” Plagueis said.
“With Black Sun headless, he’ll have free rein over the
spice trade.”
“For a time,” Plagueis said. “The information about
Senator Teem has been sent to Antilles, who has been
trying for years to have him removed from the Senate. When the corruption inquest is announced, Teem’s support will disappear. And so will support for Antilles, whose
ambitions have blinded him to the fact that no one in the Senate wants an overzealous reformer in the
chancellorship. The Rim Faction will then flock to you, in the
hope of being able to manipulate you, and the
humancentric Core Faction will back you because you’re
one of their own.” Sidious regarded him. “Were it not for you—” Plagueis waved him silent and came to a sudden halt. Sidious walked a few more steps and turned to him.
“You’re not going to accompany me to greet the Queen?”
“No. The Jedi are still with her, and our joint presence might allow them to sense our leanings.”
“You’re right, of course.”
“There’s one more issue,” Plagueis said. “The Naboo
crisis has finally caught the fancy of Coruscant. If we could
force a similar crisis in the Senate, your election would be
guaranteed.” Sidious thought about it. “There may be a way.” He
looked hard at Plagueis. “The call for a vote of noconfidence in Valorum.”
“If you—”
“Not me,” Sidious cut him off. “Queen Amidala. I will fill
her head with doubts about Valorum’s inability to resolve
the crisis and fears of what Trade Federation rule would mean for Naboo. Then I will take her to the Senate so that
she can see for herself how untenable the situation has
become.”
“Grand theater,” Plagueis mused. “She’ll not only call for
a vote of no-confidence. She’ll flee home to be with her
people.”
“Where we wanted her to begin with.”
“I trust that the food is better than the view,” Dooku
remarked without humor as he joined Palpatine at a window-side table in Mok’s Cheap Eats the following day. A small establishment catering to factory personnel, it
overlooked the heart of The Works.
“The Senate is studying plans to develop housing
projects in the flatlands.” Dooku frowned in revulsion. “Why not simply build over a
radioactive waste dump?”
“Where there are credits to be made, the lives of ordinary
citizens are of little consequence.” Dooku cocked an eyebrow. “I hope you’ll put a stop to it.”
“I’d prefer The Works to remain unchanged for a time.” Dooku waved off a waiter and regarded Palpatine with
interest. “So, a blockade prevents you from going to Naboo, and what happens but Naboo comes to you. Quite
a piece of magic.” Palpatine showed him a thin smile. “Yes, my Queen has
arrived.”
“Your Queen,” Dooku said, tugging at his short beard.
“And from all I hear you may soon be her Supreme Chancellor.”
Palpatine shrugged off the remark, then adopted a more
serious look. “That is, however, part of the reason behind my asking you to meet me here.”
“Worried that you won’t receive Jedi backing if you’re
seen with me in the usual places?”
“Nothing of the sort. But if I am elected, and if you and I
are going to begin to work together, it behooves us to give
all appearances of being on opposite sides.” Dooku folded his arms and stared. “Work together in what capacity?”
“That remains to be seen. But our common goal would
be to return the Republic to what it once was by tearing it
down.” Dooku didn’t say anything for a long moment, and when
he spoke it was as if he were assembling his thoughts on
the fly. “With perhaps your homeworld as the spark that
touches off a conflagration? Clearly the crisis has benefited
you politically, and that fact alone has certain beings wondering.” He scanned Palpatine’s face. “Under normal
circumstances, the Council wouldn’t have subverted the
authority of the Senate by honoring Valorum’s request to
send Jedi to Naboo. But for Yoda, Mace Windu, and the
rest, Valorum is a known quantity, whereas Senators Antilles and Teem and you have yet to disclose your true
agendas. Take you, for instance. Most are aware that you
are a career politician, and that you’ve managed thus far to
avoid imbroglios. But what does anyone know about you
beyond your voting record, or the fact that you reside in
Five Hundred Republica? We all think that there’s much more to you than meets the eye, as it were; something
about you that has yet to be uncovered.”
Instead of speaking directly to Dooku’s point, Palpatine
said, “I was as surprised as anyone to learn that Master Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan Kenobi were sent to Naboo.”
“Surprised, of course. But pleased?”
“Naboo is my homeworld. I want to see the crisis
resolved as quickly as possible.”
“Do you?” Palpatine held his look. “I begin to wonder what may
have prompted your confrontational mood. But for the sake
of argument, let us say that I feel no shame in taking full
advantage of the crisis. Would that cause you to distance
yourself from me?” Dooku smiled with his eyes, but not in mirth. “On the
contrary, as you say. Since I’m interested in learning more
about the possibility of an alliance.” Palpatine adopted a hooded look. “You’re resolved to
leave the Order?”
“Even more than when we last spoke.”
“Because of the Council’s decision to intervene at
Naboo?”
“I can forgive them that. The blockade has to be broken. But something else has occurred.” Dooku chose his next words carefully. “Qui-Gon returned from Tatooine with a
former slave boy. According to the boy’s mother, the boy
had no father.”
“A clone?” Palpatine asked uncertainly.
“Not a clone,” Dooku said. “Perhaps conceived by the
Force. As Qui-Gon believes.” Palpatine’s head snapped back. “You don’t sit on the Council. How do you know this?”
“I have my ways.”
“Does this have something to do with the prophecy you
spoke of?”
“Everything. Qui-Gon believes that the boy—Anakin is his
name—stands at the center of a vergence in the Force, and
believes further that his finding him was the will of the
Force. Blood tests were apparently performed, and the
boy’s concentration of midi-chlorians is unprecedented.”
“Do you believe that he is the prophesied one?”
“The Chosen One,” Dooku amended. “No. But Qui-Gon
accepts it as fact, and the Council is willing to have him
tested.”
“What is known about this Anakin?”
“Very little, except for the fact that he was born into
slavery nine years ago and was, until recently, along with
his mother, the property of Gardulla the Hutt, then a
Toydarian junk dealer.” Dooku smirked. “Also that he won
the Boonta Eve Classic Podrace.” Palpatine had stopped listening. Nine years old … Conceived by the Force … Is it
possible …
His thoughts rewound at frantic speed: to the landing
platform on which he and Valorum had welcomed Amidala
and her group. Actually not Amidala, but one of her lookalikes. But the sandy-haired boy, this Anakin, swathed in
filthy clothing, had been there, along with a Gungan and the
two Jedi. Anakin had spent the night in a tiny room in his
apartment suite. And I sensed nothing about him.
“Qui-Gon is rash,” Dooku was saying. “Despite his
fixation with the living Force, he demonstrates his own
contradictions by being a true believer in the prophecy—a
foretelling more in line with the unifying Force.”
“Nine years old,” Palpatine said when he could. “Surely
too old to be trained.”
“If the Council shows any sense.”
“And what will become of the boy then?” Dooku’s shoulders heaved. “Though no longer a slave,
he will probably be sent to rejoin his mother on Tatooine.”
“I understand your disillusionment,” Palpatine said. Dooku shook his head. “I haven’t told you all of it. As if
the announcement of having found the Chosen One wasn’t
enough, Qui-Gon discovered that the Trade Federation may have had the help of powerful allies in planning and
executing the blockade of Naboo.” Palpatine sat straighter in his chair. “What allies?”
“On Tatooine, Qui-Gon dueled with an assassin who is well trained in the Jedi arts. But he dismissed the idea that
the assassin is some rogue Jedi. He is convinced that the warrior is a Sith.”
Ignoring the reactions of apprehensive residents and wary
security personnel, Plagueis hastened along a plush
corridor in 500 Republica toward Palpatine’s suite of
crimson rooms. He had planned to be at the Senate Building to hear Amidala’s call for a vote of no-confidence
in Valorum, which would strike the first death knell for the Republic. At the last moment, however, Palpatine had
contacted him to recount a conversation he had had with
Dooku. The fact that Qui-Gon Jinn had identified Maul as a Sith was to be expected; but Dooku’s news about a human
boy at the center of a vergence of the Force had come as a
shock. More, Qui-Gon saw the boy as the Jedi’s
prophesied ChosenOne!
He had to see this Anakin Skywalker for himself; had to
sense him for himself. He had to know if the Force had
struck back again, nine years earlier, by conceiving a
human being to restore balance to the galaxy. Plagueis came to a halt at the entry to Palpatine’s
apartment. Eventually one of Queen Amidala’s nearidentical handmaidens came to the door, a vision in a dark
cowled robe. Her eyes fixed on the breath mask.
“I’m sorry, sir,” she said, “Senator Palpatine is not here.”
“I know,” Plagueis said. “I’m here to speak with a guest of
the Senator. A young human boy.” Her eyes remained glued on the mask. “I’m not permitted —”Damask motioned swiftly with his left hand, compelling
her to answer him. “You have my permission to speak.”
“I have your permission,” she said in a distracted voice.
“Now where is the boy?”
“Anakin, you mean.”
“Anakin, yes,” he said in a rush. “He’s the one. Fetch him —now!”
“You just missed him, sir,” the handmaiden said. Plagueis peered past her into Palpatine’s suite. “Missed
him?” He straightened in anger. “Where is he?”
“Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn came to collect him, sir. I
suspect that you can find him at the Jedi Temple.” Plagueis fell back a step, his thoughts reeling.
There was still a chance that the Council would decide
that Anakin was too old to be trained as a Jedi. That way,
assuming he was returned to Tatooine …
But if not … If Qui-Gon managed to sway the Council
Masters, and they reneged on their own dictates …
Plagueis ran a hand over his forehead. Are we undone?
he thought. Have you undone us?
30: TAKING THE FUTURE FROM THE
NOW
Magister Damask was still unnerved when he arrived at the Senate Building and hurried through its maze of corridors
and turbolifts to reach Naboo’s station on time for the event. During a recess that ensued after the call for a vote of noconfidence, Queen Amidala and the pair of retainers she
had arrived with had decided to return to 500 Republica. But Panaka was there, in his brown leather cap and jerkin,
along with Sate Pestage and Kinman Doriana. With
scarcely a word of acknowledgment, Plagueis edged past
the three men to join Palpatine on the hover platform.
“Did you speak with him?” Palpatine asked, while the
voice of the Senator from Kuat boomed through the Rotunda’s speakers.
The Muun shook his head in anger. “Qui-Gon had already
been there. They’ve gone to the Temple.”
“There’s still a chance—”
“Yes,” Damask said. “But if the boy’s midi-chlorian
concentrations are as high as Dooku hinted they are, then
the Jedi aren’t likely to allow him to escape their clutches.”
“High midi-chlorian counts don’t always equate to Force
talents. You told me yourself.”
“That’s not what concerns me,” Damask said, but he went no further. Gesturing broadly, he asked, “Where do we
stand?”
“Antilles was placed into nomination by Com Fordox.
Teem, by Edcel Bar Gan.”
“Traitors,” Damask seethed. “Fordox and Bar Gan.” Palpatine was about to reply when the voice of Mas Amedda filled the Rotunda. “The Senate recognizes Senator Orn Free Taa of Ryloth,” the Chagrian said from
the podium. Sei Taria was there, as well, but Valorum—all
but ousted from power—had either disappeared or was
seated out of sight.
The big blue Twi’lek stood proudly in the bow of the
platform as it floated toward the center of the Rotunda,
flanked by hovercams. In the curved rear of the platform
were Free Taa’s consort, a petite red-skinned Twi’lek, and
Ryloth’s co-Senator and death stick distributor, Connus
Trell.
“Ryloth is proud to place into nomination one who has not
only devoted twenty years of unflagging service to the Republic while managing to steer a gallant course through
the storms that continue to lash this body, but whose
homeworld has become the latest target of corporate
greed and corruption. Beings of all species and all worlds, I
nominate Senate Palpatine of Naboo.” Cheers and applause rang out from nearly every sector
of the hall, growing louder and more enthusiastic as Naboo’s platform detached from the docking station and
hovered to join those of Alderaan and Malastare.
“You’ve done it, Darth Plagueis,” Palpatine said quietly
and without a glance.
“Not yet,” came the reply. “I will not rest until I’m certain of
a win.”
It was late in the evening when Plagueis made his way onto
a public observatory that provided a vantage on the
proprietary arabesque of a landing platform on which
Queen Amidala’s Royal Starship basked in the ambient
light. With the cowl of his hood raised, he moved to one of the
stationary macrobinocular posts and pressed his eyes to
the cushioned eye grips. Qui-Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan Kenobi,
and the boy had arrived at the platform in a Jedi ship; Amidala, her handmaidens and guards, and a looselimbed Gungan in an open-topped hemispherical air taxi.
Just then the latter group was ascending the starship’s
boarding ramp, but Qui-Gon and the round-faced desert
urchin had stopped short of the ship to speak about
something. What? Plagueis asked himself. What topic has
summoned such an earnest look to Qui-Gon’s face, and
such confused urgency in the boy?
Lifting his face from the macrobinoculars, he stretched
out with the Force and fell victim to an assault of perplexing
images: ferocious battles in deep space; the clashing of
lightsabers; partitions of radiant light; a black-helmeted
cyborg rising from a table … By the time his gaze had
returned to the platform, Qui-Gon and the boy had
disappeared.
Trying desperately to make some sense of the images
granted him by the Force, he stood motionless, watching
the starship lift from the platform and climb into the night. He fought to repress the truth.
The boy would change the course of history. Unless …
Maul had to kill Qui-Gon, to keep the boy from being
trained. Qui-Gon was the key to everything.
Plagueis and Sidious spent the day before the Senate vote
in the LiMerge Building, communicating with Maul and
Gunray and seeing to other matters. Early reports from
Naboo indicated that Amidala was more daring than either
of them had anticipated. She had engineered a
reconciliation between the Naboo and the Gungans, and
had persuaded the latter to assemble an army in the
swamps. Initially, Sidious had forbidden Maul and the Neimoidians to take action. The last thing the Sith needed was to have Amidala emerge as the hero of their manufactured drama. But when the Gungan army had
commenced a march on the city of Theed, he had no
choice but to order Gunray to repel the attack and slaughter
everyone. Plagueis neither offered advice nor contradicted the
commands, even though he knew that the battle was lost
and that the boy would not die.
Instead he arranged for a conference comm with the
leaders of the Commerce Guild, the Techno Union, the Corporate Alliance, and others, telling them that, despite
the legality of the blockade, the Trade Federation had
brought doom upon itself.
“Pay heed to the way the Republic and the Jedi Order
deal with them,” Hego Damask told his holo-audience. “The
Federation will be dismantled, and the precedent will be
set. Unless you take steps to begin a slow, carefully
planned withdrawal from the Senate, taking your home and
client systems with you, you, too, risk becoming the
property of the Republic.” As daylight was fading over The Works, Sate Pestage
informed them that Senators Teem and Antilles were
crippled, and that some of Coruscant’s political
oddsmakers were now giving Palpatine the edge in the
election.
That left only one piece of business to finalize. Attend the opera.
Suspended like a scintillating ornament from a bracket of
roadways and pedestrian ramps, Galaxies Opera was
owned by notorious gambler and playboy Romeo Treblanc,
and designed to function as an alternative to the stuffy
Coruscant Opera, which for decades had been patronized
by House Valorum and other wealthy Core lineages. With
the Senate scheduled to convene in extraordinary session
the following morning, excitement gripped Coruscant, and
in celebration of the possibility that the election of a new
Supreme Chancellor might usher in an era of positive
change, half the Senate had turned out. Never had so much
veda cloth, brocart, and shimmersilk graced the lavish
carpets that led to the front doors; and never had such a
diverse assortment of Coruscanti spilled from the taxis and
limos that delivered them: patricians and doyennes,
tycoons and philanthropists, pundits and patrons, lotharios
and ingénues, gangsters and their molls … many clothed in
costumes as ostentatious as those worn by the performers
on the stage. Valorum had declined to appear, but both Ainlee Teem
and BailAntilles were among the thousands streaming in to
enjoy the debut performance of a new work by a Mon Calamari mastermind. Only Palpatine and Damask,
however, were personally welcomed by Treblanc—
Palpatine wrapped in a dark cloak, and the Muun in deep
green, with matching bonnet and a breather mask that left
part of his hoary jaw exposed.
“Word has it that he lost a fortune at the Boonta Eve Podrace,” Damask said when they were out of Treblanc’s
earshot.
“The event Anakin won,” Palpatine said. Damask stopped short in surprise, and turned to Palpatine for explanation.
“He captured first place.” Damask absorbed the news in brooding silence, then muttered, “The boy’s actions already echo across the
stars.” A Nautolan female escorted them to a private box on the
third tier, close to the stage, their appearance prompting
applause from some of the beings seated below,
rumormongering by others.
The lights dimmed and the performance began. Watery metaphors alternated with symbol-laden projections. The
experimental nature of the work seemed to enhance an
atmosphere of expectation that hung over the audience.
Their thoughts elsewhere, the two secret Sith sat in
respectful silence, as if hypnotized. During intermission, the crowd filed into the lobby for
refreshments. Discreetly, Damask sipped from a goblet of wine while distinguished beings approached Palpatine to wish him good fortune in the coming election. Other
celebrated beings gawked at Damask from a polite
distance; it was as if some long-sought phantom had
become flesh and blood for the evening. Holocams
grabbed images of the pair for media outlets. Damask
ingested a second goblet of wine while the lights flickered,
announcing the end of the intermission. Pestage had
assured him that some of Palpatine’s opponents in the Senate would be waylaid; others, rendered too drunk or
drugged to attend the morning session. None would die,
but several might have to be threatened. And yet, Damask
continued to fret over the outcome …
Following the performance, he and Palpatine joined a
select group of politicians that included Orn Free Taa and
Mas Amedda for a late dinner in a private room in the Manarai.
Then they retired to Damask’s penthouse.
Plagueis had given the Sun Guards the night off, and the
only other intelligence in the sprawling apartment was the
droid 11-4D, their servant for the occasion, pouring wine
into expensive glassware as they removed their cloaks.
“Sullustan,” Plagueis said, holding the glass up to the
light and swirling its claret contents. “More than half a
century old.”
“A toast, then,” Sidious said. “To the culmination of
decades of brilliant planning and execution.”
“And to the new meaning we will tomorrow impart to the Rule of Two.”
They drained their glasses, and 11-4D immediately
refilled them.
“Only you could have brought this to fruition, Darth
Plagueis,” Sidious said, settling into a chair. “Iwill endeavor
to live up your expectations and fulfill my responsibility.” Plagueis took the compliment in stride, neither haughty
nor embarrassed. “With my guidance and your charisma, we will soon be in a position to initiate the final act of the Grand Plan.” Making himself more comfortable on the
couch, he signaled for 11-4D to open a second bottle of the
vintage. “Have you given thought to what you will say
tomorrow?”
“I have prepared some remarks,” Sidious said. “Shall I
spoil the surprise?”
“Why not.” Sidious took a moment to compose himself. “To begin, I
thought I would say, that, while we in the Senate have managed to keep the Republic intact for a thousand years, we would never have been able to do so without the
assistance of a few beings, largely invisible to the public
eye, whose accomplishments now need to be brought into
the light of day.” Plagueis smiled. “I’m pleased. Go on.” Speaking in a low monotone, Sidious said, “Hego Damask is one of those beings. It was Hego Damask who was responsible for overseeing development of the Republic Reserve Administration and for providing financial
support for the Resettlement Acts that enabled beings to
blaze new hyperspace routes to the outlying systems and
colonize distant worlds.”
“That will come as a revelation to some.”
“In a similar fashion, it was Hego Damask who
transformed the Trade Federation—”
“No, no,” Plagueis interrupted. “Now is not the time to
mention the Trade Federation.”
“I thought—”
“I don’t see any problem with calling attention to the
arrangements I facilitated between the Republic and the Corporate Alliance and the Techno Union. But we must
take care to avoid areas of controversy.”
“Of course,” Sidious said, as if chastised. “I was
speaking off the top of my head.”
“Try a different approach.” So Sidious did. And as the night wore on, he continued to amend and
improvise, touching on Damask’s childhood on Mygeeto
and on the elder Damask’s contributions to the
InterGalactic Banking Clan during his term as co-chair. Wineglass in hand, Sidious paced the richly carpeted floor,
often vacillating between confidence and misgiving. More
than once, Plagueis voiced satisfaction with everything he
heard, but he urged Sidious to save his energy for the morning. By then, though, Sidious was too wound up to
heed the advice and kept reworking the order of the
remarks and the emphasis he gave to certain points.
The droid brought out a third, then a fourth bottle of the Sullustan wine. Pleasantly intoxicated, Plagueis, who had wanted
nothing more than to revel in the sweet taste of victory, was
beginning to find his collaborator’s performance
exhausting, and wanted nothing more than to close his eyes
and drift into imaginings of his march into the Senate Rotunda; the looks of surprise, astonishment, and
trepidation on the faces of the gathered Senators; his longanticipated emergence from the shadows; his ascension to
galactic power …
Unfortunately, Sidious wouldn’t let him.
“That’s enough for now,” Plagueis tried one final time.
“You should probably return home and get at least a few
hours’ rest before—”
“Just one more time—from the beginning.”
“The beginning?”
“Lord Plagueis, you said you wouldn’t rest until our win was a matter of fact.”
“So it is, and so I shall, Darth Sidious.”
“Then let us celebrate that, as well.” Sidious beckoned to
11-4D. “Fill our glasses, droid.” With dreamy weariness beginning to get the better of
him, it was all Plagueis could do to lift the glass to his nose. No sooner did he set the drink down than it tipped over,
saturating the tablecloth. His eyelids began to flicker and
close, and his breathing slowed. In twenty years of never
having had to contend with Plagueis in a state of sleep, the
transpirator clicked repeatedly in adjustment, almost as if in
panic. A few meters distant, Sidious came to a halt, gazing at
Plagueis for a long moment, as though making up his mind
about something. Then, blowing out his breath, he set his
own glass down and reached for the cloak he had draped
over a chair. Swirling it around himself, he started for the
door, only to stop shortly before he reached it. Turning and
stretching out with the Force, he glanced around the room,
as one might to fix a memory in the mind. Briefly his gaze
fell on the droid, its glowing photoreceptors whirring to
regard him in evident curiosity. A look of sinister purpose contorted Sidious’s face. Again, his eyes darted around the room, and the dark
side whispered: Your election assured, the Sun Guards absent, Plagueis unsuspecting and asleep …
And he moved in a blur. Crackling from his fingertips, a web of blue lightning
ground itself on the Muun’s breathing device. Plagueis’s
eyes snapped open, the Force gathering in him like a
storm, but he stopped short of defending himself. This
being who had survived assassinations and killed
countless opponents merely gazed at Sidious, until it struck
him that Plagueis was challenging him! Confident that he
couldn’t be killed, and in denial that he was slowly
suffocating, he might have been simply experimenting with
himself, actually courting death to put it in its place. Momentarily taken aback, Sidious stood absolutely still. Was Plagueis so self-deluded as to believe that he had
achieved immortality?
The question lingered for only a moment, then Sidious
unleashed another tangle of lightning, drawing more deeply
on the dark side than he ever had.
“Let’s go over the second part of the speech, shall we,”
he said, smoothing his tousled cloak. “You useless old
fool.” With a snarl, he threw the cloak back behind his
shoulders and leaned toward Plagueis, planting his palms
on the low table that was now puddled with spilled wine.
“It was Hego Damask as Darth Plagueis who came to Naboo, determined to suck the planet dry of plasma and
set the Trade Federation up as its overseers. It was Hego Damask as Plagueis who then set his sights on a
seemingly confused young man and, with meticulous skill, manipulated him into committing patricide, matricide,
fratricide. Darth Plagueis who took him as an apprentice,
sharing some of his knowledge but withholding his most
powerful secrets, denying the apprentice his wishes as a means of controlling him, instilling in him a sense of murderous rage, and turning him to the dark side.” Sidious
stood to his full height, glaring.
“It was Plagueis who criticized the early efforts of his
apprentice, and who once choked him in a demonstration
of his superiority.
“Plagueis, who denigrated him in private for hiring an
inept assassin to carry out the murder of Senator Kim—and
yet who allowed himself to be tricked by the Gran and
nearly killed by mercenaries.
“Plagueis, who turned away from the Grand Plan to focus
entirely on himself, in an egotistical quest for immortality.
“Plagueis who had the temerity to criticize his apprentice
for having inculcated too much pride in the assassin he had
trained.
“Plagueis who attempted to turn his equally powerful
apprentice into a messenger and mere intermediary.
“And Plagueis who watched in secret while his
apprentice tasked their true intermediary to reveal the
reborn Sith to the galaxy.” Sidious paused, then, in derision, added, “Plagueis the Wise, who in his time truly was, except at the end, trusting
that the Rule of Two had been superseded, and failed to
realize that he would not be excused from it. Plagueis the Wise, who forged the most powerful Sith Lord the galaxy
has ever known, and yet who forgot to leave a place for
himself; whose pride never allowed him to question that he would no longer be needed.”
Still struggling for breath, Plagueis managed to stand,
but only to collapse back onto the couch, knocking a statue
from its perch. Sidious moved in, his hands upraised to
deliver another bolt, his expression arctic enough to chill the
room. A Force storm gathered over the couch, spreading
out in concentric rings, to wash over Sidious and hurl
objects to all corners. In the center of it, Plagueis’s form
became anamorphic, then resumed shape as the storm
began to wane. Sidious’s eyes bored into the Muun’s.
“How often you said that the old order of Bane had ended with the death of your Master. An apprentice no longer
needs to be stronger, you told me, merely more clever. The
era of keeping score, suspicion, and betrayal was over. Strength is not in the flesh but in the Force.” He laughed. “You lost the game on the very first day you
chose to train me to rule by your side—or better still, under
your thumb. Teacher, yes, and for that I will be eternally
grateful. But Master—never.” Sidious peered at Plagueis through the Force. “Oh, yes,
by all means gather your midi-chlorians, Plagueis.” He held
his thumb and forefinger close together. “Try to keep
yourself alive while I choke the life out of you.” Plagueis gulped for air and lifted an arm toward him.
“There’s the rub, you see,” Sidious said in a
philosophical tone. “All the ones you experimented on,
killed, and brought back to life … They were little more than
toys. Now, though, you get to experience it from their side,
and look what you discover: in a body that is being denied
air, in which even the Force is failing, your own midichlorians can’t accomplish what you’re asking of them.” Hatred stained Sidious’s eyes.
“I could save you, of course. Return you from the brink, as
you did Venamis. I could retask your body to repair the
damage already done to your lungs, your hearts, your aged
brain. But I’ll do no such thing. The idea here is not to drag
you back at the last moment, but to bring you to death’s
door and shove you through to the other side.” Sidious sighed. “A tragedy, really, for one so wise. One who could oversee the lives and deaths of all beings,
except himself.”
The Muun’s eyes had begun to bulge; his pale flesh, to
turn cyanotic.
“You may be wondering: when did he begin to change?
“The truth is that I haven’t changed. As we have clouded
the minds of the Jedi, I clouded yours. Never once did I
have any intention of sharing power with you. I needed to
learn from you; no more, no less. To learn all of your
secrets, which I trusted you would eventually reveal. But what made you think that I would need you after that?
Vanity, perhaps; your sense of self-importance. You’ve
been nothing more than a pawn in a game played by a
genuine Master.
“The Sith’ari.” A cruel laugh escaped him.
“Reflect back on even the past few years—assuming you
have the capacity. Yinchorr, Dorvalla, Eriadu, Maul, the Neimoidians, Naboo, an army of clones, the fallen Jedi
Dooku … You think these were your ideas, when in fact
they were mine, cleverly suggested to you so that you could
feed them back to me. You were far too trusting, Plagueis. No true Sith can ever really care about another. This has
always been known. There is no way but my way.” Sidious’s eyes narrowed. “Are you still with me, Plagueis? Yes, I detect that you are—though barely.
“A few final words, then.
“I could have let you die in the Fobosi district, but I
couldn’t allow that to happen when there was still so much I
didn’t know; so many powers that remained just outside my
reach. And as it happened, I acted wisely in rescuing you. Otherwise how could I be standing here and you be dying? I
actually thought you would die on Sojourn—and you would
have if the Hutt hadn’t tipped you off to Veruna’s scheme.
“And yet that also turned out for the best, for even after all
you taught me, I might not have been able to take the final
steps to the chancellorship without your help in manipulating the Senate and bringing into play your various
and sundry allies. If it’s any consolation, I’m being honest when I say that I could not have succeeded without you. But
now that we’ve won the race, I’ve no need for a cochancellor. Your presence, much less your unnecessary
counsel, would only confuse matters. I have Maul to do what
the risk of discovery might not allow me to do, while I
execute the rest of the Grand Plan: growing an army,
fomenting rebellion and fabricating intergalactic war,
corralling the Jedi and catching them unawares …
“Rest easy in your grave, Plagueis. In the end, I will be
proclaimed Emperor. The Sith will have had their revenge,
and Iwill rule the galaxy.” Plagueis slid to the floor and rolled facedown. Death
rattled his lungs and he died. OneOne-FourDee started to approach, but Sidious motioned for it to stop.
“We’re going to have to find you a new home and a new
body, droid.” OneOne-FourDee looked once at the Muun, then at
Sidious. “Yes, Master Palpatine.” Sidious moved to the window, then turned to regard the murder scene. Hego Damask would appear to have died
because of a malfunction of the breathing apparatus. He would have the droid alert the medtechs. But no autopsy would be performed, and no inquest would follow. Holos of
their appearance at the Galaxies Opera would run on the HoloNet, and pundits would weigh in. Senator Palpatine might garner even greater sympathy; his delight in being
elected to the chancellorship diminished by the sudden
death of a powerful financial ally. Sidious moved back into the room to take a closer look
at Plagueis. Then, after a long moment, he returned to the window and pulled the drapes aside. His spirit soared, but briefly. Something was shading his sense of triumph: a vague
awareness of a power greater than himself. Was it
Plagueis reaching out from the far side of death to vex him?
Or was the feeling a mere consequence of apotheosis?
Outside, the summits of the tallest buildings were gilded
by the first rays of daylight.
EPILOGUE
Palpatine’s election to the chancellorship dominated the HoloNet. It was far from a landslide victory, but he won by a wider margin than even the oddsmakers had predicted,
due in part to the unexplained absence of several of his key
opponents. With two Supreme Court judges and Vice Chancellor Mas Amedda presiding, he took the oath of
office atop the Senate Podium, after Valorum had shaken
his hand and disappeared down the turbolift that led to the
preparation room far below. In his address he pledged to
return the Republic to its former glory and to purge the Senate of corrupt practices. No one paid much attention,
since every Supreme Chancellor for the past two hundred
years had made the same promises. Pundits, however, were quick to weigh in on what the
election might mean for the immediate future. The fact that
Naboo had managed to defeat the Trade Federation without the aid of mercenaries or Republic intervention had many beings wondering whether planets might follow
Naboo in establishing their own militaries and challenging
the power of the galactic consortiums. How might the
events of Naboo shape the new Supreme Chancellor’s
policies toward the Corporate Alliance and other cartels?
Would legislation regarding taxation of the free-trade zones
and the legality of droid armies be reexamined? Would
harsher enforcement lead eventually to the cartels’
secession from the Republic? And might entire systems
end up joining the exodus?
With so much attention being focused on the election,
stories that might otherwise have been viewed as
significant escaped notice. One such story was the
unexpected death of reclusive Muun financier Hego Damask. Hastily prepared obituaries contained the few
facts about his life that were public knowledge but scarcely
touched on the behind-the-scenes role he had played in
shaping the history of the Republic. Members of the
InterGalactic Banking Clan were refusing to release any
information about the funeral or about the disposition of
Damask’s substantial holdings on Muunilinst and dozens of
other worlds. Off the record, beings remarked that the
intricacies of the Muun’s business concerns might take
decades to unravel.
With the Battle of Naboo concluded—lost, in his estimation —Palpatine had no time to bask in adulation or celebrate
his win. His first order of business, indeed his first official
duty, was to travel to his homeworld to congratulate Queen Amidala and her new allies, the Gungans, on their surprise
victory.
It wasn’t until he arrived in Theed and learned of Darth
Maul’s defeat at the hands of the Jedi in a power-generator
station that he understood in part the reason for the sense
of loss and profound solitude he had experienced following
the murder of Plagueis. He could have pressed one of the
other Jedi who had arrived on Naboo for information as to
how Maul had managed to kill a master sword fighter only
to be overcome by a lesser one, but he didn’t want to know,
and as a result be able to imagine the contest. Still, it gave
him great pleasure to stand among Yoda, Mace Windu,
and other Masters and watch Qui-Gon Jinn’s body reduced
to ash, knowing that the Jedi was just the first casualty in a war that had been declared but not yet begun; one in which
ten thousand Jedi would follow Qui-Gon to the grave …
That Plagueis’s death and Maul’s defeat had occurred in
relative simultaneity could only have been the will of the
dark side of the Force, as was the fact that, until such time
as he took and trained a new apprentice, Palpatine was
now the galaxy’s sole Sith Lord. Disappointment also attended the fact that the droid
army of the Trade Federation had been so easily
vanquished by a handful of Naboo and an army of
primitives. But Anakin Skywalker was the larger issue. No
one could argue that he had shown remarkable courage
and Force ability in destroying the Trade Federation’s Droid Control Ship.
As Plagueis had said: Already his actions begin to echo
across the stars.
“What is this place?” Dooku asked after Palpatine had welcomed him into the LiMerge Building.
“An old factory. It was owned by Hego Damask, but he
deeded it to me before he died.” Dooku’s brow wrinkled. “For what purpose?”
“He thought I might have some use for it in jump-starting
a plan of urban revitalization.” Back on Coruscant for a little over a month, Palpatine was wearing a cowled cloak closed at the neck by a Sith
clasp, ostensibly as protection against acid-laden rain that was falling in The Works. Dooku was dressed as a civilian,
in tight-fitting trousers and a smart cape.
The former Jedi regarded the factory’s enormous main
room. “No Senate Guards?”
“They’re within comm range should I need them.”
“I would have thought you at least wanted me to see your
new office,” Dooku said, brushing beads of water from his
shoulder. “Then Irecalled what you said last time we spoke,
about our not being seen together in public.” Palpatine waved negligently. “The office is temporary. One more suited to the position is already in the planning
stages.” Side by side, they began to walk through the room. “So
you’ve hooked them already,” Dooku said. Palpatine feigned a look of innocence. “Not at all. The Appropriations Committee approached me with the idea of
constructing a dome near the Senate Building that will also
serve as a docking facility.”
“You appear to be very pleased with the idea.”
“Most pleased.” Dooku stopped to study him. “Your truer nature begins to
reveal itself, I think.” When Palpatine made no response, he
added, “Congratulations, by the way, on Naboo’s defeat of
the Trade Federation. An odd series of events, wouldn’t
you agree?” Palpatine nodded and resumed a measured pace.
“Everyone involved—including me—underestimated the
abilities of our Queen. It pained me to learn that Master Qui-Gon had been killed.” He paused momentarily. “Was it
his death that firmed your decision to leave the Order?”
“To a degree,” Dooku said, scowling. “I’ve learned
recently that another of my Padawans—Komari Vosa—is
alive.”
“I hope that’s some consolation,” Palpatine started to
say.
“It isn’t, as she is said to be leading the Bando Gora.” Dooku looked at him. “She could be a danger to the Republic, Supreme Chancellor.”
“Then thank you for the warning. How did the Council
react to your departure?”
“Not well. They demanded more explanation than I was willing to provide.”
“And Master Sifo-Dyas?” Dooku frowned. “He knew that my leaving was simply a matter of time. Although he did say something I found to be
rather curious. He said that if I had any designs on
instigating dissent, he would be one step ahead of me.” Palpatine shook his head in confusion. “Are you planning
to instigate dissent?” Dooku smiled faintly. “My first order of business is to
reclaim my title.”
“Count Dooku,” Palpatine said, assessing the sound of it.
“Somehow it suits you better than Master Dooku.”
“I’m tempted to adopt a new name altogether.”
“A new beginning.”
“Perhaps I should do as you’ve done.”
“As I’ve done?” Palpatine said.
“Call myself Dooku, as you retitled yourself Palpatine.”
“I see. Well, what meaning is conveyed by a name, in any
case?” Again, he paused for a long moment. “I understand
that Qui-Gon fell to a lightsaber.” Dooku’s head snapped around. “The same Sith he
confronted on Tatooine. The Council is hoping that Gunray
can shed some light on the matter once the trial is under way.”
“I wouldn’t put much faith in that. Does the Council know
anything at all?”
“Not even his Sith name,” Dooku said. “But they know
that there is another.”
“How could they?”
“In theory, when the Sith went into hiding one thousand
years ago, they vowed that there should be only two of them
at any given time—one Master, one apprentice, through the
generations.”
“Was this one who killed Qui-Gon the apprentice or the Master?” Dooku looked at him as they walked. “My every instinct
tells me that he was the apprentice. Obi-Wan suspects as much, as well, based on the Zabrak’s behavior. The Council is being more circumspect, but naturally they want
the other one found.” He fell silent, then added, “The Sith
deliberately revealed himself on Tatooine and on Naboo. More than disclosing their alliance with the Trade
Federation, he did so to send a message to the Jedi. It
amounts to a declaration of war.” Palpatine came to a stop at a broken window that
overlooked the rain-drenched Works. “How would one even
begin to know where to look for this other Sith?”
“I’m not sure,” Dooku said, coming abreast of him.
“Several crises of the past decade bear the signature of a more sinister intelligence than those who planned and
perpetrated the events. Yinchorr, for example; but
especially Eriadu and the assassination of the Trade
Federation leadership. Clearly, certain beings have dealt with the Sith—perhaps without realizing it—and some may
be dealing with the surviving one currently. Now that I’m no
longer a Jedi, there may be a way for me to extract
information from the crime cartels and other organizations. Eventually I will find him—or her—and with any fortune
before the Jedi do.”
“To avenge the death of Master Qui-Gon,” Palpatine
said, nodding, and aware that Dooku was staring at him
intently.
“The thought preoccupied me for some time, but no
longer.” Palpatine turned his head slightly. “Then why seek this
one?”
“Because I suspect that Naboo was only the beginning—
a kind of opening salvo. The Sith want to see the Republic
brought down. Much as you and I do.” Palpatine didn’t respond for a long moment. “But to ally with a Sith …”
“For many, they are the embodiment of pure evil, but the Council knows differently. What separates a Sith from a
Jedi is the way each approaches the Force. The Jedi
Order has placed limits on itself, but the Sith have never
shied from incorporating the power of the dark side to
accomplish their goals.”
“You wish to learn the secrets of the dark side?”
“I confess that I do.” Palpatine restrained an impulse to reveal his true
identity. Dooku was strong in the Force, and might simply
be attempting to draw him out. On the other hand …
“Something tells me that this hidden Sith may eventually
find his way to you,” he said at last. “And if and when he or
she does, I hope that the alliance you forge will help us
restore order to the galaxy.”
Sate Pestage showed Obi-Wan Kenobi and his young
Padawan, Anakin Skywalker, into Palpatine’s temporary
office in the Senate Building. Both Jedi were wearing lightcolored tunics, brown robes, and tall boots. Facsimiles of
each other.
“Thank you both for accepting my invitation,” Palpatine
said, coming out from behind a broad, burnished desk to welcome them. “Sit please, both of you,” he added,
gesturing to chairs that faced the desk and the large window behind it. Anakin had nearly seated himself when Obi-Wan
chastised him with a shake of his head.
“Thank you, Supreme Chancellor,” the short-bearded
Jedi said, “but we’ll stand.” He folded his hands in front of
him and waited for Anakin to join him before saying: “We
realize that your time is valuable.” Returned to his armchair, Palpatine smiled receptively.
“Not too valuable to spend with two of the people who
saved the life of my Queen and rescued my homeworld
from the clutches of the Trade Federation.” He kept his
eyes on Obi-Wan. “I am sorry for the loss of Qui-Gon Jinn, Master Obi-Wan.”
The Jedi nodded in gratitude, then said: “I have only
recently been named a Jedi Knight, Supreme Chancellor.” Palpatine adopted a look of surprise. “And already
you’ve been appointed a learner. Qui-Gon must have
trained you brilliantly.” Again, Obi-Wan nodded. “He was an inspired teacher.”
Palpatine firmed his lips and shook his head. “Such a waste of a life …” His cut his gaze to Anakin. “I didn’t have
an opportunity on Naboo to thank you, young Skywalker. Your actions were nothing less than extraordinary. May the
Force ever be as strong with you.”
“Thank you, sir,” Anakin said in a quiet voice. Palpatine interlinked the fingers of his hands. “I’m told
that you grew up on Tatooine. I visited there, many years
ago.” Anakin’s eyes narrowed for the briefest moment. “I did,
sir, but I’m not supposed to talk about that.” Palpatine watched him glance up at Obi-Wan. “And why
is that?”
“My mother—”
“Anakin,” Obi-Wan snapped in reprimand. Palpatine reclined slightly, studying the two of them. Obi- Wan seemed not to have noticed the fury simmering in the
boy, but for an instant Palpatine perceived a touch of his
younger self in Skywalker. The need to challenge authority;
the gift for masking his emotions. The yet-unrecognized
power.
“I apologize if I’ve stirred something between you,” he
said after a moment. Clearly uncomfortable, Obi-Wan shifted in place. “The
Jedi are trained to live in the moment, Supreme Chancellor. Our upbringings have little to do with our lives in the Force.” Palpatine furrowed his brow. “Easy for an infant, I’m
certain, but for a young boy …” He interrupted himself with
a negligent gesture. “Well, who am I to pass judgment on
the tenets of your Order, when the Jedi have kept peace in
the Repubic for one thousand years.” Obi-Wan said nothing in a definite way.
“But tell me, Padawan Skywalker, how it feels to have
become a member of such a revered group.”
“It’s like a dream come true, sir,” Anakin said in genuine
sincerity.
“A dream come true … Then you’ve long thought about
the Jedi Order and about the Force.” Anakin nodded. “I’ve always wanted to bring justice—”
“It’s not for you to decide your destiny, Anakin,” Obi-Wan
said. “The Force will guide you.”
Palpatine smiled inwardly. Guide you to me, young
Skywalker. Dooku had talent, and could be a powerful placeholder.
But this seemingly guiless pleasant-faced boy, this Forceful
boy, was the one he would take as his appretice, and use
to execute the final stage of the Grand Plan. Let Obi-Wan
instruct him in the ways of the Force, and let Skywalker
grow embittered over the next decade as his mother aged
in slavery, the galaxy deteriorated around him, and his
fellow Jedi fell to inextricable conflicts. He was too young to
be trained in the ways of the Sith, in any case, but he was
the perfect age to bond with a father figure who would listen
to all his troubles and coax him inexorably over to the dark
side.
“As I told you on Naboo, Anakin,” he said finally, “we will
continue to follow your career with great interest.” And assure that it culminates in the ruination of the Jedi
Order and the reascendancy of the Sith!
